 









Copyright  2011 by Lester Hunter
All Rights Reserved



 
 
 Table of Contents
Chapter 1 - Settling the Debt	1
Chapter 2 – The Night Before	14
Chapter 3 – Cassiopeia’s Longing for Home	24
Chapter 4 – Day and Night	36
Chapter 5 – Cassie’s Lost Cause	47
Chapter 6 – The Colonel’s Charge	61
Chapter 7 – The Undying Debt of Honor	70
Chapter 8 – Healing Wounds Festering Scars	79
Chapter 9 – Byrne’s Fever	93
Chapter 10 – Going Guerilla	105
Chapter 11 – New Roots	116
Chapter 12 – The Ghost Returns	125
Chapter 13 – Loose Tongues	135
Chapter 14  – Building Anxiety	142
Chapter 15 – Cassie Gets a Gun	148
Chapter 16 – Brogan’s Exile	158
Chapter 17 – Bunkhouse Monk	172
Chapter 18 – On the Town	182
Chapter 19 – The Darkness of Confinement	192
Chapter 20 – Second Exile	198
Chapter 21 – A Visit, Vengeance, and Release	210

 
Chapter 1 - Settling the Debt
As he rode past at a canter, Lieutenant Colonel Beau Martel turned his head to the side and saw his shadow, it was the shadow of a Confederate soldier on horseback that was distorted by the late afternoon sun of a mid-October day. The golden stalks of grass were briefly blackened by his shadow as he passed. He turned his head back and stared intently at his objective, a deserted farmhouse. His shoulder length hair hung over a face hiding freshly healed scars. From time to time, he winced with pain as his horse jostled his freshly healed wounds and brought him nearer his destination.
	In front of the farmhouse, he paused to prepare himself. His expression went from one that masked pain to one of righteous determination. He shifted his weight to his left leg and grabbed the stirrup’s horn with his left hand to dismount. Imprisoned by pain, it took him three attempts before he was successful getting his right leg over the saddle. He slowly lowered himself to the ground, steadying himself with his bent left leg and right arm that was anchored to the saddle’s horn. When his right foot touched the ground, he let go of the saddle; the horse stirred in response to the change in tension. He walked to the front of the horse with a pronounced limp and tethered it to the hitching post with his left hand. He paused to gather his strength and straighten his uniform. As an officer he took special care adjusting his saber and side arm.
	He attempted to walk with an arrogant swagger, doing his best to hide his limp, up to the door of the farmhouse, opened it, and stepped inside. Seated inside, was another Confederate officer who stood up when he entered. The two men looked each other over, not as enemies, but not as friends either.
	“I did not expect to see you back so soon,” Major Ira Owen said as he stared at the man in the doorway.
	“I did not expect to be back,” Lieutenant Colonel Beau Martel replied. “I did not think you would respond to my note.” He added and then closed the door behind him.
	The major sat back down and gestured to the colonel to take the seat across from him. The look on the colonel’s face showed a hint of disgust, and he chose another seat. The colonel rested on the seat’s arm where his saber and side arm remained visible and accessible. The sun poured into the room at an angle almost parallel to the floor. The colonel noticed the oil lanterns, which sat on the mantle behind him, were lit.
“Drink?” the major asked. 
The colonel nodded and the major got up, walked over to a nearby table, and poured brandy from a bottle into two tin cups. He brought the cups, and the bottle, back with him to his seat. The colonel noticed the major’s limp.
	“How’d you get that?” the colonel asked as he accepted the cup from the major.
	“Patterson’s Creek.” The major replied as he put the bottle down between them before he sat down.
	“I thought your wounds from that were minor?”
	“Nothing that happened there was minor.”
	Cannon fire could be heard in the background.  It was harassing fire, the dueling of opposing batteries. The parlor inside the farmhouse was not too far from the forming battle lines where the two men sat drinking brandy. The boots of the two men were dusty as were their uniforms.
	The colonel lifted the tin cup to his mouth to drink with his only arm, having lost his other arm earlier in the war. As the two sat, the colonel’s thoughts drifted back to his life before the war when he had both arms. He thought about his southern gentlemanliness, and how, ever since he was young, he was fearless in the execution of what he felt was his duty.  He remembered the time he retrieved a woman’s wedding ring, from the midst of a pack of blooded hunting dogs using the arm that he recently lost, without even the slightest hint of fear or reservation. 
In almost any society, his personality would have made him an admired and respected man, but the curious mixture of pride and modesty, that his society’s code dictated, created the situation where he sustained the grievous injuries that almost put him out of the war permanently. He still would be sitting at home, nursing his wounds, had it not been for the misfortunes of the Confederate Armies and their desperate need for men with his skills.  He learned, through his gallant yet reckless charge, that righteousness of cause does not engender invulnerability.  He not only injured himself, but he also lost many seasoned and valiant soldiers that his cause could use at this point.  The lesson had not been wholly lost with him, but deep wounds heal with scar tissue, even emotional wounds.
	Major Ira Owen sat across from the colonel in a squeaky old wooden chair that told of every shift in posture.  He stared out the parlor’s window lost in his own thoughts about the war.  The major’s thoughts were very different from the colonel’s.  Major Owen loathed the war and thought of it as an inconvenience.  He felt it impeded his enjoying the privileged lifestyle he felt was his birthright. The memory of white gloved slaves serving tea and mint juleps from a silver service caused him to look down at his tin cup in disgust. If he were home he would be riding in his surrey to the family townhouse with slaves in starched white uniforms, manicured gardens, and an endless stream of women suitors, with their mothers in tow, all hoping for a relationship to take root. It made his only goal be to survive the war with his body and reputation intact.
	“You understand what I am asking of you?” the colonel asked breaking the long silence between them.
	“I believe so.”
	“I need this diversion to blood up my boys.”
	“A final maneuver before the fight.” 
The major shifted in his squeaky chair.  He lifted the tin cup and finished its contents with some of it pouring out of the side of his mouth and down his cheek.
	“Major, I never asked you what really happened back at Patterson’s Creek. I mean unofficially, man to man.”
	“But you will ask now,” The major said wiping his cheek with the back of his hand.
	“There was talk . . .,” the colonel continued.
	“We got there too late,” the major replied raising his voice. “There was nothing we could do,” he paused for a moment. “The maps were wrong,” he added before he looked up toward the ceiling.
	“There was talk major,” the colonel replied sharply.  “There was talk about you taking your time. There was talk about you stopping to water your horses, about you checking your maps,” the colonel added.  “About you wasting time while men were dying!” the colonel finished almost yelling.  He swallowed and took a moment to regain his composure.
	“Major,” the colonel, said quietly.  “I would consider the issue of Patterson’s Creek settled if you would assist me in this matter,” he punctuated his request with a stern facial expression.
	There was another long silence between the two men. Neither man looked at the other. The afternoon light in the room had dimmed to darkness allowing the light of the lanterns to take effect.
	“You owe me.”
	“Owe you?”
	“Your lack of action cost me my arm and a lot of good men their lives!”
	“That action was review by headquarters! I was absolved.”
	“That was then. I wonder what headquarter would think now. I have been discussing the incident with some of the headquarters’ staff, and many of them are starting to see things my way.”
	“No new board of inquiry is going to reverse that decision. My orders were clear, and I followed them to the letter.”
	“No, but it might draw their scrutiny and drag you out from behind your men into the fight!”
	“Colonel, what are you suggesting?”
	“I’m suggesting that you help me.”
	“Or?”
	“Or major, one way or another you will pay for your dalliance two years ago. I needn’t remind you that I am still a fair shot on the field of honor, even with one arm.”
The major sat back in his chair. His angry expression melted away and changed to one of contemplation. After some contemplation, the major slowly nodded his head in agreement, and the colonel poured more brandy into the major’s cup.  He also filled his cup, put the bottle down, and lifted his cup almost as if to give a toast.  “Then we shall not speak of these things again,” he said then brought the cup to his mouth and drank.
*	*	*	*
	The men of Major Owen’s command stared at Lieutenant Colonel Martel as he rode into the major’s bivouac. This was not only because of the stature with which the colonel carried himself, but also both he and his horse were clean and well fed. He was a rare sight. His head was still held high, his movements were deliberate and without hesitation. Evident by the expression on his face, the thought of defeat was far from his mind. He still looked the confident predator they all once were, and the bright morning sun that shone behind him gave him a radiant glow. That was the view from the side with his remaining arm. The opposite side told a different story. The light breeze blew his hair away from his face exposing the scars and thinly veiled winces from pain. The sleeve of his uniform was pinned up revealing his amputated arm. Most of the troops that saw him gave him a quick glance and then looked away.  Those, whose glances lingered, were briefly teased by the twinge of hope that they all joyfully carried with them at the start of the war. Hope that, for them, time and reality had now corrupted.  He rode through the camp to its center where Major Owen had his tent.  The orderlies in front of the tent, Corporal Reed and Private Pierson, snapped to attention and both gave the colonel a crisp salute, which he returned. After the colonel dismounted, Private Pierson took the reins of the colonel’s mount, and Corporal Reed threw open the folds of the major’s tent and announced the colonel’s arrival.
	“Get Captains Meriwether and Brogan along with Lieutenant Perry and have them report to my tent. Also, get some fresh water and a bottle of my sipping whiskey,” the major said to Corporal Reed.  “Make sure the Colonel’s horse is properly tended to,” he barked after the orderly as the orderly walked away. “Lieutenant Colonel Martel,” the major said dropping the harshness from his voice as he turned to face the colonel and salute.  The colonel returned the salute and the major pulled the fold of the tent open wider and gestured his visitor to enter.
	Inside the tent, the colonel took the knapsack that he carried off his shoulder and put it on a chair by the table. He retrieved a map from the knapsack. With one arm, he tried to flatten it on the table before him. The major watched quietly for a moment before he spoke.
“May I assist you, colonel?” The major asked. The colonel looked up at the major as though the major had just insulted him. The colonel’s expression quickly softened.
“Yes, major you may,” the colonel replied and allowed the map to roll up into itself. “I am still getting used to dealing with my current situation. I’m sure you understand.”
The major stepped over to the table, unrolled the map, and secured its edges with weights.
“Drink?” The major asked when he finished with the map and looked at the colonel.
“Yes, I believe I will,” the colonel answered and sat down on one of the chairs around the table. The major stepped away from the table and retrieved a full bottle of whiskey and two glasses that sat on his desk. He carried them back to the table, filled the glasses and handed one to the colonel. The two men sipped their whiskey in silence.

The three junior officers entered the field tent worn and agitated. They saluted the two superior officers that sat at the table before them. Major Owen’s brow furrowed when he saw Captain Brogan’s ragged uniform.
“Captain Brogan, what is the meaning of this?”
“Major, the captain was in a wrestling match for the unit,” Lieutenant Perry said.
“Wrestling? Captain, you are a Confederate officer not some circus side show!”
“Sir, the captain was filling in for Sergeant Milne who’s down with a bout of malaria,” Captain Meriwether said.
“So you were there too, Captain Meriwether?”
“Sir, supplies are short. The quartermaster thought it best that we get together and each of the units wrestle for our allotment rather than someone going short and having to steal from the others. . . this way the matter is settled out in the open.”
“Still, I don’t like my officers looking like field hands.”
“Sir, he would have changed, but we were told you wanted to see us right away.”
“Captain Brogan, you will change when we are done here. You understand.”
“Yes sir.”
“Did you win?” The colonel asked.
“Yes sir, he sure did. He left the other man flat on his back,” the lieutenant said.
 The colonel and major’s whiskey glasses were half-full as was the whiskey bottle. The whiskey had softened the hard expressions of the two men from when they first met. The major gestured to the men to have a seat at the table, which colonel and he were already seated. There was a map on the table, and the junior officers took their seats slowly knowing that a map and two field officers could mean only one thing.
	“Drink?” the major asked the three men that had just arrived. They all nodded quietly as they shifted uncomfortably in their chairs. The major grabbed three large, not so clean shot glasses, filled them, and handed them to the men. The colonel sat at the table, silently studying the map.
	“Gentleman, Lieutenant Colonel Martel here has a task for us,” the major said. The backs of the captains stiffened when they heard the word task. The two captains looked at each other then turned their heads to look at the major. “The colonel here wants us to provide him a diversion,” the major continued as he moved around the table closer to the colonel and the area of the map that the colonel studied. 
	“I need to divert this Yankee regiment here,” the colonel, said pointing to a spot on the map. “I need them either drawn away,” he continued as he made a sweeping motion with his hand. “Or pinned down,” and placed his index finger on a particular spot on the map.
	“Major,” the Captain Meriwether said and then paused. “That’s not really our section of the line,”
	“It’s our far flank,” the major replied curtly. “The colonel’s cavalry has reconnoitered the area and has identified some soft spots where we can make a drive against the Yankees.”
	“Major Owen, there’s no need to take such a tone with your men about this,” the colonel said looking up from the map at the junior officers. “I just need them to see enough of the rabbit to set their dogs running,” he added and looked back down at the map.
	“Of course colonel,” the major replied.
	“My men spotted an artillery battery on the hill there,” he said pointing to a particular spot on the map. “That leaves them blind to a sudden mounted infantry attack from here or here,” the colonel continued pointing to various places on the map as he spoke. “With the sun on your back and wind in your face we could leave them running with their stew still in the pot.”
	The two junior officers sat back in their chairs and sighed apprehensively. The major studied the faces of the two men. He took a deep breath while he and the colonel waited for the two junior officers to respond.
	“Is there a problem?” the major asked.
	“No sir,” Captain Meriwether responded and paused. “We’re just wondering.”
	“Wondering . . . wondering about what,” the major asked tersely.
	“What these positions will look like tomorrow, sir. I mean, I assume that you will want us to move on these positions as soon as possible, and tomorrow is the earliest we could muster.”
	“Gentleman, let me be clear about this. What I asked the major for was a diversion. I only need the Yankees to look the other way briefly. Don’t be getting into some extended fray here.” 
	“Sir, you just want us to go up there and get them to look our way for a minute or two. Is that right?” Captain Brogan asked. The colonel nodded in response. “And break it off when?” Captain Brogan continued.
	“When my brigade of cavalry is across the bridge they’re guarding.”
	“How will we know you’re through?” Captain Meriwether asked. The colonel paused to think. After a minute, he pulled a compass out of his pocket and placed it on the table. He then oriented the compass to the map’s north and moved it closer to the positions that he had been pointing at earlier. His eyes darted from one point to another, as he spent a minute studying the map.
	“You won’t have to,” the colonel answered. “I’m just asking you to draw them off. They’ll come running after you this way,” the colonel pointed to a spot on the map. “And we’ll be coming at them from the opposite side.” 
	Captain Meriwether looked at the colonel with a quizzical expression.
	“Colonel, I still don’t see how. . .” 
	“Captain, have you ever heard the thunder of Confederate Cavalry?” The colonel, smiling contemptuously, asked Captain Meriwether.
	“I have.”
	“Then what is your concern?” The colonel asked as Captain Meriwether’s serious expression drained from his face.
	“Very well then colonel. You have your infantry support,” the major said. “Is there anything else?”
	“No,” the colonel replied breaking his stare with Captain Meriwether.
	“When were you planning to execute this raid?” The major asked.
	“As soon as you are ready. Tomorrow, if possible?”
	“Brogan, Meriwether, what do you think,” the major asked.
	The two captains searched the other’s face for an answer. Captain Brogan was first to nod in agreement. Captain Meriwether did not nod but turned his head away from the table and the map before he said, “I’m sure we could have the men ready by first thing tomorrow.”
	“Then it is agreed. Tomorrow, let us drink to it,” the major said as he started to lift his glass in the air. The other officers lifted their glass after him.
	“To scattered Yankees,” the colonel said grinning broadly.
*	*	*	*
	The treetops still filtered the morning sun when Corporal Reed, one of the major’s orderlies, approached Captain Brogan talking to the blacksmith by the corral. The corporal’s approach, announced by the crunch of crisp freshly fallen leaves, could be heard between the intermittent strikes of the blacksmiths hammer against an anvil. The Captain turned to face the corporal as the corporal came to a stop and saluted.
	“Captain, the major wants to see you,” Corporal Reed said dropping his salute.
	“Very well, tell him I’ll be along shortly,” the captain replied speaking over the slow rhythmic blows of the blacksmith’s hammer.
	“What?” Corporal Reed asked. Captain Brogan stepped closer to the corporal and leaned forward to talk into the corporal’s ear.
	“I’ll be there shortly,” the Captain repeated louder.
	“Sir, the major said right away, and I also have a message I’m delivering to Captain Meriwether. So I won’t be going right back.”
	Captain Brogan gave the corporal a sour expression before he saluted to dismiss him. The corporal quickly returned the salute and continued on his way. The captain moved off in the opposite direction toward the major’s tent. The crunch of the fall leaves became louder the further away he got from the corral and the sound of an anvil being slowly pummeled.
	As Captain Brogan approached the major’s tent, he was surprised to see the major seated outside. When the major saw the captain, he stood up, grabbed his cane, and walked toward him. The two men saluted each other when they met.
	“Walk with me captain; there is a matter that I wish to discuss,” the major said and then pivoted to set the direction of their walk.
	“Sir, wouldn’t it be easier to talk in your tent?” The captain asked following the major that had started off at a brisk pace.
	“I wanted to get some air captain.” 
	“Yes sir,” the captain replied as he stepped up his pace to keep abreast of the major. They walked away from the camp, beyond the sanitation trench, toward the wood line.
	“Captain, I want you to lead the attack tomorrow.”
	“Why sir? Captain Meriwether is the senior officer.”
	“He seemed indecisive.”
	“Indecisive how? The colonel didn’t seem bothered by his questions.”
	“You don’t know the colonel like I do. I assured him that I would send someone who would do the job with no hesitation. That’s you.”
	“Yes, sir.”
	“I want you to start preparations immediately. And Brogan, keep this to yourself.”
	“Yes, sir.”
	“And Brogan, if you see Lieutenant Perry along the way, tell him that he’s to join me for supper in my tent.”
	“Yes, sir,” the captain said. He saluted the major and walked back toward the camp. The major continued on his walk.
 

Chapter 2 – The Night Before
Major Owen had just finished lighting the oil lamps in his tent to offset the descending darkness of late afternoon. As he put the chimney back on the last lamp that he lit Corporal Reed snapped open the tent flap. He stepped in and stood at attention before he spoke.
“Sir, Lieutenant Perry to see you.”
“See him in.”
Corporal Reed stepped aside and saluted as the lieutenant stepped into the tent. Once inside, the lieutenant stepped up to the major and saluted as the tent flap settled back into position upon the corporal’s exit. The major, facing the lieutenant, studied the young man that stood before him. The lieutenant was thin, medium height, and had sandy blonde hair that settled just below his ears. He still retained many boyish physical and emotional characteristics. His new uniform fit smartly and was one of the few features of authority that he could project onto the seasoned veterans he commanded. The major shifted his stance before he limped over to and stood behind his desk.
“Have a seat lieutenant,” the major said and started to pour himself a shot from the bottle that sat on his desk.
The lieutenant sat in the chair in front of the major’s desk and watched his commanding officer drink the shot. He put the shot glass down and started to pace back and forth in front of the lieutenant. The lieutenant followed the major with his eyes keeping a partially stoic partially curious expression on his face. The lieutenant discipline kept him from speaking until he was spoken to. When the major reached the entrance end of the tent he spoke aloud to the corporal he knew was standing just outside.
“Have our supper brought in as soon as it is ready,” he said pausing before he continued pacing.
“Yes, sir!” the corporal replied from outside the tent. The lieutenant sat uneasy in his seat, his eyes continued to following the major, as he passed behind him in his sentry like pacing.
“Sir, I was surprised by your invitation. I thought you might want me to assist in tomorrow’s action,” the lieutenant said uneasily.
“I have assigned that duty to Captain Brogan,” the major replied his pace unbroken by the lieutenant’s query.
“But sir, I volunteered to fight Yankees. The war will be over before I’ll have fired a shot,” the lieutenant complained with his back to the major.
“I have another task in mind for you,” the major said breaking his pacing to walk around his desk and pour another drink.
“Sir?”
“Did you hear him?” The major asked after he gulped another shot. The major was quiet for a moment then took another drink and started back to pacing.
“Hear whom, sir?”
“Colonel Martel. Plume of our hats! Who does he think we are, Musketeers? He’s no gentleman, no gentleman at all!” The major said. His head twitched angrily to one side and then the other as if he were punctuating the end of each sentence.
“Sir, isn’t that the Colonel Martel that lead the charge at Patterson’s Creek?” The lieutenant asked and the major’s expression tightened to a frown.
“The same,” the major answered. His answer caused the lieutenant to break with protocol and turn around in his seat to look at the major.
“It’s my understanding that his charge turned the tide of the entire battle. His cavalrymen engaged a much larger Yankee force and kept them from turning our flank,” the lieutenant said excitedly.
“That was the story, but victories often whitewash the acts of the foolhardy,” the major answered in a low angry voice.
“Sir?” The lieutenant said as he snapped back around in his chair reassuming his face forward position.
“I was there, too. I was sent to Patterson’s Creek to support his withdrawal. My orders were not to cross the creek, but act as a rear guard should Martel encounter a superior force. He did, but he didn’t retreat!”
“Sir?”
“He took his men across that creek and kept them there to be slaughtered! And afterward, he tried to have me courts-martialed for not following him.”
“But, if you saw that he was in distress, shouldn’t you have . . .”
“I did exactly what I was supposed to do, and the board of inquiry agreed with my decision. You may be too young to realize this, but good soldiers follow orders!”
“Yes sir. We have spoken of this many times.”
“That’s why I am having you be my courier. As my father always used to say to customers at the bank, ‘accountability is the hallmark of integrity.’”
Corporal Reed threw back the flap of the tent with a sudden snapping noise that canvas makes. He stepped in the door, came to attention, and saluted.
“Your dinner sir,” the corporal said and waited for instructions from the major.
“Fine, have them bring it in then dismiss them,” the major replied over his shoulder still engaged with the lieutenant in conversation.
Corporal Reed saluted, pivoted around, and motioned to the three men that were outside of the tent. They first bring in a table in which they unfolded, draped with a tablecloth, and set two places. All of which was done quickly and quietly. The two officers remained in repose while the enlisted men did their work. Two chairs were then brought in followed by two covered supper plates. The Corporal Reed signaled the men to uncover the food and stand at attention. The major walked over and inspected the food on the plate. It was a simple meal of roast chicken, beans and wild greens all of which was nicely displayed. The major gently nodded his head and Corporal Reed signaled the men to uncover the other plate and leave. They performed their task gingerly and left without saying a word. After the men were out of the tent, the corporal came to attention again.
“Anything else, sir?” The corporal asked.
“No, that will be all,” the major responded casually. The corporal saluted and pivoted to leave. “Oh, Corporal Reed.”
“Yes sir?” the corporal responded turning around sharply to face the major.
“Make sure that we are not disturbed, by anyone,” the major added and then nodded his head.
“Yes, sir,” the corporal replied. He saluted and turned once again to leave. The corporal closed the tent flap behind him and barked indiscernible orders from outside the tent. The sound of scrambling feet could be heard around the tent briefly before it slowly died away.
The major and lieutenant sat down at the table that had just been set up and, after a brief prayer, they began to eat.
“Eat hardy lieutenant. I am sending you to headquarters tonight with a communiqué.” The major paused to swallow before continuing. “I need to know their thoughts on the colonel’s action.” The major said before he put another fork full of food in his mouth. The lieutenant stopped eating and looked at the major quizzically while he finished chewing the food in his mouth. He sat up straight before speaking.
“Sir, aren’t they already aware? Why do I need to . . .?
“And good soldiers do what lieutenant?” The major replied giving the lieutenant a stern expression.
“Follow orders, sir,” the lieutenant responded and went back to eating.
“Very good lieutenant. Now, enjoy your meal. You have a long ride ahead of you,” the major said and continued eating his supper.

	The major suddenly pulled back the flap to his tent and found Corporal Reed lounging on the ground. The corporal quickly got to his feet and came to attention. The major scowled briefly.
	“Corporal, have a strong well rested mount brought here immediately.” 
	“Yes sir,” the corporal replied and saluted before he ran off towards the corral.
	The major replaced the flap and turned to face the lieutenant who was sitting inside.
“You understand the importance of what you are doing?”
“Yes sir.”
“The lives of many good men will depend on you getting my message through to headquarters and their response back to me before the morning.”
“Yes sir.”
“Lieutenant, no detours or dallying with this message. Stay off of the main roads and do not ride along the levee. These are all places that you may be captured or killed.”
“Sir, may I ask the nature of the communiqué?”
“No you may not.”
“Just carry it to headquarters and return with their response. What you are doing is dangerous enough. I would send someone else if I had not promised them to the colonel.”
“Sir, I shall not fail you or the colonel.”
The major’s attention was drawn to the sound of an approaching horse. “Your mount arrives,” the major said. “Leave now and return as soon as you can.” 
The major saluted the lieutenant before he exited the tent. After the lieutenant left, the major’s anxiety showed on his face. He stood by the tent flap and listened as the lieutenant mounted his horse and rode away.
*	*	*	*
	The wind shifted and the stench of the sanitation trench was blown away from the bivouac. Captain Brogan and Sergeant Devereux walked through the camp. Up from the corral to where the men camped.
“Captain, I think Captain Meriwether is right. The Yankees don’t bushwhack you. They just run us through the cotton gin and pick us out like seeds. But ain’t nothing they done that you haven’t gotten us out of,” Sergeant Devereux said in a voice loud enough to be heard over the crunch of the fall leaves.
“Sergeant, I just keep thinking that we’ve been lucky. Maybe, one of these times it may be our turn,” the captain replied preoccupied with other thoughts.
“Captain, I’ve been in a lot of actions. Sometimes its luck, but luck only takes you so far. You keep a cool head under fire. That counts a lot. I know it, the men know it, its time you just come out and say it before you forget and freeze up on us.”
“I depend on you men as much as you depend on me. I lead some men to their death. My only solace is that there are some familiar faces left standing when it’s over.”
“Captain, there are some men that believe the only way they will ever make it home again is by sticking close to you.”
“Sergeant, you might want to tell them that might do better putting their faith in God instead of me.”
*	*	*	*
	Twilight had pushed the sun beyond the horizon far enough for the brighter stars to start to twinkle. Some of the campfires, those not still subordinated by the last of the daylight, began to glow in a silent show that indicated the size of the brigade. Captain Brogan walked through the camp making sure that his men were getting prepared to fight. He walked past tents with campfires that cooked beans and wild greens. The captain’s men could be heard talking and laughing all around him. They greeted him as he passed.
“Captain, will you join us for some coffee?” Private Williams asked.
“Is that chicory or your Tennessee brew?” Captain Brogan replied.
“Sir, why don’t you stop and find out for yourself. We sure would appreciate you straightening us out about a few things,” Private Williams said.
“Sure, I’ll take a minute,” the captain said.
“Have a seat sir,” Private Williams offered as he leaned into the fire to pour some coffee into a cup.
“I can’t stay long. What’s on your mind?” Captain Brogan knelt down by the campfire Sergeant Devereaux stood next to him.
“Sir, some of the men are nervous about tomorrow. I mean, more than usual. The word is that we are the only unit moving out tomorrow. Do you know what we are getting into?” Private Daniels asked. Private Williams handed the captain a cup of coffee.
“I can’t say much about what is going to happen, but I can say that the hardest part will probably be the march there and back,” Captain Brogan replied.
“Sir that was a lot of gold braid that rode into the camp this morning. Don’t the major usually get his orders by courier?” Private Williams asked.
“The colonel? He was just paying a visit to the major,” the captain said.
“Sir, we heard it was the Colonel Martel,” Private Daniels said emphasizing the word ‘the’.
“You heard right. And what business do you think he would have with this unit other than to visit the major?” The captain asked rhetorically.
 “Captain, we need to get going if you’re going to get those reports to the major tonight,”
the sergeant said and Captain Brogan stood up to leave.
“Boys, I’ve got to be moving on. Don’t drink too much of that brew. We need you two sharp for tomorrow. You boys get a good night’s sleep for a good day’s work tomorrow.” Captain Brogan said as he handed the cup back to Private Williams and started to walk away.
“Thank you, sir,” Private Williams said as he watched the captain and sergeant disappear into the darkness. 
*	*	*	*
	The freshly lit kerosene lamp burnt brightly on the desk that Captain Brogan was writing on. He had just broken into a pace as he dispatched paperwork prior to the next day’s fight. The captain’s concentration was broken by his orderly who threw back the flap of the captain’s tent.
“Captain, Private Greene requests a minute of your time. I told him you were busy, but I thought I’d check with you,” Captain Brogan’s orderly, Corporal Joshua Burns, said.
“That’s okay corporal see him in,” Captain Brogan replied.
Captain Brogan buttons the collar of his uniform. The orderly returned with the Private Greene. They both saluted after they entered the tent.
“Private Greene, Sir,” Corporal Burns said.
The captain returned their salute.
“That’s all corporal,” Captain Brogan said. The orderly left and Private Greene remained at attention. The private was visibly nervous.
“Thank you for seeing me sir.”
“At ease private, it is just us. What’s on your mind?” The captain asked.
“I just can’t stop thinking I am going to die tomorrow,” Private Greene said quietly.
“What makes you think you’re going to die?” 
“I don’t know, sir. I just got a feeling. I can’t stop my bones from clicking.” 
“You’re new aren’t you?” 
“Yes sir. We are what’s left of my unit after the battle at Ruthersford Farm.” 
“Don’t worry, son. It won’t be anything like that. You stick close to me and you’ll be back complaining about the chiggers by dinner, guaranteed,” Captain Brogan said punctuating his assurance with a smile.
“Really sir!”
“Now go back to your tent and get a good night’s sleep. We’ll be starting early tomorrow.” 
“Thank you, Sir.” 
The private saluted and turned to leave. Captain Brogan went back to writing.
“And Greene, you might want to stop by Private Daniels and have some of his coffee,” Captain Brogan said as he wrote.
Private Green turned to face the captain.
“Sir, won’t that keep me awake?”
“Not the way he makes it,” Captain Brogan said and smiled to himself as the private exited his tent.

 

Chapter 3 – Cassiopeia’s Longing for Home
	The duet that she played with Rene came to a sudden halt when she missed her entrance after his brief solo. She played a dissonant chord that strangled the sweet sound that had come from her piano. She stood up and walked from the parlor to the balcony of her studio apartment. The railing was wet from a soaking rain from the storm that was breaking up. The storm’s clouds still sprinkled the last of its deluge as she looked west at the setting sun that appeared through jagged breaks in the clouds. On the street below the filth that coated the avenues of 1864 Paris had been thoroughly washed away. Cassie placed her hands on the wet railing and stared toward the setting sun lost in thought.
	Rene, after taking time to put his flute and cello away, stepped out on the balcony and stood at a distance behind her waiting for the right moment to speak. He looked up and watched the clouds as they moved hurriedly across the sky as though they were trying to escape the onslaught of the sun. Cassie stood with her hands on the balcony frozen in position. Rene cleared his throat to get her attention. She turned her head to look back at him, but she still did not speak.
	“I hate to see you like this.”
	“I hate being like this. I ruined a whole afternoon of practice for you. .  . I am sorry,” she said and turned her head back around to stare at the sun.
	“Come inside. We’ll have some cognac and talk. There’s a chill out here.” 
	Cassie sighed before she turned and walked toward Rene. He reached out to greet her as she approached. He took her hand in his and they walked together back into the apartment to the parlor. She sat on the Chaise Lounge. He stepped out of the room and poured two glasses. He returned with the glasses, handing her one, and sat down next to her with his. He watched her, as she sipped her drink, admiring the lines of her silhouetted face made by the setting sun.
	“I have never been like this before,” she said resting her half full glass on her knee.
	“I wish you would tell me what it is that bothers you.”
	“It is just foolish that’s all.”
	“What is?”
	“What bothers me.”
	“How could I think that if you don’t tell me?”
	A brief smile moved across her face like a wisp of smoke. It quickly disappeared and was followed by her taking another sip. After swallowing, she took a deep breath and looked at Rene with tears that welled up in her eyes.
	“It has been wonderful here. With you and everyone else, but. . .”
	“But?”
	“I must return.”
	“Return! Why. Is it money?”
	“No, it’s not that. I am quite comfortable.”
	“Then what?” 
	She closed her eyes and the tears in her eyes rolled down her cheeks. “I must go back home.”
	“Home? But there is war there! I am sure your family would rather have you stay here where it is safe. Why would you want to return?”
	“Their letters,” she said pointedly and then paused to regain her composure. “Their letters tell me that something is wrong.”
	“What is wrong?”
	“I don’t know?”
	“Then why worry?”
	“Because Twenty Elms is my home, it is what makes me, me. I cannot sit in some salon or at a banquet here while my family may be subject to privations. You’ve read the stories about the sieges”
	“What makes you think they are suffering?”
	“Their letters speak of things that the papers and other things I have seen and heard contradict.”
	“What do you mean?”
	Cassie stared briefly into Rene’s eyes before slowly lowering her head and shifted her gaze to the cushion of the lounge. It was a long minute before she spoke again.
	“The news of the war is now mixed for our side,” she said at almost a whisper. She then stood up and walked across the room to turn on the gas lights in the parlor. “But my father writes as though the Yankee’s are about to sue for peace,” she finished adjusting the intensity of light in the room and walked back over to the lounge and sat down. “He has not written about my brothers Marcus or Randolph for months though I constantly inquire about them,” she paused again, lost in a thought. “That is not like him.”
	“What do you think it means?”
	“I don’t know, but it worries me. I’ve seen the photographs from America showing the dead on the battlefield. It was a horror. How can men go at each other like that?” Again she paused. Rene could see the fire from the chandelier’s wicks burn in her blue green eyes. Her worried expression hardened to one of anger. “Men are fools.”
	“There are many kinds of men, and many kinds of fools,” he replied and tried to reach out to touch her shoulder. She pulled away from him.
	“I’m not one of your women.”
	“You’re upset. I wanted to console you,” he said as he withdrew his arm.
	“I don’t need to be consoled. I need to go home,” she said as she stood up and walked over to the piano.
	“If you go home, what will you do there?”
	“I don’t know,” she paused again and thought. “I’ll do what’s need to be done.”
	“And what is that?”
	“I don’t know, but I do know that staying here and sipping coffee by the Seine no longer feels right. Sometimes it makes my skin crawl.”
	“I don’t understand you mon ami. Just last week, you were saying how stupid your countrymen were because they were at war. Do you think that your appearance there will bring peace?”
	“It’s not about me,” she snarled.
	“Forgive me. I am just trying to understand you. I had no idea you felt so strongly about these things.”
	Cassie sighed deeply and walked back over to the lounge and sat down. “I find being here, in my happiness, unbearable.”
“It is war. Perhaps war of the worst kind, when men feel as though they are driven by the will of God,” Rene gently placed his hand over hers that rested on the cushion of the lounge. “How will you get back? There is the blockade.”
“I don’t know. There are so many things that keep me here, but I believe more draw me back home.”
“If you go, there will be much to do. And, of course, you cannot go alone.”
*	*	*	* 
At the front of the train, the steam engine panted steam and belched smoke as it was being made ready for its journey. The line of connected passenger cars trailed from the engine back into the darkness of the train shed. It was a particularly bright and clear day at the station. Ladies paraded along the platform’s length wielding their parasols as they moved from passenger car to passenger car either boarding or wishing travelers Bon Voyage on their trip to the coast. Cassie and Rene, dressed in their finest traveling apparel, hurried along the platform searching for their compartment. They were followed by an entourage of their friends. Upon finding their compartment, the door was opened and a lengthy series of goodbyes, punctuated with hugs, tears, laughter, and kisses, were shared until the driver wheels of the steam engine began to spin against the rails tugging the train forward. They hurriedly got into their compartment and closed the door. Even then, Cassie and Rene hung out of the window of their compartment, waving goodbye as the train continued to move forward, until their friends shrank into colored dots on the now distant station platform.
The two sat back into their seats, flushed and perspiring, catching their breath and allowing the rush of thoughts and emotions to settle. The wind from the open window whipped around the compartment and brought welcomed relief to the two travelers. Out the window, the cityscape soon changed to country landscape as the train made its way to Dieppe. They remained silent for quite some time taking in the scenery that danced before them like an ever changing Impressionist landscape. Rene would sneak glances of Cassie noticing a long absent look of tranquility on her face. With each glance, he would smile and look back out the window. The rhythmic sounds and gentle sway of the train gently rocked the two of them and, like children in a bassinet, were soon fast asleep.
*	*	*	* 
The next morning, Cassie and Rene waited in a café drinking coffee while their ferry took on coal. High clouds obscured the sunlight blurring the line between shadow and light. The humidity added to the sullen and oppressive air of the day that was intermittently relieved by a breeze off of the channel. In their separate hotel rooms, neither Cassie nor Rene slept well which was reflected in long silences between them as they drank their coffee. 
“When we get to Liverpool I have arranged some meetings with my contacts about our journey in America,” Rene said taking on an even more somber expression. “Are you sure. . .”
“Yes, I am sure.”
“What is the matter,” Rene asked sitting back in his seat and looked Cassie in the eye. Cassie stared back at him. Her stern expression softened.
“I’m not being much of a traveling companion am I?” She said forcing a smile. “This is all very disruptive. I feel as though I am dragging you along into something unpleasant that I should be doing myself.”
“Don’t think that. I am with you because I want to be.”
“But why? We are not lovers, and I do not expect my feelings for you to change, especially now.”
“I do not expect us to be lovers,” Rene paused and took a sip of coffee. “You are my dear friend. It is an emotion that is quite novel for me to feel towards a woman, but I think, to love you as I would want to love a woman would be too much work. You are headstrong, opinionated, and sometimes moody. You speak your mind and are entirely too honest to make a tryst between us any fun, but the things that keep me from being your lover are those that also most attract me to you.”
Cassie smiled shyly. “But I do fear for you. I am not sure what I am getting myself into and have no wish to involve you.”
“You flatter yourself. I am doing this much more for me than you. How many books can you read before one’s conversation becomes well, tiresome? But to have a real life adventure with the likes of you will generate stories that can be told over and over.”
Cassie gave Rene another weak smile then looked down. “There’s more to this than you know.”
“What?”
Cassie looked up before she spoke “There’s more to this than you know.”
“What more can there be? You have told me that you wish to be with your family. It is reason enough for me. Besides, I have my own reasons for accompanying you.”
“But with you with me, I fear what would happen if I lose heart.”
“What are you saying? You do not want to go?”
“No, but I have other reasons for going. Reasons that I have been keeping to myself, and now that we are here, I don’t feel its right to keep them from you.”
“Go on.”
“I have told you many times about my memories of Twenty Elms. About the beautiful memories I have of the privilege and graciousness of home. The barbeques, singing slaves, cotillions, and fancy dress balls,” Cassie paused but Rene nodded anxiously urging her to continue. “When I was young, five I believe, I was taken by a woman they said had a fever of sorts. She was poor, and I remember, when I was with her, being hungry and cold and afraid that I would never see my mother and father again. What I really remember is crying and crying. It felt like I cried for the entire two weeks she had me. They caught her eventually, but that feeling has never left me. Before then, I thought everyone, except the darkies, lived as we did. I didn’t know what poverty was. That time in my life has haunted me ever since, and the thought that my family may be going through something like that has gnawed at me the entire time I lived in Paris. The news of the war has made it worse, unbearable.”
“I am sorry you had to have such an experience at such a young age.”
“But you see now why I act as I do.”
“I do, but I believe such thing give those who experience them an inner strength that they are not aware of.”
“I hope you are right,” she said just before the ferry’s steam whistle blew.
“We should go,” Rene said, stood up and reached out to take Cassie’s hand. She looked up at him gave him a long warm smile before she got up from her seat to go with him to the ferry.
*	*	*	* 
Liverpool was unusually hot and seemed a world away from their more familiar Paris. The city itself appeared to exist for the industrial revolution alone. There were factories everywhere. Most of them spewed thick clouds of smoke into the air; they would gather and hang low over the city blocking direct sunlight from reaching the city’s inhabitants. When the air was stagnant, breathing quickly became an unwelcome labor. Workhorses and other beasts of burden had to be handled gingerly for fear they might be overwhelmed by the thick air. Clouds of smoke would drift around the streets like phantoms looking for victims to engulf. Those who could: remained inside; those who could not: waited for relieve from mother earth who, in her good time, would regularly blow the suffocating smoke away. Cassie and Rene spent the time waiting for their ship to sail, by reading, taking trips into the countryside, and meeting Rene’s various contacts who, like the phantom clouds of smoke, appeared and disappeared without any knowledge of where they came from or where they were headed.
On their return from a particularly pleasant trip to the country, Cassie and Rene were headed to their rooms to freshen up. Rene, as a part of his arrival ritual, would briefly stop at the front desk to check for messages, and, as usual, Cassie waited in the lobby.
On his approach to the front desks, the expression on the face of the concierge changed from its usual calm to a look of controlled alarm. The concierge gestured for Rene to meet him at an unoccupied space of the counter. Rene approached and placed his hands against the edge of the counter unconsciously bracing himself for whatever news that he was about to receive.
“There is a Fedders to see you, sir,” the concierge said leaning in to speak as confidentially as possible.
“What is a Fedders?” Rene asked leaning away uncomfortable with the stranger’s proximity.
“Not what, sir, who. He is a man, he calls himself Fedders.”
“You mean Mister Fedders.”
“No, I tried that, sir, and was rebuffed most directly. I suggest you not try. He wishes to be called Fedders and requested that I direct you to him immediately upon your return.”
“Fine, send a boy and tell him I will be down directly.”
“Sir, I was instructed to direct you to him without delay. He is in the Tennyson number two sitting room,” the concierge said in a voice that teetered somewhere between a command and a plea. He lifted his left hand and in a wide sweeping motion pointed it toward the sitting room where Fedders was waiting.
Rene’s stare challenged that of the concierge. “I have a lady friend who is waiting for my immediate return,” the concierge lowered his hand.
“I’ll have a boy notify her of your delay. What’s the lady’s name?”
“Jefferson, Cassie Jefferson,” Rene stared at him one last time before he walked down the hall to meet his waiting guest.
The sitting room was dark when Rene entered. It was illuminated only by shafts of light that seeped in through the half opened slats of the shuttered windows and light from the door that Rene had just opened. It illuminated a young boy dressed in clothes that were in tatters. He sat in a large arm chair upholstered in red leather. The boy sat up with a start and stared at Rene like an alerted watchdog. At the same time, a large cloud of smoke came from the chair whose back was to Rene and the door.
“Is it him Beacon?” The question came from deep raspy voice from behind the chair. The boy nodded. “Come in Monsieur Bellamy, sit, we have business to discuss,” continued the voice from behind the chair. Another large cloud of smoke was pushed into the air from behind the chair. When the smoke reached Rene he recognized that it was the smoke from a particularly fine cigar. Its quality and aroma enticed Rene to cautiously enter the semi-dark room.
“Do we have to sit in the dark?” Rene complained as he reached the side of a chair that sat perpendicular to both the boy and the man.
“Beacon, door,” the man said abruptly. The boy jumped from his seat and had the door closed almost as quickly as the command was uttered. He returned to his seat just as quickly. With the light of the corridor staunched, Rene’s eyes adjusted to the room’s light and shapes that were shadows began to show more definition. Rene slowly sat down in the chair that he stood next to and the man in the chair leaned forward and turned toward Rene. “In my business, careful is rule number one. It is how I earned the respect of my customers and cohorts,” he paused to puff his cigar. “Normally, I would retire from doing business with your sort, but when Adrianne Bonhomme vouches for them, well then that changes things. What is it that I can do for you?” asked the stout man with great beard.
“Well, I . . . I mean we were hoping to make our way from here to a city in the American South and were looking for some assistance along the way.”
The expression the large man’s face darkened. He puffed his cigar. As he puffed, his expression softened to one of serious concern. “What would the likes of you want to go to a place like that at a time like this?” He asked in a deep, gravelly, barely discernible voice.
“She is from the city of Corinth in the Republic of Mississippi and wishes to return to be with her family in their time of need,” Rene replied sitting forward hoping to get a better look at the man. The man in the chair sat back in his seat and continued to puff his cigar the smoke obscuring his face from Rene.
“Does she know what she is asking?”
“I test her resolve at every opportunity, and, as best as I can tell, it is steadfast.”
 “And what is your part in this?”
“She is my dear friend, and I cannot let her do this alone.”
“Alone?” Fedders laughed long and hard. Rene waited for him to finish. All the while, the gaze of boy, Beacon, patrolled the doors and windows as though he could see through them to the other side. Eventually, Fedders laugh subsided.
“Have either of you seen war? I mean modern war.”
“I’ve seen the photographic exhibits.”
Fedders leaned forward again and turned to look at Rene. He looked Rene up and down. “What do you think Beacon?” Fedders asked as the boy glanced at Rene and shrugged his shoulders. 
“They won’t sell you out, and as long as they pay in advance. . .”
“Sharp boy that Beacon, he’ll be quite the business man in his time.”
“So you will help?”
“Against my better judgment, yes. But it will cost you, Sovereigns and lots of them. What you ask will not be easy, even for the likes of me,” Fedders said and sat back in his chair. “We’ll be in touch with you in a couple of days, but I suggest in the mean time you teach the woman to handle a pistol. It will come in handy where you’re going”
“What for? I hardly think that it would be necessary,” Rene replied.
“She’ll need to know how to protect herself; you’re not going to a garden party.”
“Indeed.”
“Now, if you’ll excuse us, we have other business to attend to. Beacon, open the door for the man,” Fedders said to the boy who jumped from his chair and, with the stealth of a burglar, opened the door. He then gestured with his head indicating that it was okay for Rene to leave.

 

Chapter 4 – Day and Night
	The Cunard lines SS. Persia steamed into New York harbor with the wheels of her side paddles churning water with the same ease as they did when they left Liverpool. The three masts cut the city’s skyline into a triptych for those who saw her steam up river from the shore. The smoke of her funnel trailed behind. Many of the ship’s passengers crowded the deck for their first view of America. To their right was the view of Brooklyn, the mouth of the East River and the Battery. To their left, was Jersey City lined with factories and docks. Cassie followed Rene to the deck’s railing as the ship entered the Hudson headed to a berth on the city’s West Side. Cassie squeezed in next to Rene at and stared at the shoreline with indifference. “I suppose we speak French from here on until we are in friendlier territory,” she said and grabbed her hat to prevent a wind gust from carrying it off.
	“You are all Americans. It will all work out in the end,” Rene said as he squeezed her arm reassuringly just above the elbow. He let go and turned around to face Cassie and leaned against the railing. “But I do believe we should follow Fedder’s instructions to the letter,” he added and stood up straight. “Come let us finish packing so we can be on our way as quickly as possible.”

	Cassie took a last look back at the steamship after she entered the taxi followed by Rene. At over 300 feet long, and with two large side paddle wheels, the ocean going vessel was an impressive sight. Cassie’s lingering stare reminded her that every look back meant a step forward into an uncertain future. Drawing on her resolve, she took a deep breath and turned her head to look forward just as the horse started off. They headed for the ferry to cross over to the New Jersey side and meet with Fedder’s first contact. Their cab ride was a silent one. Cassie stared blankly forward while Rene looked from side to side taking in the sights that the New York City waterfront had to offer. By this time, he had come to accept Cassie’s silences and remained silent until she felt the need to speak. He would look at her trying to surmise what thoughts lay behind her facial expression. When he wasn’t thinking about Cassie he focused on reshaping his own thoughts for the journey ahead. His brief conversations with Cassie during the crossing about what life was like in America were heavily weighted by her privilege. When he tried to press her about what she remembered about a man’s perspective she became irritable. Frustration gnawed at him like a nagging ache. He knew that he could not be too inquisitive with the fellow passengers for fear of raising suspicions.

	They crossed the Hudson to Jersey City on a ferry run by one of the railroads, and took a taxi to the residence of the Gerald and Miriam Grimes. It was late afternoon and the sun was just above the rooftops of the townhouses on the Hudson Street address that Fedders had given them. Rene paid the taxi driver and asked him to wait. He stepped from the taxi absentmindedly fondling the lion’s head medallion that was given them and, when presented, would provide them entry into the home of a local who was sympathetic to their cause. As peculiar as Fedders was, he did have a way of instilling trust in his word. Rene walked up the stairs to the door of the townhouse and rang the bell. The door was answered promptly by a swarthy balding man with a prominent and crooked nose. It appeared to have been knocked out of joint on several occasions and never set straight. 
	“Gerald Grimes?” Rene asked.
	“And if I am?” The man at the door asked.
	“I was told to show you this,” Rene responded and discreetly pulled the medallion out of his pocket so the man could see it.
	“Are you alone?” The man asked looking over Rene’s shoulder at the taxi with a serious expression on his face.
	“No, the woman is with me.”
	“And the driver?”
	“We hired him just for the ride from the ferry.”
	“Very well then, give us a minute to prepare a space for you. It’s unusual for Fedders to send people unannounced.”
	“He mentioned that. We were in a hurry and our ship would have arrived as fast as any letter.”
	“Have the boy leave your luggage by the sidewalk. We’ll bring it in ourselves and talk more inside. I don’t like talking business in the street.”
	Rene turned and walked back toward the taxi to follow the instructions he was given. Gerald closed the door with a force just short of a slam. After helping Cassie out of the taxi, Rene had their luggage placed on sidewalk and they waited for the Gerald to return. After a quarter of an hour, Gerald reappeared and let his unexpected house guests in. Gerald’s assistance with the luggage was to hold the door open as Rene carried it from the curb to inside the house. After all the luggage was inside, Gerald closed the door.
	“You can leave your luggage here. You won’t be here that long. We’ve prepared a room for you upstairs. You should go up now, keep quiet and wait until we call for you. We can talk about what we need to do for you later on,” Gerald said and walked away without waiting for a response or entertaining questions. After the first class service they received on the ship, their host’s attitude came as a shock and left them both speechless until he disappeared down the hall. Rene’s impulse was to laugh, which was an urge he suppressed because of the look on Cassie’s face.
	“I guess the deluxe service leg of this trip has come to an end,” Rene said with a raised eyebrow. “It had to happen at some point. Its better we get used to it sooner rather than later,” he added lifting one of the smaller pieces of luggage. “Fedders was right about how we should pack our things. This is all I think we’ll need for tonight,” Rene said as he started up the stairs followed by Cassie.

	After a simple and unceremonious breakfast of oatmeal, bacon, and coffee, the breakfast dishes were cleared and the shades of the townhouse’s parlor were drawn. The dining room’s gaslight chandelier was lit to illuminate the Colton’s railroad maps that had been spread out over the room’s table. Gerald Grimes lit a cigar and left it in an ashtray to burn making the stuffy room even more uncomfortable. Both he and Rene leaned over the table and began to examine the maps closely. Gerald stopped when he realized that Cassie was still in the room.
“This is man’s work. Why don’t you go into the kitchen and strike up a conversation with Miriam,” Gerald said as he stood upright. An uncomfortable moment passed while Cassie decided whether to respect the request. Cassie sighed then unceremoniously turned and walked into the kitchen. Gerald stared at Rene briefly before he started to lean back over the map.
“It will be European attitudes like that that will create trouble for you two. I shouldn’t had to have told her that. She should have known, and if she didn’t, you should have told her,” Gerald said pointing his finger at Rene as he spoke. He then returned to surveying the map.
“See, you can ride the railroads almost to the Kentucky Tennessee border. Certainly as far as Louisville,” he said and began traced the line of travel with his finger from start to end. “I figure it might take you a week, ten days at the most.”
“That long?” Rene replied as he watched Gerald’s finger move over the map. Gerald’s expression darkened annoyed by Rene’s response.
“The nation is at war. You’ll have, I don’t know how many train and railroad changes. These things take time,” Gerald said and paused to puff his cigar. “It beats walking,” he added with the cigar locked between his teeth.
“Yes, yes it does,” Rene responded realizing the effect of his response.
“Here, get me that stack of schedules over there, and we can work out just about how long,” Gerald said taking a few more puffs of the cigar before he put it back in the ashtray. Rene stepped over to a nearby table where there was a stack of railway schedules.
“Have you tried Cuban’s?” Rene asked as he handed Gerald one of the stacks of schedules.
“Cuban what?” Gerald responded as he flipped through the stack of folded schedules.
“Cigars, they are quite fine. You’d find them slightly sweeter and a little more aromatic than what you currently smoke,” Rene added as he watched Gerald.
“Smoke American,” he replied. “And it would be a good idea for you to start,” he added as he turned and reached for his smoldering cigar. He stuffed it in his mouth between his teeth and cheek and puffed it enthusiastically. “This cigar is half of what this war is about. Who cares how they treat the niggers that pick the tobacco. These abolitionists, they care enough to tell someone else how to treat them but not enough to buy their own to coddle. If this goes badly for the South I might be out a lot of money,” Gerald said plaintively. Rene coughed as the air thickened with smoke. “The smoke bother you?” Gerald asked as Rene retreated from the room.
“No, I just have to use the latrine,” Rene said as he entered the kitchen on his way to the outhouse. Gerald could be heard from the dining room laughing heartily.

The next morning Cassie and Rene were directed to go to the Newark Junction railroad station the point at which they were to begin their train ride to Lexington Kentucky. In Lexington, they were to meet with a Mister Gilbert Chaime who would be willing, and available to provide them transportation further south. They were also given a leather pouch that contained railroad schedules, maps, and instructions regarding their use to reach their destination. Neither breakfast nor help getting the luggage from the house to the taxi was offered by their hosts. The goodbye was short and consisted of the exchange of ten gold sovereigns for the Grime’s assistance and hospitality. Upon reaching the train station, it was found that a dozen American cigars were in the pouch with the other travel documents. The cigars were, no doubt, a parting gift.
The rail accommodations seemed Spartan in comparison to what they experienced in Europe. There was only coach seating on the trains, and the seats were wooden benches not the high backed cushion compartments that they expected for at least some part of the journey. Their rail trip was filled with confusion, contemptuous rail workers, and slow moving trains that progressed on a schedule much slower than was printed. When they arrived in Lexington Kentucky, Rene insisted upon spending three days at the finest hotel in town before moving on. As annoyed as Cassie was with the delay, she could not help but concede to his demand because even she welcomed the respite.
During their three day stay, Rene had several complaints. First, and foremost of his complaints was the heat and humidity of high summer that neither of them expected or accounted for as a factor. Second, he complained, only to Cassie, about the treatment of the slaves, and third, he complained about the food and how he found it difficult to digest. His concern about the slaves did not go so far as to prevent him from having a boy sent up to fan him while he slept, but Cassie had to intervene and remind her traveling companion not to tip the boy. His concern about the treatment of the slaves prevented him from walking the streets of the city for concern of their being an incident that would expose his sentiments. Cassie was quick to remind him that he was now in a time and place where actions replaced words. The two travelers spent most of their time lounging at their hotel gathering their strength for the final leg of their journey. Being so close to home Cassie was in unusually good spirits.

They met Mister Gilbert Chaime quite by accident on the night prior to their planned visit. Mister Chaime had come into town to discuss some business at the court house and had stopped at the hotel bar to have a drink. The two men happened to strike up a conversation quite by accident and Rene was quite surprised when his acquaintance introduced himself. Rene quickly, but discreetly, displayed the talisman that Fedders had provided them for their journey. The expression on Chaime’s face changed from jovial to quite serious. He led Rene to a quiet area in the hotel lobby.
“What is it you need from me?” Gilbert Chaime asked.
“We wish to reach Corinth from here. Can you help us?” Rene replied in a whisper.
Gilbert Chaime paused to think before he responded. “I will need a day before I can do anything for you. I have business here in town. While I am here I would appreciate it if you kept our acquaintance to yourself and I prefer us not be seen together again.”
“Of course,” Rene responded.
“Then until the day after tomorrow,” Gilbert Chaime said then turned and left the hotel. Rene, intrigued by Gilbert Chaime’s response, went upstairs to his room to inform Cassie of what just happened.

Cassie and Rene met Gilbert Chaime in the livery stable as they were instructed. His plan was novel. Cassie and Rene were to dress up as slaves and he was to drive them south in his wagon. Cassie, anxious to get home did not question Gilbert’s plan and Rene was unaware of its full implications. With faces painted with axel grease, hair from the wool of a black sheep, and tattered old clothes retrieved from Chaime’s own slaves the two were dressed and rode away on the back of a wagon driven by Chaime. Chaime’s himself was dressed as a not so well off farmer. Cassie and Rene sat amongst the bales of hay so only their heads and shoulders were exposed. They made good time from Lexington Kentucky south toward Nashville and beyond traveling twenty-five sometimes thirty miles in a day. Once they made it passed Savannah Tennessee and crossed the Tennessee river it looked as though all that was left was the day’s ride into Corinth.
It wasn’t until they crossed a bridge over a creek that they had their first confrontation. That was when the trouble started. There was a man, a traveling merchant by his appearance, whose wagon was stuck in a rut and his one horse was unable to pull the wagon out so they could cross the bridge. It wasn’t really Rene’s fault. He did not know any better and no one told him that slaves don’t stare at white men in distress, but when Rene and his traveling partners cleared the bridge Rene stared at the merchant who was stuck. The frustrated merchant saw Rene, in black face, stare at him. That was when the merchant called out to Chaime telling him to stop his wagon. Chaime kept moving pretending not to hear the man, but the man gave chase and Chaime, not wanting to cast any suspicion stopped.
“Hey, hey, I need your nigger,” the merchant said wiping his brow with his soaking wet handkerchief.
“What?” Chaime responded trying to sound annoyed by the request.
“I need your nigger. This ain’t no work for a white man and you have that big old strapping boy in the back of your wagon. I just need him to push my wagon out of a rut. It won’t take long,” the merchant said taking a more conciliatory tone.
“I don’t think I can let you use him . . . ,” Chaime replied.
“You don’t think? What kind of a white man are you?” The merchant asked starting to become annoy.
“The kind that keeps his slaves to do his own work,” Chaime replied.
“Perhaps this will help you in your decision,” the merchant said as he pulled out a revolver and pointed it at Chaime. “Now get your nigger down off of the wagon so he can help me.”
Rene and Cassie looked on with some concern. She was afraid to speak fearing that her voice would give her away. Instead, she gestured to Rene to get down; Rene reluctantly climbed off of the wagon and started walking back toward the wagon that was stuck. It was all wrong and the merchant knew it. Rene’s boots were too new for a slave to be wearing. He walked with his back straight and his shoulders back. He looked too proud. His last mistake was that he turned around and looked the merchant directly in the eye. The merchant shot Rene like he was shooting a rabid dog. He was hit in the chest and fell immediately. Cassie shrieked and the merchant turned around to see Chaime with a revolver pointed at him. Chaime shot the merchant in the head. The merchant died immediately. Cassie and Chaime ran to Rene who was still breathing, but his breathing was labored. They carried him back to the wagon and left the scene.
“Don’t worry, I know someone who is nearby who can help,” Chaime said looking back at Cassie and appearing visibly disturbed by what happened. It was thirty minutes of bumpy road before Chaime turned the wagon into the drive of Doctor Silas Pratt.
Doctor Pratt lived in a modest home on the road between Savannah and Corinth. Chaime knew that he would attend to anyone, even slaves. So when Gilbert Chaime arrived at Doctor Pratt’s home he felt sure that their problems would be resolved. The doctor had been napping when Gilbert knocked at his door. He walked out, took one look at Rene and pronounced him dead. Cassie was devastated and clung to Rene’s body. Chaime finally convinced her that Rene’s body should be removed from the wagon so he could go back and attend to the body of the merchant to avoid any further suspicion. The dust of Chaime’s wagon as it moved down Doctor Pratt’s driveway was the last Cassie ever saw of Gilbert Chaime.
Doctor Pratt waited inside for Cassie to finish mourning over Rene’s body. It was not until late in the night did he hear her knock at the door as he sat in his parlor reading a book by lantern light. He let her in and led her to a chair near his and sat her down. She sat and stared at the light of the lantern. Finally, Doctor Pratt spoke.
“The Lord has him now. There’s nothing you can do,” he said as gently as possible. Cassie nodded slowly in acknowledgement. “Do you have someplace safe you can go or would you like to stay here?”
“How far are we from Corinth? Cassie asked barely audible.
“Oh, I’d say about a good fifteen miles.”
“Do you have a horse I can borrow?” She asked in a whisper.
“No,” the doctor said shaking his head. “They’ve taken all of my livestock.”
Cassie looked up toward a corner of the room. Do you have some place I can clean myself up,” she asked and started to get up from her chair. The doctor led her to his office where he had soap to help her wash the paint off of her face. When she was done, she walked back into the parlor. The doctor had fallen asleep; she watched him as he rested peacefully. She put out the lantern next to him and walked out of the door and down his drive on her way to Corinth on foot.

 

Chapter 5 – Cassie’s Lost Cause
	Cassie, rarely ever having walked beyond the boundaries of 20 Elms, never noticed how rough the terrain was around her home. The last league of her walk home seemed an eternity made worse by the recent loss of Rene. Tears mixed with sweat rolled down her face and into the scratches and scrapes she encountered as she walked through the bramble and brush of her home county. Her clothes fared no better; like her, they too were dirty and had been pulled, torn, and stretched in all directions. She had taken on the appearance of a war refugee and no longer subject to curious glances from passersby. Her appearance made her one with the war’s landscape and allowed her to move with the unquestioned ease of a fallen leaf through a forest.
	As evening fell, her thoughts were a debate over whether she should keep moving and reach home in the dark or stop and find refuge and complete her walk home in the light of day. At that moment, she felt so tired that if she were to fall asleep in some shelter that she would sleep for ever. It became an enticing thought. The only thing that kept her moving was the idea of reaching home, sleeping in a bed with clean sheets, a pillow, and the safety of being home not having to stir at every little sound. The debate raged in her mind as she kept moving. Every step she made that brought her closer to home was another reason not to stop until she reached her destination.
	She found other reasons to keep moving as she continued walking. Every so often, like smelling salts, she would come across a small plot of hastily dug graves of war dead, or she would encounter the decomposing or decomposed corpse of a man, horse, or mule. The smell was haunting and the sight a vivid warning of the danger that existed all around her. Each time, she was reminded that home was the only truly safe place to rest. The forest stank of the conflict that surrounded her and everyone else in the county. The lingering stench of death was enough to give her the strength to keep putting one foot in front of the other until she reached the long drive that lead up to the manor house at Twenty Elms. 

	Full darkness had descended around Cassie after the moon had set. It gave her the confidence to walk the road knowing that no one could approach her without her noticing them first. The silhouette from the side of the road was that of trees and bushes against a starry sky. It was darkness against an even greater darkness. Her eyelids felt as though they were being drawn together by an ever increasing magnetism, but there was no stopping now. It was too dark to just stop and fall asleep beneath a tree and the sting of the scratches and scrapes that pinched at her helped keep her awake.
	The numbness of fatigue set in until she felt a familiar roughness of brick that her senses full returned to her. She felt an electric current flowed through her body and reached out with both hands to touch the bricks of the wall. She strained her eyes to validate what she thought she was feeling, the bricks of the wall at Twenty Elms. Darkness confounded her, but her energy returned. She groped along the length wall snagged, from time to time, by a seemingly familiar bush that reinforced her belief that she was where she thought she was. After stumbling several times in blind haste, she finally came to the large wrought iron gate that told her she was home. An unexpected sob of joy and relief briefly overcame her before she felt her way around the gate that she realized no longer sat on its hinges. Finding the end of the gate, she walked around it and started down the drive to the manor house. Exhaustion prevented her from running, but desire made her feel as though she were flying. She cleared the crest of the first hill and came round the corner with full expectation to see the lights on in the manor house, but when she rounded the corner she was greeted by a completely unexpected sight. All that remained of the manor house were its two chimneys and even they leaned to one side in a state of precarious ruin. First she gasped, then she was overcome with the urge to cry, and finally the weight of her exhaustion hit her like a thick wooden club and she fainted. She lay there for some time while her body and mind recovered from the shock of her loss and effort of the journey.

	She awoke swatting at what she thought was a bug on her cheek. She was wrong. It was the cold steel of a gun barrel being cavalierly run across her face. She was still quite tired and it took a moment for the nature of her situation to fully register, but when it did, she went from sleep exhaustion to being fully alert. Her muscles tensed, and she twitched involuntarily suppressing the urge to run. She gathered her wits and the face of her captor came into focus. He was a large, rotund man with a ruddy complexion. He wore what she thought was a Confederate uniform that was filthy with an even dirtier dandy hat that had a large dark feather in it. His smile exposed rotting yellow-brown teeth stained with chewing tobacco that, even then, he chewed on. Cassie closed her eyes to focus her thoughts on escape.
	“Get up, no playing possum,” the man said as he slowly backed away from her to allow her to stand. Cassie opened her eyes and slowly stood up. Her muscles ached and were slow to respond. Loose dirt and leaves fell away as she stood. The captor looked her over once she was on her feet. “Looks like you seen some hard times lately,” he said making sure that he kept a good distance away from her. “Are you a refuge? They burn your home?” he asked.
	Cassie raised her downcast eyes up toward the tree line. “No.”
	“Then what are you doing out here sleeping in the dirt wearing tattered clothes?”
	“I . . . I . . . I am here visiting,” she said looking the man in the eye as if she were challenging him not to believe her.
	“Visiting? Visiting who? There ain’t nothing out here but weeds and destruction. Look around you woman. If you are going to lie you need to have a better one than that,” he said backing away from Cassie another step. “You need to tell me something that will stop me from shooting you and leave you for the crows.” 
	“I can only tell you the truth.”
	“Well, I don’t believe you and I don’t like being seen by strangers,” he paused and looked her over again. “Sheriff send you out here?”
	“No,” she said realizing that he was more frightened than she. “Why do you have to keep pointing that gun at me?”
	“It’s the times. Men who aren’t careful these days tend to catch a death of dead.”
	“You sound like you’re from these parts?”
	“I told you. I am here visiting. I came from Paris.”
	“Paris?” The man broke into a full bodied hoarse laugh. Cassie considered charging him and seizing his gun, but she thought better of it for fear that she’d lose if there were a struggle. She watched him as he continued to laugh still unsure whether she should accost him or run. Someone else provided an answer for her. A shot from a heavy rifle rang out and the man’s body jerked violently forward before it fell to the ground. He was dead. Blood and tobacco blackened saliva issued from his mouth. Cassie gasped in horror, put her hands over her mouth, and began to hyper ventilate. She thought that she might be next. She heard the sound of horses galloping toward her, but she was in too much shock to pay any real attention to what was happening.
	It wasn’t until the horsemen were right up on her that she was able to catch her breath and regain her composure. In front of her were four men on horseback that were circling the dead man as though he was the quarry of a hunt.
	“Corporal Pummet,” one of the men said as his horse hesitated moving to closer to the body.
	“Let me see,” said one of the horsemen who got off his horse, approached the body and turned it over. “My daddy’s captured revolver,” the young man said as he pulled the gun from the dead man’s hand and spit in his face with malice.
	“Whoa Lee. There’s a woman present,” one of the mounted rider said and looked down to smile at her.
	“Sorry Ma’am,” the young man said standing up and sticking the revolver he took from the dead man in the waist of his pants. “This man here is a thief, coward, and deserter. Who knows what he would have done if we had not of come upon y’all.”
	“I do appreciate your assistance, but could you not have wounded and restrained him?” Cassie asked.
	“He was a mad dog run amok. We did what had to be done ma’am. If you had known what he had done I believe you would be more sympathetic to our actions,” the young man said and turned to mount his horse.
	“And what about you ma’am, how do you come to be out here so early and in such condition?”
	“I was coming home to see my family,” Cassie said remembering what she had seen last night and trying hard to suppress the tearful sob that welled up inside. “This used to be my home.”	
	“You’re Randolph’s sister? He said that you were someplace safe from this? Why would you come back knowing what had happened here?”
	“I didn’t know what had happened,” Cassie replied as she ran her hand through her hair in frustration and to clear the dirt and leaves from the previous night. She sighed, looked back at what was left of the manor house and shook her head.
	“We’d rather not leave you out here alone ma’am,” said the horseman who was closest to her. “He’s not the only one of his kind roaming around out here. Let us give you a ride into town.”
	“Certainly,” she said and approached the horseman who had his arm extended to help her up on his horse. With one quick jerk she was on the horse with her hands on the waist of stranger. He urged the horse forward and the four men headed off toward the long besieged town of Corinth. Along the way, Cassie’s thoughts became a cacophony of confusion. Her intended purpose of going home to her family appeared to her as ashes. Her life in Paris, with the death of Rene, seemed like a childhood fantasy. Her return to such a life would make her seem, in her own mind, shallow and selfish, and there were recriminations for her not thinking how bad things could have gotten for the South and her family. All of these thoughts added up to one overriding question in her mind: what do I do now? As far as she was concerned, she might as well have been shipwrecked. In one moment, her life had lost all direction and purpose.

	The horseman had dropped her off at Cumberland Presbyterian Church. Its pastor, the Reverend Ezekiel Williams was a medium sized man with a face carved by lines from often used stern expressions. The lines presented themselves like tooled leather. They were worn and unyielding, but the sight of Cassie brought a seldom seen light of compassion to his eyes. He even sent for his wife and had her sit with Cassie in his office as he pondered how he could help the young woman that sat before him. Cassie’s expression of despair was one that he had seen many times before, but it was the depth of the disillusionment that touched him. He had trouble fathoming how anyone could be caught so off guard. He stood up from his desk and walked out of his office gesturing to his wife to follow. He stopped just outside and turned to his wife, Diana, in the hallway that led from his office to the pulpit.
	“I think it would be best if you talk to her first,” he said in a resonant whisper. The lines of his face masked the concern that showed in his eyes. His wife nodded in agreement. “Wait a while before you ask her anything. Let her get used to your presence. I doubt she’s thinking clearly and she might not be able to say what is really on her mind. But she should not be left alone right now.” 
Diane reached up and gently squeezed Ezekiel’s wrist before she turned and walked back into her husband’s office. She sat down in a chair near Cassie, gave her a warm smile, and started back at her needlepoint. Cassie stared blankly into space. As time passed, intermittently, a tear would roll down her face when she blinked. After an hour or so, Cassie was slumped over in her chair asleep. The reverend had some deacon’s lay some blankets down on a pew and had her carried from his office to her makeshift bed where she slept for the rest of the day into the next morning.

	Cassie drifted back into consciousness with the sensation of her face being gently caressed by coarse yet womanly fingers. Her eyes focused on her mother sitting on a chair beside where she slept. She tried to get up, but her mother’s firm hand restrained her.
	“Rest, my dear, I’ll be right here next to you. They told me how they found you,” her mother said and smiled at her daughter. At first there were tears that were followed by her having a long sobbing cry. Cassie’s mother held Cassie to her breast and hummed a hymn while at the same time shushing her. Cassie’s crying, like a steam valve, gradually released the emotions that overwhelmed her. There was a long silence after Cassie had finished crying. The two women held each other as though they had been grafted together. Eventually, the mother gently pushed Cassie away to look at her.
	“Why did you come back?” The mother asked with her hands on her daughter’s shoulders. The shadow of recent memories crossed Cassie’s face before she took a deep breath and said, “I had to,” she replied. A tide of consternation washed across her mother’s face mixed with flashes of shock and anger. “I would have sung for the devil to keep you away,” her mother said regaining her composure.
 	“I know,” Cassie replied in a whisper. “It was your letters that made me suspicious,” she added speaking up. “How could I believe what you were telling me when the newspapers, the pictures and lecturers contradicted you?”
	“You should have stayed in Paris where it was safe. Didn’t you think to turn back on your journey here?
	“I thought about it yes, but I had to know that you were all safe and well. If you wouldn’t tell me in your letters I had to see for myself.”
	“We were trying to protect you from what had happened.”
	“But not the doubt and worry of not knowing,” Cassie replied as if by reflex. “I never in my wildest dreams thought what happened could happen to us.”
	“But it has.”
	“And my brothers and father, what has happened to them?”
	“Your father has been missing since Chancellorsville, and your brothers are home, wounded by the war. You might not want to see them.”
	“Is it that bad?”
	“We lost everything in the fighting during the siege. Your father placed his entire faith and fortune in the Confederacy,” her mother said with her tone becoming more acid as she continued. “We now use Confederate script as kindling for our fires,” her mother paused to let her words sink in. “And stay here in town, living off of the charity of others,” she added then the two women sat not speaking for a while.
	“If I had ever thought the world could get turned this upside down, I would have got off while I was still happy.”
	“Mother no!” Cassie said shocked and horrified.
	“You have no idea what I have been through. My only hope was to keep you away from this, but now, here you are.”
	“I didn’t mean for this to hurt you. I was just worried.”
	“I know, I know, no one meant for any of this to happen. The war was supposed to last a few weeks or a couple of months at most. We were supposed to whip the Yankee’s and they were supposed to sue for peace and we could go on living like we were, but none of that happened. There was just war and more war. We knew about the fire that came with war, but no one ever mentioned that rot that lingers long after the fire goes out.”
	“Oh momma, I never meant to hurt you.”
	“I know my dear; it’s probably just the Lord’s way of punishing me for lying,” she replied and embraced her daughter. “I have to go now and tend to your brothers. I’ve been away from them too long. I’ll come back for you later,” she said and pulled away from Cassie, stood up and walked out of the church. Daylight briefly engulfed the interior of the church when her mother opened the door to leave. Cassie lay back down and went back to sleep.

	Cassie, after being rested, bathed, fed, and given fresh clothing, could not help but think what was in her head to want to come to such a place as she walked through the streets of Corinth with her mother. The results of the siege were everywhere. The street was lined with burnt buildings, shell craters, and the lingering odor of rot was everywhere. She was also anxious about seeing her brothers. She now realized that nothing could have adequately prepared her to see the fate of her family and home, and that the pictures and lectures that haunted her in Paris was only a mild tickle in comparison to the pain experienced when exposed to the reality. Between the smells of Corinth that pinched her nose she could smell the coffee from the Parisian cafés and the comparatively sweet smell of the River Seine.
	Her mother walked down an alley between two stores and up the stairs to a door on the second floor of one of the stores. The store had seen better days, the stairs were creaky and the wood planks of the building’s siding weather worn. At the top of the stairs, after clearing a missing step was a door that her mother unlocked and stepped through. Cassie followed her mother into a dark and musky room. Total darkness encompassed the room when her mother closed the door behind her daughter and groped her way across the room to another door. She opened it and the light of a single lantern dimly lit both rooms. 
Her mother looked back at her impatiently. “Come on,” she said to Cassie and disappeared into the room. Cassie cautiously followed her mother to the door. She gasped when she reached the doorway and could see inside the room. Her brother was draped across the bed, coated in sweat, wearing a dingy tee shirt and boxer shorts both of cotton, sleeping off a drunk. The room smelled of stale liquor, urine, and body odor. She slowly looked further into the room searching for her mother. She saw her leaned over whispering to a man, who stared out of a dirty window, seated in a wicker chair fitted with wheels. Cassie slowly stepped into the room, around her sleeping brother, and walked toward her mother. Her mother stepped back away from where she was. The man in the chair wheeled around in a single movement. Cassie gasped at the speed with which the man moved, and she was caught off guard by what she saw. It was her brother Randolph. He had lost both of his legs and had a mask over the right half of his face that concealed its deformity. He had grown his hair long so it hid part of the mask and some of the left side of his face.
	“Hello Cassie,” Randolph said as he wheeled the chair closer to her. It was obvious by his greeting that his wound impeded his ability to speak. When he was close enough, Randolph extended his hand for her to shake. Cassie instinctively jerked her body back. “It’s me, Randy. Don’t be afraid,” he said as best he could but sounded as though he only could use half of his tongue and lips. Cassie smiled and stepped forward to shake her brother’s hand, and, as an afterthought, leaned fully forward and hugged what was left of her brother. She held him so close that he had to push her away momentarily. “Not so hard,” he said and Cassie relaxed her embrace and continued her hug this time with more care. 
	“You need to let go Cassie, he’s still fragile,” her mother said. Cassie’s cheeks were moist when she stood up after the hug. She wiped them with the ball of her palm.
	“What have they done to you?” Cassie asked looking her brother Randy over. “Are you still in pain?”
	“He’s always in pain,” the mother answered. Doctor Floyd makes sure that he has plenty of cough Syrup. It dulls the pain and helps him sleep at night.”
	“I don’t need it all the time,” Randy interjected. “It’s just that sometimes I can still feel my legs even though they aren’t there anymore.”
	“Don’t believe him. He has nightmares too. He needs his syrup every day even though he tries to skip some. He’s just like his father, so stubborn until he’s foolish. When will men learn that’s why God put women on earth, to care for stubborn fools like him.”
	“Oh momma, you know Randy has always been difficult about taking medicine,” Cassie said smiling looking down at Randolph.
	“He needs to listen to me when I am taking care of him. I can’t be spending my entire day coaxing him to do something that he needs to do.”
	“Randy, you need to listen to mamma when she’s taking care of you. You’re grown now.”
	“Momma tells me you came all the way back from Paris to see us? Is that true? Are you going to stay? Or did you come to fight Yankees like I’ve been telling momma you would all this time?” Randolph said visibly exhausted by his effort.
	“I don’t know what I’m going to do,” Cassie replied sheepishly her eyes searched the room looking for a comfortable place to focus.
	“Your sister has to go now so you can get your rest now. You were up half the night tossing and turning with your dreams,” Cassie’s mother said as she walked across the room and grabbed her daughter’s hand to lead her out of the room. Cassie looked back at her brother to smile at him one last time before her mother’s grip pulled her out of the room into the darkness of the outer room. Cassie’s mother closed the door behind her and leaned against it.
	“War,” she said to Cassie under her breath. “As good as it is to see you; you should never have come back.”
	“I know momma, but I was worried. Your letters didn’t help. I had no idea of what was going on. They caused me to have great concerns.”
	“I now know that. I thought that by sending you the letters you would know that we were still alive and that would be enough for you. I didn’t think you would be able to sense our despair in the letters,” she said and looked down at her feet lost in thought. “In some ways, many ways, I am very proud of you. I read your letters many times thinking of the good time you were having and prayed that you would stay where you were. Seeing you see us like this makes me want to beat you like a field hand, but the joy, and hope you have brought prevents me,” she said looking up and staring into her daughter’s eyes. “Now that you are here, and know the suffering you can either go back to Paris, which I doubt you’ll do knowing you, or you can roll up your sleeves and help the cause.” 
	“Momma, you know I would never . . .”
	“Hush now, you know your brothers are my responsibility, but you are still young and there are others who have no mother or sister to hold their hand or wipe their brow in the darkness night. You need to think about them and leave your brothers to me. They are all I have now, and they are really the only thing that keeps me on this earth,” she added interrupting Cassie with tears forming up in her eyes as she spoke. Cassie took a moment to absorb what her mother said. She punctuated her thoughts were with a deep sigh and a smile.
	“Take care of my brothers,” Cassie said and gave her mother a long tight embrace. When the embrace ended, Cassie turned and walked back down the stairs without ever looking back at her mother who quietly reentered her room and closed the door.

	Reverend Williams was still in his office when Cassie returned from meeting with her family. When he heard the front door of the church shut, he closed the book he was reading and walked from his office into the sanctuary. He expected to meet a defeated soul, but he found a young woman that had a sullen but determined look on her face. He was even more surprise, but somewhat relieved, when she asked for a ride back to Doctor Pratt’s. She watched him close the church and walked quietly behind him to his buckboard where he helped her up and they started on their way out of town. Cassie took one last look at the store where her mother’s room was when she passed it on her out of town. She had now started down a path that of life was life truly a path on her own.
 

Chapter 6 – The Colonel’s Charge
	The twilight of the early morning slowly began to loosen the grip that darkness held as the soldiers on their horse formed into two separate companies. A thoughtful quiet filled the air of the fall morning. The soldiers, some sleepy, others lost in the thoughts that soldiers have before they go into battle avoided looking at each other. Captain Brogan rode up from out of the darkness into the view of the men of the two companies. Sergeant Devereaux, sitting at the head of A company, leaned forward and whispered in the ear of his horse Compass just before the captain reined his horse to stop in front of the two formations. The captain looked the two formations over and looked toward his first sergeant. Sergeant Devereaux sat up on his horse to see Major Owen exiting his tent and approach the formation with a limp and leaning on his walking stick.
The captain turned his horse to face the major as he approached. The sergeants called their respective units to attention at the major’s approach. The captain saluted the major as he came to a stop at the side of the captain’s horse. The major returned the salute and gestures for the captain to dismount.
“Captain, my final orders to you are to disengage at your first opportunity. Do not get entangled in a skirmish if at all possible,” the major said.
“Sir, I thought that was the plan. We are just there to draw off the infantry so the colonel can press his attack,” the captain replied.
“I am just making sure that we are clear on that point.” 
“Yes sir, anything else?” 
“Good luck, Captain,” the major said and gave the captain a sharp salute, turned around, and started back to his tent. The captain got back on his horse and looked back at Sergeant Devereaux. He then looked toward the sky briefly before he looked back at the sergeant again.
 “Let’s get them started Sergeant Devereaux,” Captain Brogan said and spurred his horse forward.
 “Yes Sir,” Sergeant Devereaux responded to the captain. “Troop, Forward. Column of twos from the right,” the sergeant bellowed at the formation. The formation fell in behind Captain Brogan and his first sergeant and the formation rode out of the camp their exit crowned with the first magentas in the dawn sky. They rode along in silence that was broken only by the whinny of a horse.

The two mounted companies came out onto a meadow from a wooded path. The captain raised his hand signaling the formation to stop. His movement was echoed down the formation by the platoon commanders. The sun could be seen shining on the tops of the taller trees in the woods behind them and painted the clouds to the west with its light. Captain Brogan looked around for a spot to leave the horses. A thick dew had fallen during their ride and had settled on everyone in the host.  Captain Brogan signaled for Sergeant Devereaux who cantered up and stopped by the captain’s side.
“We’ll dismount here and enter the woods over there,” the captain said in a tone of voice just above a whisper. “Have the men dismount and spread out along the tree line from here on up the hill. Make sure the platoon leaders are clear on the plan we went over yesterday,” the captain continued and pointed to the places he was referencing to the sergeant. “Leave a small sentry for the horses, and make sure the men know to bring all their ball and powder with them,” the sergeant nodded eagerly and rode back to the formation relaying the instructions to each of the platoon leaders. The captain stayed mounted on his horse and watched as the men executed his instruction. He dismounted when he was satisfied that his instructions had given were completed.
Sergeant Devereaux walked quickly from his mount to catch up with the captain. The two men started into the wood followed by the rest of the soldiers. The lack of direct sunlight left the interior of the woods dark, but it was made easier by the light of the meadow on the other side of the shallow stand of trees. It was at the wood line of the trees that the captain’s formation stopped and waited for the captain’s signal to move. On the other side of the meadow was a hill. On the hill were Union soldiers. The captain retrieved his field glasses to get a closer look. After he lifted them to his face and adjusted them for distance, he saw soldier’s that appeared to be just starting their morning. Many of the soldiers were not even in their full uniforms and huddled around campfires waiting for their first cup of coffee. He shifted his focus and saw the tents and campfires further up the hill, and shifted his focus again and saw the meadow with tall grass that stood between his men and the Union soldiers.
 “Sergeant Devereaux, have the men spread out along the wood line no less than six feet apart. I want company B to my left and A company to my right with muskets at the ready,” Captain Brogan said barely loud enough to be heard.
 “Yes sir,” the sergeant replied and started to turn to leave. The captain grabbed the sergeant by the arm before he was able to move off.
 “And sergeant, round up Private Greene and bring him back here with you,” the captain said turning to look at the sergeant to indicate that this last statement was a request more than an order.
 “Yes sir,” the sergeant replied and ran off to perform the captain’s orders.
The captain turned back around and went back to observing the enemy. His concentration was broken by the noisy return of Sergeant Devereaux with Private Greene. He turned around and signaled the sergeant to approach quieter. They responded by taking slower, more deliberate, steps.
“Captain, you didn’t tell me he had such big feet,” the sergeant said after reaching the captain location.
“Sorry Frenchy, I told him I’d keep him close during today’s action.”
“Sorry sirs,” Private Greene said sheepishly. “Sir, I appreciate you keeping your word to me. I’ll try not to be too much trouble.
 “You’ll be fine. Just stick close,” the captain said absentmindedly as he looked through his field glasses.
“Yes sir.”
“Hum, anything going on out there captain?” The sergeant asked squinting to view the hill opposite them. 
“It’s quiet. There just making breakfast. I haven’t been able to spot any sentries. You take a look, maybe you can spot them.”
Captain Brogan handed the sergeant his field glasses. The sergeant took them and surveys the hill opposite them.
“Do you see what I saw?” the captain asked.
“I’m not sure what you were looking at captain,” Sergeant Devereaux responded as he scanned the opposite hill.
“Well, those are either the dirtiest Yankees I’ve ever seen or they’re darkies,” the captain replied as the sergeant scanned the hill opposite with the field glasses. “I heard the Yankee’s were recruiting darkies but I didn’t think I’d ever see any in uniform,” the captain said as he reached for the field glasses to take another look.
“They’re too far away to be sure, captain,” the sergeant responded as he handed the field glasses back. “But them Yankee’s have become crafty after all the lickings we gave them,” the sergeant continued as he scratched his forearm nervously. “If they are darkies this is going to be easy, but don’t you think the colonel and his men would have mentioned that?”
The captain lowered his glasses and looked at the sergeant. “Good point,” he said and went back to looking through his glasses. “But if they’re white men why are they so dirty?”
“I didn’t see any sentries either. They’re just walking around out there like a bunch picnic ants.”
 “The colonel said they’ve been like this since his men first saw them. Maybe, they’re new.”
 “Captain, my daddy always told me the easiest catch is always hung on a hook.”
 “Do you think?”
*	*	*	*
Colonel Martel’s camp had a completely different atmosphere. Since the news spread that there was to be a raid and a cavalry charge, an energy, like static electricity, spread throughout the camp. Swords were sharpened, guns cleaned, and boots were polished like they were going to parade. The colonel neither encouraged nor discouraged this activity. Instead, he sat in his tent, sipping whiskey and gnawed on memories that were best forgotten. It wasn’t until well into the night that he gave the order for the camp to bed down for the night.
He was awakened later that night by a patrol that had brought in someone whom they thought was a deserter, but when the colonel saw him he realized that it was the young lieutenant from Owen’s regiment. He recognized the young officer immediately, but he did not share this with anyone in his command when they left the young officer in the colonel’s tent.
“I was bushwhacked,” Lieutenant Perry said as he sat in the chair opposite the colonel’s cot.
“What were you doing riding out afield at night son?” The colonel asked still groggy.
“I was taking a communiqué to headquarters for him when I was caught by some Yankee’s and taken prisoner,” Lieutenant Perry said as he struggled with his bindings. “Can you untie me, sir?”
“In a moment Lieutenant, Please, finish your report first.”
“I was taken prisoner and riding on the back of one of their horses when one of the Yankee’s horses got spooked reared up and threw the both of us off. I rolled away into the woods, got up and started running. I guess they were too confused to take after me, but they got my message pouch. I was trying to get back to tell the major when your men came across me.”
“Do you know what was in the communiqué?”
“I’m not sure, because the major wouldn’t let me read it, but I believe it was a brief on the raid that you had planned with the major?”
“Why do you think that?”
“Because that’s what he was talking about during supper.”
“Was he?” the colonel said with a hint of haughtiness.
“Yes sir.”
“But you’re not sure.”
“No sir.”
“Very well then son, thank you for your report,” the colonel said in a soft fatherly voice. “Sergeant Veemers,” the colonel barked.
“Yes sir,” Sergeant Veemers replied and threw back the tent flap cover.
“Untie the lieutenant and make sure he has a mount for tomorrows attack.”
“Yes sir,” the sergeant replied and walked over to untie the lieutenant’s hands.
“What about the intercepted communiqué?” Lieutenant Perry turned to the colonel and asked before he exited the tent.
“I’m sure that the dispatch you were carrying did not contain anything pertinent to our attack. The major and I had an agreement,” the colonel said to the lieutenant who saluted before he exited the tent.
*	*	*	*
The charge started when the colonel heard the sound of gun and cannon fire. “The diversion is our cue,” the colonel said and urged his horse forward at a canter. The entire regiment could hear the crackle and feel the tingle of the raw energy. Then the colonel quickened the pace to a slow gallop, and the horse’s hooves sounded like the hundreds of heartbeats of the cavalrymen that rode all around. Then the slow gallop became a fast gallop and the sound of hooves changed from individual heartbeats to a single rolling thunder. Finally, the colonel pulled his saber from its scabbard. You could see him yell charge, but you couldn’t hear him. The saber lifted high over his head flashed like lightening from the thundering cloud of soldiers. One felt compelled to yell, but the yell couldn’t be heard over the thunder of hooves. The only sense that one was yelling was the sensation of vibrating vocal chords. At full speed, the tears that issued from the colonel’s eye were swept away by the wind to water the lilies of glory. It was then that the charge became an unstoppable force, like the fall of a giant hammer; its blow capable of forcing even the hardest objects to yield to either bend or shatter.
In a single moment, the charge changed from the embodiment of God’s wrath back to human flesh when the Union soldiers released their first volley from the cannon hidden behind wooden barricades. The grape shot ripped through the formation mangling bodies and ripping through the flesh of both men and horses, but the charge did not stop. The second volley from the cannon did even greater damage to the men on horseback, but they still continued. The remaining horse soldiers laughed as the Yankee artilleryman scattered before them. Their horse leapt over the make shift barricade and bounded the dirt mound behind them only to find that it concealed a deep trench in which both horse and rider careened into followed by other unsuspecting riders. It was in this confusion that the Yankee’s appeared on the opposite side of the trench with their repeating rifles shooting at everything that moved. The Confederate soldiers in the trench, already shocked, stunned, or wounded, didn’t have a chance. The contents of trench soon became a twitching mass of both human and horse flesh. As movement in the trench became less frequent, the rifle fire of the Union soldiers slowed like the raindrops of a shower that have moved off to inundate some other place. 
*	*	*	*
From the other side of the hill was heard, first, a single rebel yell followed by a series of rebel yells and the thunder of horses hooves.
 “I guess we are about to find out,” Sergeant Devereaux said as all three men sprang to their feet and ran out of the woods into the meadow that separates the two hills. The rest of the company followed when they saw the captain and sergeant start off across the field. As the two companies of men ran across the field, it became obvious that the field was pitted with holes that were hidden by the tall grass. The captain and his men tripped and stumbled as they crossed the field. Others looked down to avoid the holes.
The first Union gunfire didn’t start until the men were half way across the field and came from the tree line on the opposite hill. It was intermittent at first but quickly increased in intensity. It was from the new Union repeating rifles. Captain Brogan responded by trying to stop his men and get them to kneel down in the grass of the field, but by then there was too much noise for his orders to be heard and confusion, panic and tenacity had set in on the captain’s command. The Confederate soldiers moved forward even though they were being savagely cut down buy Union rifle fire. Some of the Confederate soldiers responded by pausing to take a shot with their muskets. The Union soldiers responded with more rifle fire, this time, from the tall grass to their right. Cannon fire began to erupt from the top of the hill from cannon hidden in the tents. The Confederate soldiers began to panic and started running in all directions in an effort to avoid the grape shot that cut swathes through their ranks. Captain Brogan stood up and tried to direct them back to the tree line where they started. He started to run in that direction. Short of the tree line, Captain Brogan was hit by divots thrown up by cannon shot and was knocked down. Sergeant Devereaux picked Brogan up and drug him to the safety of the tree line.  He smacked the stunned captain until he regained his senses. The captain came around just in time to see the sergeant in front of him fall over dead from a gunshot to the head. Captain Brogan tried to stand up but couldn’t. There was gun and cannon fire all around him. He pulled his field glasses from his pouch to survey the meadow. Captain Brogan’s men ran in all directions through the smoke and confusion looking for cover. They were being cut down by Union fire. He spotted Private Greene on his knees praying. The next moment there was an explosion and Private Greene was no more. A cannon shot exploded near the captain and all went black.
 
	Chapter 7 – The Undying Debt of Honor
	An early afternoon sun found its way through the holes in the roof of the small wood frame church. Sun beams illuminated its interior giving it, in some places, a sense of reverence. It also exposed the dust and dirt that was suspended in the air and collected in the unused spots within the sanctuary. Stagnant air trapped the smell in the shelter. It had become a make shift hospital for confederate soldiers and was filled with those lucky enough to get pulled from the battlefield for medical treatment. The air reeked of death, sweat, and urine. There was also the constant groaning of those in pain, hacking and intermittent coughs, the cries of the delirious along with those in pain, and the desperate pleas of the dying as they used up the last of their emotional strength. All that could be done to ease the suffering was being done. The injured were strewn about the floor and pews of the church. Buckets of fresh water were brought in and rounds were made to satisfy the thirsty; there was the operating room where Doctor Silas Pratt worked to stem the tide of suffering. The war was never far. Cannon and gun fire was always near enough to be heard. It unnerved soldier, physician and attendant alike with the constant reminder that the suffering continued.
	Exhausted, Cassie Jefferson stepped through the front door of the church and sat down on the stairs at the front of the church. She took deep breaths of the plentiful fresh air outside of the sanctuary. She rested an elbow on her knee and her forehead in her hand. The fresh air amplified the ever present fatigue that she felt as she worked to nurse the soldiers back to health and assist Doctor Pratt in any way she could.  The sounds of the battlefield, like some distant macabre symphony, rose and fell. At that moment, there was a lull in the fighting and Cassie drifted closer and closer toward sleep. She did not hear Doctor Pratt as he walked out of the church and sat next to her on the stairs. As her head slipped from the grip of her hand she awoke with a start and looked to see who had sat down next to her.
“I’m sorry Doctor Pratt. I just had to come out and get some air. Those poor souls, their suffering weighs on my heart,” she said as she gazed at him still surprised by his seemingly sudden appearance.
 “Your efforts here have soothed the suffering of many. I just hope that the stream of twisted and broken bodies has slowed for now. Some rest would do both of us a world of good.”
Cassie nodded in agreement and looked around the grounds of the church. It was set in a meadow with wind break of trees on either side. The grass had grown tall during the summer and had now become golden stems of straw. Birds, butterflies, and various flying insects went about their business in the afternoon sun. With the brief quiet, the view of the field and trees had become idyllic. In the background, the slaves could be heard singing hymns as they worked.
 “I have missed the South,” Cassie said thinking out loud. Her comment caught the doctor off guard as he too was starting to fall asleep.
“Pardon?” The doctor asked forcing himself awake.
 “I miss the South, even when I was in Paris studying music and painting, reading literature and philosophy, and having grand conversations over coffee by the Seine. My home was never far from my heart.”
 “Why would you return knowing there was war?”
“The letters I received from home. At first, they were cheery, but then their tone changed, and I started to worry. What was said in the letters did not match what I was reading in the papers.”
 “You read about the sieges?”
 “That and the change in the tone of the letters I received. They had a despair to them. I sensed their hope fading like the dying light of a candle.”
 “Why come back to their despair?”
 “They are my family. I go as they go. By time I got to the plantation, all that was left was charred wood and a chimney. My brothers were scarred and broken by the war and my mother almost out of her mind with grief.”
 “I’m sorry.”
 “Don’t be. Stubborn proud men are the fuel that keeps the flame of this war burning. It’s what burned down my home.”
 “So what are you going to do now, I mean, after the war is over?”
 “Start over. When this war is over, somewhere there will be a man with enough light left in his heart to make life worthwhile. I just hope that I don’t give in to despair like so many others.”
Their conversation was abruptly interrupted by the sound of a rapidly approaching buckboard. As it cleared the wind break of trees, they both could see that it was filled with injured and dying men. Doctor Pratt’s tired face was re-energized. He stood up and walked back into the church and returned with slaves to help him move the injured men into the church. The men were first pulled from the wagon and placed on the yard in front of the church. Doctor Pratt and Cassie go from injured man to injured man evaluating wounds and telling the slaves where to put the injured and dying. The lucky ones were moved inside or near the sanctuary, the rest were left under the shade of the trees to expire. Captain Brogan was among the lucky ones and was placed in line for treatment.

The interior of the church at night was not the hallowed place that it appeared to be on sunny days. Its darkness felt fathomless. The voices and smells that were present during the day seem to intensify at night. The doors and surrounding trees blocked the light of the stars and moon; the oil lanterns stole what fresh air was available and added yet another smell to the stifling atmosphere.
Cassie nursed Captain Brogan by lantern light. He was delirious. She applied cold compresses, changed the bandages of his wounds, and adjusted his bed coverings. She wiped the sweat from his forehead and held him down as he struggled while he slept. His body stilled as the night deepened. She got up and found a spot on a pew not too far away from Captain Brogan and hummed a Chopin nocturne that lulled her, and those around her, into a peaceful sleep.

Morning returned to the Church. The early morning light shone through what was left of a stained glass window. The sound of the war returned, but a gentle breeze stirred bringing fresh air and a brief respite from the foul air that had accumulated in the sanctuary. Cassie had Captain Brogan’s hand in hers as he slowly regained consciousness. He tried to sit up but the pain from his wounds forced him to lie back down.
 “How did I?” Brogan asked.
“It’s okay. You’re in Logan’s Mill church it’s a hospital now. They brought you here from the battle,” Cassie replied. She stared intently at his eyes. Their color and countenance reminded her very much of Rene. She felt sad and happy in the same moment and held back a strong urge to burst into tears and embrace the man that lay before her. Instead she just stared and allowed fond memories of Rene to dominate her thoughts.
“Who are you?” Captain Brogan asked trying hard to sit up again.
“I’m Cassie. You had quite a night last night. The doctor didn’t think you were going to make it.”
Captain Brogan’s head fell back against his pillow and his eyes rolled back in his head.
 “Greene!” Captain Brogan cried out appearing as though he has slipped back into delirium.
Captain Brogan struggled to sit up. Again he was agitated.
 “Luke, Luke! He’s at it again! Give me a hand with him,” Cassie called out to one of the slaves.
Luke, a large male slave, assisted Cassie in subduing Captain Brogan. They tied him down to his cot with bed sheets. He was subdued and laid flat. Cassie put her hand on his shoulder.
“I’m sorry that we have to do this, but you need to lay flat so your body can heal,” Cassie said and sat down next to her restrained patient. She wiped his brow with a damp rag and caressed his face. Her hand eventually came to rest on his shoulder where it lingered. When he drifted off to sleep, she lifted her hand from his shoulder and walked away to tend to other patients.

The midday sunbeams returned to light the interior of the sanctuary. As Cassie approached Captain Brogan with a bowl of food, she noticed one of the shafts of light shining on her patient. She smiled and took it as some sort of sign regarding his health.
 “I got some food here for you. I think it would be easier if I just feed you myself. You’re not going to raise a fuss are you?”
Captain Brogan shook his head no.
“Greene, what happened to Greene?” He asked.
 “I’m not sure who you’re talking about. I don’t know any Greene. We have so many here, and outside whose names we do not know,” she replied guardedly. 
Captain Brogan pushed his head back into the pillow.
“I lost him,” Captain Brogan said and started to struggle against his restraints. He turned his head away from Cassie.
 “You can’t worry about that now. You have to eat or you won’t be able to help anyone. Here, open up,” Cassie started spoon-feeding Captain Brogan. He ate, slowly at first, but he eventually took spoonfuls regularly.

That evening the breeze that brought fresh air to the sanctuary had calmed. For the moment, the war seemed to have moved in another direction. Its sounds moved with it. The artillery and musket fire that upset so many had become distant and no longer disturb the injured. After playing a few songs to lull the restless to sleep, Cassie found a spot and fell sound asleep as did Doctor Pratt. 
Later that evening a waxing crescent moon rose, two slaves set a man down on a stretcher next to Captain Brogan. There was only the dim light of kerosene lamps in the room. A slave placed a lamp down between the two men. It illuminated their faces. Another slave gentle shook Captain Brogan Awake.
 “Captain Brogan. Captain Brogan, can you hear me?” Colonel Martel asked as he rolled over to face the captain. His once fine uniform was now muddied, ripped, and bloody, and his once certain gaze now tentative.
 “Yes?” Captain Brogan responded startled awake.
 “Captain, it is I. I have been praying for your survival ever since I heard they brought you in,” Colonel Martel said trying to see if Captain Brogan was fully awake.
 “What happened?” Captain Brogan asked as a slave loosened his restraints.
 “We were betrayed captain,” the colonel said and gave a weak but deathly sounding cough at the end of which he spit up blood into a handkerchief.
 “Are you okay?” The captain asked free of his restraints and able to turn fully toward the colonel.
 “The doctor says I am dying, slowly. He thinks I’m bleeding on the inside and it is just a matter of time, but that is of no consequence. We have a more important matter to discuss,” the colonel said and coughed again.
 “We have been most savagely betrayed by the worst kind of scoundrel,” the colonel started but abruptly stopped to cough again and spit more blood into his handkerchief. “That major you call a commanding officer has knowingly sent us into the jaws of hell.” 
 “Major Owen?” Captain Brogan responded with surprise tempered by his weakened condition.
 “Yes, Owen. I have known him longer than you, and have suffered his insubordination before.”
 “Sir, the major that I know is.”
 “Please don’t interrupt, captain,” the colonel said and coughed again worse than before.
 “As I said, we have been betrayed. These words come not from me but from a Yankee that we captured.”
 “But sir, Major Owen? He prizes his honor as much as any other gentleman.”
“So he led us to believe but we were told of his treachery, in so many words, by a Yankee my men took prisoner. We did not believe him at first. Because, as you said, we thought the major prized his honor.”
“How do you know the Yankee was telling the truth?”
 “Why would the Yankee lie? My men reconnoitered that camp every day, and they reported no changes. I tell the major and in one day, it turns into hell’s fury. No sir. It was he.”
Captain Brogan lay back in his bed to take in what he has heard. “But how could he have?”
 “The likes of us will never know how the mind of a traitor works, but just know that we, you and I, have been betrayed.”
Both men briefly lay quiet gathering their strength to continue their conversation.
 “Then you want me to bring him up on charges?” Captain Brogan asked his eyes searching the colonel’s face.
 “No captain. This has now become a matter of honor for men like us and those who died on the field of honor. Vermin like Owen must be exterminated. I don’t believe I will live long enough to do it. That is why I am asking you to avenge the souls of all those who died at his treachery.”
 “You want me to kill him?”
 “I want you to settle his account. His death will be little consolation to those who he betrayed, but it will be something.”
Captain Brogan paused to think.
 “But we are still at war. Killing him would be. . .”
“Captain, when there is an enemy we must meet them and defeat them on the field of honor. There is no other way. One does not maintain one’s honor by staring at each other with eyes full of contempt and a heart full of fear. We are not murderers or assassins that skulk about in the dark. Our cause is just and we employ the force of God himself in our fight. To not fight is to deny God his vengeance, and that is sin. You and I captain, as men of honor, understand this. It is the major, his heart vacant of God’s will, who does not. That is why we must serve as God’s instrument and mete out His justice. Our men died serving the Lord’s cause. They were betrayed by the major. This work must be done for their souls to be able to rest peacefully,” the colonel said then coughed again that was followed by several minutes of wheezing. It took quite a while for the colonel to regain full composure.
“Colonel, surely we haven’t reached the point where we are shooting at each other?”
 “He is as much an enemy as any Yankee, and on my passing, I have left you some tools for your work,” he turned and looked at the slave. “Joshua, would you give my things to the captain.”
Joshua, one of the slave attendants, put a sword and a wooden box under the pew where Captain Brogan’s lay.
 “Why are you giving me these?” Captain Brogan asked looking down at the objects that he had been given.
 “These are your tools of vengeance. The sword is to remind you of the honor betrayed, and in the box is my Le Mat. I call her ‘justice’, and she has never failed me. I expect the same from you. Now I must rest for I am very tired,” Colonel Martel said feebly then lay back on his stretcher, closed his eyes, and quietly died.

Chapter 8 – Healing Wounds Festering Scars
	In the quiet hours of the morning prior to the stirring of those soldiers lucky enough to sleep, Cassie got up and walked down to a nearby creek to wash. Doctor Pratt, concerned about her safety, had given her a derringer which she carried in her waist. Her experiences on her trip home from Paris tested her faith in humankind. The little gun she carried was always loaded and well concealed. Deep down, Cassie felt that carrying the gun made her a hypocrite, but she was also pragmatic and knew that desperate situations created desperate people for which desperate measures had to be taken.
	She slept particularly well that night, and for the first time in several weeks felt truly rested. She knew not to make too much noise on her walk back from the creek, but, along the way, with the weight of fatigue lifted she did have a strong desire to sing. The war had not overcome her love of music and the melody of a Chopin waltz played in her head on her walk back to the church. Dawn was Cassie’s favorite time of day, and the day’s circumstances, with the lack of new wounded and a good night’s sleep, suggested that her day would be a good one. Closer to the church, she could see Doctor Pratt and the slave orderlies moving around the grounds. A fire had been started to prepare a hot breakfast for those able to eat. The fire itself was kept hidden, but the smell of the smoke reminded her that she was hungry. Recent experience had taught her that fear and frustration were good appetite suppressants.
	The slaves Joshua and Luke were unusually aloof that morning. Cassie was used to receiving a report from them on the previous night’s status of the patients which she would verify and, when necessary, share her observations with Doctor Pratt. The process worked well and it freed the doctor from visiting every soldier, instead he visited only those in need of his attention. That morning there was no report. It was a fact that did come to Cassie’s attention until the doctor asked her how things were going. It was a question that she was at a loss to answer. When she turned around to find the two slaves who reported to her, she found that both were performing other tasks to consume their time and prevented her from getting her report. Without her report, she continued on with her daily duties of checking the stock of bandages, the availability and quantity of fresh water, and whether the doctor’s instruments had been cleaned. All had been done, and, when exiting the pastor’s office that was now a supply room, she bumped into Joshua. He look on his face betrayed his shock and fear. His expression startled her and the two of them stood there in a dumbfounded silence. Joshua was first to move and turned to leave.
	“Joshua?” Cassie asked in a stern tone with a hint of confusion. “Joshua, come here. I wish to speak to you.”
	“I’ve got to get these things to Doctor Pratt,” he replied. “He wants them right away,” Joshua added and turned to leave.
	“You aren’t carrying anything that Doctor Pratt can’t wait for another minute,” Cassie said and placed her hands on her hips. “What’s the matter with you?” She asked him finally able to make eye contact. “Why are you avoiding me?”
	“I’m not Miss Jefferson. It’s just that Luke and I are real busy this morning,” he replied trying to find a moment where he could break away from her stare.
	“Busy? This is the first morning in weeks that I have had time to gather my thoughts before I started doing anything. You two aren’t busy. What’s going on with you?”
	Joshua’s gaze moved to floor much like that of a child caught in a lie. He started to fidget and twitch as he had a habit of doing when confronted. “Soldiers died last night Miss Jefferson,” he said in a confessional tone.
	“I know, we lose soldiers all the time. You should be used to that.”
	“We moved one, Miss Jefferson.”
	“You’re supposed to move them so we can make room for others.”
	“We moved him before he died, Miss Jefferson.”
	“Before he died? Who told you to do that?”
	“He did, Miss Jefferson.”
	“Why would you do that without either me or Doctor Pratt telling you?”
	“He told us we’d burn in hell if we didn’t do what his said.”
	“And you were fool enough to believe him?”
	“He talked powerful serious Miss Jefferson.”
	“And he died when you moved him?”
	“No ma’am. He died after we put him down and he talked a while with another soldier.”
	“Did the man he talked to die?”
	“No ma’am.”
	“Who did the dead man talk to?”
	“The soldier Luke tied down yesterday.”
	Cassie’s hands slid from her hips to her sides and balled up into fists. Her teeth clenched and it seemed like she was about to hit Joshua. Instead, she shrieked and stormed passed him down the hall toward the sanctuary. Luke was laughing as he talked to another slave when he saw Cassie and the expression on her face. His laugh changed to an expression of shock and pain like someone who had just been stung by a hornet. He looked for an exit, but he was too surprised to think straight. Cassie walked straight up to him.
	“Luke, I just got finished talking to Joshua. What happened last night?”
	The expression of shock on Luke’s face changed to one of solemnity and ignorance.
	“Last night?”
	“Yes, last night. He told me that you carried a soldier around who died. I want to know exactly what you two were doing.”
	A confused look formed on his face. “We did a lot of things last night Miss Jefferson.”
	“What do you think I want to know about what you did last night? I know you are not stupid and neither am I. I want you to tell me so I can tend to these poor souls without causing them too much suffering,” She paused briefly and softened her tone. “You want that don’t you?”
	“We were just doing what we were told Miss Jefferson.”
	“I know Luke.”
	“Maybe its best you talk to the captain we tied down yesterday.”
	Cassie’s eyebrows knitted up. “Perhaps it is.” 

	Captain Brogan spent that morning reliving the most painful moments of his life over and over again. It was as though he was in a waking dream with the same terrible result being repeated. He wanted to cry out, but the image that bedeviled him seemed to dissipate, just before he felt he could hold back anymore, as though they were washed away by a tide. The only noises he made were whimpers and groans that were lost in the sounds coming from those around him. He didn’t see Cassie as she approached, but Cassie saw him, sweaty, unshaven, and the distant look of a man lost within himself. She stopped to watch him from a ways off. He sat on the blanket and sheets where they first put him. She felt pity, anger, and helplessness as he twitched and mumbled to himself. Cassie went and got Luke to bring her patient out of his self-induced state. With Luke standing over him, and Cassie sitting at his side, she cautiously touched his shoulder and gently called his name.
	“You want me to shake him?” Luke asked with his large hands ready to grasp Captain Brogan’s shoulders. Cassie shook her head no and Luke stood ready to subdue the man in front of him. Previous experience with similar situations had taught them the necessity of such precautions. Cassie gently touched his shoulder again and Captain Brogan suddenly snapped to his feet, yelled for his first sergeant and burst into tears. He blindly fell forward into Luke bawling like a baby. Luke gently pushed him away back into Cassie’s arms. Cassie sat Captain Brogan down and let him finish crying with his head on her shoulder. As he cried, she closed her eyes and thought of the music that used to come from her Paris apartment. Captain Brogan cried himself to sleep and Cassie needed Luke’s help to lay him flat on the pew so he could continue his sleep undisturbed.
	Captain Brogan’s sleep, although externally peaceful, continued to be a playground for his newly found anxieties and regrets. His current dream was of Colonel Martel’s first visit and their discussion. His memory of the major was now distorted. The major appeared as a sort of demon replete with horns on his forehead and a serpent’s tail. The major’s hand appeared as a scaly claw that emitted a low flame that seared and burned the paper wherever the major touched it. The map that the colonel brought of the battlefield had scorches and burns from the major’s touch. Each of the frightful images greatly disturbed the captain and caused him to freeze in place. He wanted to cry out and warn those around him but found himself unable to speak. His throat felt choked and burnt by the drink the major had offered. The images of the meeting slowly faded into a darkness where the captain sensed vague yet palpable threats from all sides. It was in such an uneasy state of sleep the captain remained in that afternoon.
	Cassie’s felt that her concern for the captain was no excuse for her to neglect the rest of the patients. The lull they had experienced the previous day had ended and a steady flow of fresh wounded arrived that day. It kept Cassie busy enough that she found herself more focused on saving the lives that hung in the balance in front of her than on the concerns of one man who seemed well on the road to recovery from his physical wounds.
	Afternoon turned to evening and Cassie went from surgery, to crisis, to death in a seemingly endless cycle. It was a dizzying and numbing routine that she knew must be done and for the sake of solace, compared her effort to that of the soldier in the field to keep moving. With most of the action at an end, she washed up, performed the night inventory, and gave Luke and Joshua their instructions for the evening. Cassie almost blind with fatigue found a spot on a pew to throw a blanket and fell asleep.
	Captain Brogan was awake after a long afternoon nap. He was surrounded by the last thing he needed to see. The wounded and dying that populate the church do nothing but remind him of the fight where he lost his men. He felt that he was to blame and that he should have known about his commanding officer and his lack of honor. He blamed himself for not knowing that he was leading his men into an ambush. He felt that his first sergeant, who died in the fight, all but told him what was about to happen but he chose to ignore the advice. All of that, he felt, was his fault, but then there was the devil that led them into the trap: the major. He fantasized about the major’s demise at his hands with the colonel’s weapons. In some of the fantasies the death was swift and final, in others; the death was slow, messy and painful. In all of his fantasies, the major’s death was coupled with a release of tension and a profound sense of feeling the gratitude of others, but with each release came the return of anxiety when the captain realized that the major’s death was only a fantasy.
	When that evening’s moon had fallen far below the horizon and all in the make-shift hospital who could fall asleep had fallen asleep, Captain Brogan decided it was time to leave and deliver the vengeance with which the colonel had charged him. He easily stepped passed the night attendants, whose task it was to keep an eye on him, and made his way out into the darkness. He moved slowly being unsure of each step. In the night cool air, he could hear and smell the presence of a horse. He walked like a blind man with his hands out in front of him led only by his sense of touch, hearing and smell. Invisible obstacles acted as snares put in place to foil his escape. Twigs snapped, branches and seedlings poked and slapped him, rocks and protruding tree roots caused him to stumble, but he continued in his search for the horse. In the darkness, Captain Brogan felt that time moved unevenly. It moved quickly when pain was inflicted like stubbing his toe, but it moved slowly in the length of time it took to find the horse. The sounds of the horse became distinctly louder the closer he got. Until he thought he was so close he could reach out and touch it. He spoke in gentle tones so as not to spook it as he inched close enough to feel the warmth it radiated. From that point it was only a matter of him untying the horse and riding off. He would have to go bareback he thought to himself and considered the possibility of finding the rest of the horse’s tack slim. He untied the horse and walked a short distance away from the church. In a field, near the stand of trees that acted as a wind break, he waited for the first light of day.
	Skirmishes between the two armies occurred like lightning strikes, their randomness worrying the senior commanders of both armies. Such was the state of the conflict that Captain Brogan rode into that dawn. As he rode, his first thought was on getting a blanket and saddle for his horse. The ride proved uncomfortable for both. 
His luck provided him a chance encounter with a group of staff officers that were assembled at the top of a ridge overlooking a wide valley. He urged the horse forward, as best he could, toward the group of men on horseback. His approach did not go unnoticed. One of the younger officers moved closer to the senior officer and pointed out the captain’s arrival. From their point of view, Captain Brogan’s appearance was the very image that they were trying to quell. The captain was a pitiful sight. His mount was an overworked and underfed nag that was not well groomed. The captain did not appear to be in much better condition. His uniform was torn in places, muddy, and stained with blood. He also had a now dirty bandage on his forehead that partially covered a nasty bruise. He was also unwashed and unshaven. In all, he was the antithesis of the image that they were trying to project toward the enlisted and the enemy. He received an icy reception from the younger officers which did not deter him as he headed for the colonel with the field glasses.
	“Colonel, Captain John Brogan reporting for duty,” the captain said after he stopped his mount, sat up straight, and gave a crisp salute. The colonel turned around slowly to look at the man who had addressed him. He looked him up and down and then looked him straight in the eye before he returned the salute.
	“Captain, my men and I appreciate your devotion to the cause but are you aware of what a sad sight you are? Your horse, your uniform, and you are in no condition to lead men into a fight,” the colonel said in a firm but compassionate tone.
	“But sir, I still got fight in me and if you could provide me some assist in getting a fresh horse, uniform, and shave I will be ready to lead men through the gates of Hades itself,” Captain Brogan said plaintively. Some of the staff officers laughed at Captain Brogan’s proposition which was followed by the colonel surveying his staff with a stern look of displeasure. The colonel’s look was followed by silence.
	“No, captain,” the colonel said. “You look as though you have already served the cause honorably and could use some time recuperating. We need men with your spirit, but we need them whole so they can give there all when the time comes.”
	“But colonel, I’m ready now.”
	“Captain, you are injured, and from the looks of you, it appears you saw a pretty hard time. I am ordering you to seek medical care and follow it until you are well enough to rejoin your unit. Do you understand Captain?”
	The captain’s face displayed the pain, confusion, and fatigue that he had tried to hide.
	“But sir,” Captain Brogan said imploringly.
	“Captain Shanley, escort the captain here to the nearest aid station to have his injuries tended to.”
	“Yes sir,” Captain Shanley replied and urged his horse forward toward Captain Brogan.
	“That won’t be necessary colonel,” Captain Brogan said. “I still know how to follow orders,” He added as he saluted and then turned his horse away from the group of assembled officers.
	“Captain Brogan,” the colonel said as the captain started back down the hill. “The South appreciates your sacrifice and looks forward to your return.”
	Captain Brogan could respond only by turning his head and acknowledging with a hand gesture since the horse he rode had a mind of its own. It was not fast horse, but it was surefooted and moved along at a steady pace.
	Captain Brogan had gone only a short distance before his thoughts settled back into his waking nightmares of guilt and revenge. At that point he was riding blind. He did not notice when Confederate infantrymen appeared from out of nowhere in the golden field of grass beside him. They had apparently been squatting there for some time waiting for the next tide of soldiers to appear and be swept away with them. Instead, Captain Brogan was the first soldier to approach, and he being an officer gave them all the more reason to make themselves known to him. It was not until the horse whinnied at the approach of one of the soldiers did Captain Brogan become aware of his surroundings and the men that approached.
	There were about a dozen of them. They were all battle worn and, to various degrees, dazed. The captain surveyed them slowly as they approached.  They appeared as ghosts from his last command to him. Their appearance stunned him and left him wondering what was going to happen next. He fully expected them to attack him and take out their anger for his poor guidance and was truly surprised when one approached him looking like a hollow eyed scarecrow and asked him if he was there to lead them. It was not at all what he expected and was momentarily at a loss for words, but he took the event as a sign of redemption. The mist of the dark and depressing thoughts that surrounded him cleared. For the first time in days he felt like his old self and could feel the true intensity of the pain from his physical wounds. His arm and back were sore and he had a headache. None of these things stopped him from dismounting and gathering together the men from the field. They weren’t much to look at, but they were armed men looking for someone to lead them. He had one of the men hold his horse while he looked the rest of them over with his hands on his hips. 
	“Do any of you have a pistol I can use? I lost mine,” the captain asked the members of his newly adopted troop. One of the wiry soldiers walked up and handed him a pistol by the butt end.
	“Got it from a dead Yankee we came across a ways back,” he said and smiled flashing his well-rotted teeth. The captain nodded his head and took the weapon sticking in the top of his britches. The man stepped back into the group without saluting.
	“How long have you men been out here without anyone to lead you?” The captain asked.
	“A couple maybe three days,” replied one of the older men of the group.
	“Where’d you all come from?”
	“We had been with the seventh Georgia until after the fight the other day. It started in the late afternoon and went into the evening. By time it got full dark we had no idea of where we, or the rest of our company, were and have been wandering around ever since.”
	“Can you all shoulder your muskets and form up in two columns?” The captain asked then mounted his horse as the wiry men that resembled scarecrows organized themselves into the requested formation. They started marching down the road behind the captain. As slow as his horse moved it wasn’t long before the men behind him had difficulty keeping up. He looked behind him to see a group of men whose formation had broken apart with the healthier ones keeping up and the other’s lagging behind in order of their physical condition. The fall day was unusually hot and humid, and after a Mississippi summer lacking food, water and adequate sanitation, there was little more that could be expected from them. Captain Brogan took it upon himself to rest the men of his new command and finding the first stand of trees that provided shade he order them to rest in the shade. The order was accepted with a great deal of relief. Those who could, moved under the shade as quickly as possible, those who could not, found the first spot of shade and collapsed in exhaustion. The captain himself, not allowing any of the men to take his horse, found a spot for it and rested his back against a nearby tree. It was how they all spent the middle part of the breezeless afternoon, where the wake from a flying insect passing by was an appreciated and welcomed relief. Many of the men, the captain included, had drifted off into a semi-consciousness, the point just before sleep. When suddenly, the sound of thunder entered their half-conscious dreams and shook them awake. It was cavalry on the move.
	For the tattered and weary confederate soldiers the sound was electrifying. They all got to their feet with unexpected energy. For Captain Brogan, the sound was that of the approach of an opportunity for redemption. On his feet he looked sharp, tuned for a fight. With his pistol in hand, he used hand motions to disperse the men. The men dispersed themselves about the field and readied their weapons. It was either the beat of their hearts or the pounding hooves that deafened them. They all looked back at the captain waiting for him to give the order to start firing. As the heads of the soldiers of the first formation appeared, fingers got itchy. The men looked back at the captain, like lighting fireflies, waiting for him to either fire or give the order to fire. The first formation passed and no order was given. A second formation appeared and the captain, pistol in hand, stood frozen in position as though hypnotized. The men understood the power and impact of a coordinated volley and no one wanted to shoot without being order. As the second formation passed the men looked back at the captain to see his pistol as it shook in his hand. The men looked back at him in shock, disappointment and disgust. The second formation rode by and moved off into the distance like a passing thunderstorm. The meadow once again, became quiet, the heat along with the sound of the crickets returned.
	“Dang! I thought we had a leader,” one of the men said after un-cocking his musket and stood up. “He couldn’t lead a pig to dinner.”
	Another soldier stood up and shouldered his musket. “I’m going to find me some Yankees to kill. I may be tired and hungry, but I don’t tremble at the sight of them,” he punctuated his remark by spitting on the ground in the direction of the captain and then turned and walked away.
	“Yeah, we all might as well follow Jess. This one has gone yellow on us,” a third soldier said and started after Jess who was already walking down the road. The rest of the men grumbled, some of them spat, as they, one by one, fell in with Jess. Captain Brogan could only stand there, his mouth agape, in shock at what had just happened and what was happening. Men who once trusted him were walking away from him in disgust and shame. As the last one left, Captain Brogan closed his mouth, shut his eyes, and let his chin fall toward his chest in shame. He waited a while so those men had a good lead before he mounted his horse and started back the way he came. The shame he felt overwhelmed his other pain. His head hung low as he rode along.

	The church was relatively quiet as he approached on his appropriated horse. It ambled up and stopped at the same spot from which he took it. The captain got off, tied the horse to a fence post, and quietly walked into the church. It was Joshua who first saw him. He walked over and nudged Cassie. Cassie stopped what she was doing and gave him a long hard stare. She waited until the flush of anger passed over her face before she approached. She walked right up to him, took his wrist in her hand, and looked him in the eye. “Welcome back captain. We were concerned about you,” she said gently then led him back to the section of pew where they had laid him. “Please lie down and rest. You are still not well and must be tired,” she added and gently tugged at his wrist encouraging him to lie down. The captain lay down on the pew and turned his head away from her in fatigue and shame. Cassie leaned in close to him and spoke in his ear. “I know of some of the place you have been and can only imagine the echo of the horror that you have in your heart,” she draped a blanket over him and walked away.

 
Chapter 9 – Byrne’s Fever
A young boy, no older than twelve, rode up to the church, stopped, and got off the horse as though he was late for his own wedding. He walked passed Luke and Joshua and went straight up to Cassie who was applying cold compresses to a feverish patient. The boy was agitated and quite put out when Cassie did not give him her undivided attention.
	“Where’s Doctor Pratt?” He asked a tired Cassie impatiently. When she did not respond he decided to tap her on the shoulder and asked again. She twitched her shoulder slightly in response to his tap and continued working. Seeing that his tap on the shoulder did not work, he reached out and grabbed her shoulder to try and turn her around. In response, Cassie, very quickly spun around and looked him directly in the eye with a look of anger rarely seen on her face. The boy, surprised, jerked his head back at the sudden movement and stared at her wide eyed.
	“Boy, don’t you bother me when I am working,” Cassie snarled at him and turned back around to tend her patient. The boy, put in his place, took off his hat and shifted his feet as he spoke.
	“Ma’am, can you tell me where Doctor Pratt is? I have a message for him from Colonel Lindsay.”
	“He’s in the surgery behind the curtain up near the choir box,” Cassie replied talking over her shoulder. Before she said any more, the boy had turned around and started up to where the doctor’s surgery was. Cassie turned to say something more to him as he left, but he moved too quickly. When the boy stepped around the curtain of the surgery, he stepped back the way he came, doubled over, with his hand over his mouth which quickly became covered with vomit. After his sudden vomit, he stood upright, turned white as a new sheet, and fainted. Cassie shook her head as the boy’s body hit the ground and turned toward the church door.
	“Luke, could you go get that boy and lay him out some place until he comes around.” Luke looked back at Cassie, nodded his head, and started walking toward the boy. “And clean up that mess he made before someone slips and breaks their neck,” she added.
	“Yes ma’am.” 
	Doctor Pratt, still blood spattered from surgery, stood over the boy when he woke. The doctor smiled at the boy as the boy’s eyes focused on him. 
	“How are you son?” the doctor asked.
	“Message,” the boy said faintly. “I have a message from Colonel Lindsay.”
	“Yes?”	
	“The army is moving and he would like you to follow,” the boy said gaining strength with each word.
	“I am to return with your reply,” the boy said as he slowly sat up. Doctor Pratt nodded his head.
	“Of course, I cannot speak for my staff, but I am sure we’ll manage,” he said to the boy. The boy turned to put his feet on the floor and was about to stand when the doctor put his hand on his shoulder to stop him.
	“Whoa, whatever you think you’re going to do can wait. You need to rest for a bit more.”
	“Can’t,” the boy said. “They were pulling up stakes when I left, and I was told to get right back with my answer or they might be gone by time I return,” the boy added looking up at the doctor imploringly. The doctor removed his hand from the boy’s shoulder and the boy stood up and headed straight back to his horse. “Colonel says you better be ready to move by dark or forget about following him. He told me to tell you that they’ll be moving fast,” the boy said over his shoulder and stepped out of the front door.
	Doctor Pratt looked around for Cassie and, spotting her, walked over to her. She was changing the dressing of a patient’s wound when the doctor walked up behind her.
	“I have to be moving on by dark. I hope that you will join me. It will not be anything pleasant but necessary.”
	Cassie looked up at the doctor as he spoke. The expression on her face became more serious with every word he spoke. “What about the men here?”
	“I will contact Pastor Grayson; he’ll know what to do. Besides, we’ve done all we can do here. All that’s left to be done is to redress wounds and spoon food into these men. Any darkie can do that. The rest is the will of God.”
	Cassie took a moment to absorb the doctor’s words. “What should we bring with us? Most of our supplies and your instruments are all over the place here and nothing is clean.”
	“Yes, have Josh and Luke gather them up and start cleaning them. We need to start packing to move immediately.”
	“Don’t you have more surgeries?” Cassie asked absentmindedly.
	“Yes, but nothing I think will do anymore good. If the colonel asks us to move with him we’ll be of more need with him than here. We have to make and stick to our priorities,” the doctor said and paused to stare off into the distance. “We’ve done our best here. It is time we move on to where our work can do the most good.”
	Cassie looked at the doctor and appeared as though she was about to cry. She took a deep breath before she spoke. “Yes doctor,” she stood up and immediately set about packing up their makeshift camp.
	Captain Brogan, being one of the walking wounded, was enlisted by Cassie to help to load the wagon with the doctor’s equipment and supplies. She now, after initially being intrigued by him, looked upon him with a degree of contempt. His running off with one of their horses significantly impacted their ability to retrieve the wounded. Her compassion for his condition had been stretched to its limit in trying to understand his motivations, and she no longer went out of her way to care for him. No other soldier had affected her like that. It made her uncomfortable, his ability to reach inside her beyond her capacity as a nurse. His actions made their relationship something beyond nurse and patient, and she had intentionally shoved aside the rest of her feelings to be a bottomless well of nursing compassion. She was now emotionally conflicted with Captain Brogan around. When she stepped out of the sanctuary, she was shocked to see the captain trying to lift a heavy table into the wagon by himself.
	“Captain, get the darkies to do that! The last thing we need is for you to make yourself any worse than you are,” she said to him from a distance. The captain, surprised by her outburst,  lost his grip on the table. Cassie approached the wagon out of sorts. Standing behind him, he could hear her agitated breathing. He turned to face her.
	“I am just trying to make up for earlier,” he said.
	“You won’t make up for it by hurting yourself worse. I just wanted you to help because it is critically we get moving.”
	“Where are you going in such a hurry?”
	“What matter is it to you, captain?”
	“I’d like to go with you.”
	“Why!”
	“I am no longer of any use as a fighting man and I would like to do something to contribute and make amends for my behavior earlier.”
	“I appreciate your intentions, but what we do is not like fighting and I doubt you could contribute much to our cause.”
	“I’d like to try,” he said as she looked him over.
	“What do you know about tending the wounded?” She asked.
	“I will know what you teach me,” he responded.
	“I’ll talk to Doctor Pratt about it and see what he thinks,” she said and walked back into the church.

	The wagon was packed and weighed down with all the equipment that was needed to rebuild their hospital. The doctor stepped outside and looked up at the sky to judge the time of day. He wiped his brow with his sleeve and shook his head as he lowered it. Cassie stepped out of the church and stood behind the doctor.
	“What now,” Cassie asked looking up at the doctor quizzically.
	“I don’t like the idea of leaving this late to follow the army,” the doctor looked at Cassie thoughtfully. “Maybe we can use that captain after all.”
	“For what?”
	“He’s better with a gun than both of us and he’d also have a pretty good idea of how an army moves.”
	“I guess.”
	“He’d be better at it than any of us would and he’s right here asking to come along,” the doctor said looking at Cassie trying to guess what she was thinking. “I know he took the horse, but he also came back. As the war goes on, we may run into more and more men in his condition.”
	“Horse thieves?”
	“No broken men trying to fix themselves. Cassie you’ve got to understand that we are dealing with proud men who are having a hard time accepting a more and more likely future of living under Yankee rule,” the doctor said and paused. “They’ll blame themselves for not trying hard enough. I figure that’s what’s festering in the captain’s mind,” the doctor stopped again to gather his thoughts. “Giving him something to do like ride with us could be the best medicine we can provide.”
	Cassie inhaled deeply and held it. She slowly exhaled while the doctor studied her waiting for an answer. “This is all very hard for me.”
	“Why?”
	“Because he affects me and keeps me from focusing on my work.”
	“No one said that our support of the cause was going to be easy or comfortable, but if this man can help us in our work then he should come with us. And you’ll just have to overlook whatever problem you have with him,” the doctor said giving her a long serious look.
	“Very well.”
	“Good. Have Josh put the tack on my horse and have the captain scout ahead for us,” the doctor said then walked back into the sanctuary.

	The morning sun blinded them as they headed due east from Corinth directly into the jaws of the fight. The captain, after meeting up with Colonel Lindsay and his staff, now rode alongside the wagon that the doctor drove with Cassie seated next to him. He was told to be aware that there would be a Confederate force coming up on them from behind to reinforce their effort to dislodge the Yankees. They were told to stay a day’s ride behind the army’s main force and be ready to respond to any possibility. Except for small talk with Doctor Pratt, Cassie had been silent for three days. She ignored the captain as he rode alongside the wagon. The longer they rode the more awkward the silence became.
	“You’ve been mighty quiet for quite some time,” Captain Brogan said after he turned his head to look at Cassie. Cassie did not respond. “Cassie, Miss Jefferson. I said you’ve been quiet for a while.” 
	“Cassie, the captain is talking to you,” Doctor Pratt said turning his head to speak directly into her ear. Cassie slowly turned her head to look at the captain.
	“Yes I have.”
	“May I ask why? I mean, I have seen you talk to the doctor on several occasions and I was thinking perhaps there was something we need to clear the air about.”
	“I do not believe so captain.”
	“So why won’t you talk to me?”
	“Because I have nothing to say.”
	“But that’s just what I mean. You should have something to say. We are going to be working together and I think it would be best if we had some sort of rapport”
	“A rapport? Why captain we do have a rapport. I am making every effort to hold my tongue and not hurt your feelings. If I said something that hurt your feelings what sort of rapport would we have then?”
	“So you are still upset with me about what happened back at the church.”
	“I believe it showed poor judgment and was selfish. We have plenty enough of that and I do not see how you bringing such traits to work such as ours will make things any easier,” she said and turned her head forward to be blinded by the sunlight. The captain did not respond immediately.
	“I have my reasons for my behavior.”
	“Really?”
	“I am a gentleman and live by the gentleman’s code. When one does something dishonorable, or thinks it was something dishonorable, it is right and proper to make amends for that.”
	“By stealing a horse?”
	“I was going to return it.”
	“When, after you single handedly won the war? I hardly see the rationality of your thinking.”
	“I was wounded and not thinking clearly.”
	“I know you were wounded captain. We had many men in the church that were wounded. Only you snuck out in the middle of the night and stole our horse.”
	“Honor does not always present the clearest of paths in its resolution.”
	“I suppose that you are not alone when it comes to making that conclusion captain,” she said and turned her head and looked at him. “I hope that you and your kind can now see the unexpected results of such thinking.”
	“Well, it’s good to see that you two have broken the ice,” Doctor Pratt said as he snapped at the reins to encourage the horses to keep moving up the incline.
 *	*	*	*
	Captain Oden Byrne’s horse reared as he pulled on the horse’s reins to turn him around. The horse had other ideas about the current skirmish they were involved in. At this point in the war, it seemed that every encounter with the Union was an exercise in dealing with overwhelming numbers and firepower. Such situations did not deter the captain. Unlike Lieutenant Colonel Martel, who felt that he was performing the will of God, Captain Byrne’s motivation was purely and simply a rabid hatred of the North and Yankee’s. He was in full revolt against anyone who was going to tell him what to do. His fiery red hair and propane blue eyes gave visual notice that he was to be approached with caution.
	When the horse’s hooves hit the ground and it reluctantly turned around, he scanned the ground behind him expecting to see the rest of his cavalry company. What he saw was an open field full of saddled horses without riders. He glowered and swore calling the company of soldiers that rode into battle with him every kind of coward that existed in his vocabulary. When he saw a few saddled soldiers riding off into a stand of trees, he spurred his horse forward and chased them down. 
	Cutting across their path, he had unsheathed his sword and made ready to fight the four men he encountered. The men were caught completely unaware, but knew their ride to safety was over when they recognized the face at the end of the sword.
	“Gentleman, the enemy is that way,” the captain said in an instructional tone.
	“Captain it’s just us!” Young Lieutenant Andrews responded. “I’d like to have better odds when I go into a fight.”
	“It’s that kind of cowardice that is the reason why we they’ve made it this far,” the captain said glaring at the lieutenant. “We must teach them that we are fearless. That we will rain down on them like brimstone. When they know that they will meet this kind of resistance everywhere they go, they will be less likely to move against us.”
	“Five men with pistols riding up against their repeating rifles, captain it will only take one of them with good aim to send us all to our maker,” Sergeant Wilkins said anxious to turn his horse and ride away.
	“I’ll have the head of the first man who moves any further toward the rear. We must bear down on them again, and again, and again until they see the depth of our resolve. Running is not an answer,” the captain responded as his horse jerked and twisted beneath him. “Who is with me?”
	The unexpected appearance of Union infantry made the decision for them. They all spurred their horses to put some distance between them and the attacking force. They rode toward a wooden fence that spanned the large field on which they fought. Minutes before, it was crowded with Union troops that decimated their formation, but now, they had moved and the fence was sparsely defended. The captain, realizing their change in fortune let out a rebel yell as the men galloped across the field. His elation was premature. The sergeant was correct in his earlier assessment. A single Union soldier steadied himself against the fence, and shot them out of their saddle one at a time. The captain was not aware of what was happening until he could see Sergeant Wilkins, who rode next to him, fall from his saddle and hit the ground. The captain pulled at the reins to slow and turn his horse. He rode up on the sergeant quickly who had somehow managed to get to his knees. The captain snatched his comrade up and pulled him on the saddle while the Union soldiers shot at them. He rode past the other men who lay dead or dying on the field and was now angrier than ever with his only thought being to get back to his headquarters to get another command that he could lead into battle. Out of shooting distance, the captain slowed his horse and the two men headed for where they hoped they would find help. Much to the captain’s annoyance, the sergeant bled on the his uniform. He couldn’t help but think how unpresentable he would appear with a dying man hanging on to him.
They rode along slowly, and the sergeant’s blood began to soak through the captain’s uniform so he could feel it against his skin. He found it uncomfortable and was tempted to leave the sergeant leaning against a tree but thought better of it.
	A wagon load of wounded drew Captain Byrne’s attention to a plantation manor house in the distance. It looked derelict, but the activity going on around it suggested otherwise. He turned his horse and headed toward the house. The injured man that he carried was barely conscious with his grip on the captain’s back becoming more tenuous by the minute. The captain was anxious to free himself of his burden. Finally, the sergeant fell unconscious and became the dead weight that he was perceived to be. Exhaustion crept up on Captain Byrne too. The two men passed a barn that had been looted and was now used to house the wounded. The smell from it acted as a smelling salt bringing the drowsy cavalryman back to full consciousness. The entire area was abuzz with activity, slaves unloading the wounded and placing them on stretchers, civilians kneeling over soldiers giving comfort, and a physician in a bloody apron giving orders. It was the last thing that Captain Byrne remembered before he passed out.
	The two men that entered the area of the manor house on horseback were ignored until they both slid off and fell to the ground. Cassie yelled to a slave to put the two men on stretchers and see to the horse. It was another hour before someone got around to tending to the two men. The sergeant had died, but Captain Byrne was still alive and just need a flesh wound stitched up. Doctor Pratt had long since delegated such tasks to Cassie and Captain Brogan. They, in turn, were kept busy with sewing up the wounded rarely taking the time to wash up between procedures doing what they could as quickly as they could then hoping for the best. Such was the fate of Captain Byrne. The enmity between Cassie and Captain Brogan had long since dissipated in the weeks that had passed after they set up shop outside of Athens Georgia. They had become two links in chain used to pull the dying from the jaws of death.
	The steady stream of injured was a clear signal that things were not going well for their cause. On several occasions it was rumored that they may have to relocate or even be overrun by Union forces. It was cause for concern. Especially since, at times, gun and cannon fire was so close that voice had to be raised to be heard and the smell of gunpowder would permeate the area around the manor house. It distracted soldier and caregiver alike. The soldiers felt vulnerable being caught without their weapons. The caregivers feared being prevented from tending to the soldiers that fought for their cause. In the meantime, the flow of wounded continued as did the efforts of those who cared for them.

 

Chapter 10 – Going Guerilla
	The Confederate winter offensive had gone from bad to worse. The effort to expel or distract the Union from executing their plan to take Atlanta was not working. The combined forces of General Forrest and General Hood only managed to increase the number of Confederate casualties and further embolden the Union forces to pursue the Confederate forces into Northern Alabama and beyond. Every line the Confederates formed collapsed under the weight of superior numbers and firepower.
	The precarious state of the of the Confederate line that wobbled like a soap bubble was not known by Doctor Pratt, Cassie, or John Brogan. They had a different set of concerns that centered on individuals. They had spent weeks living and working under the constant threat of being overrun; they had all lost their sense of fear. That is why when a particularly intense volley of cannon and rifle fire occurred, the only concern of those giving medical care was whether they had enough space and supplies for the new wave of wounded. Cassie looked around the grounds of the abandoned plantation calculating minimum space requirements and rearranging the placement of the wounded they already had. She did this as she wrung a blood soaked towel before rinsing it in a tub of water.
	John Brogan was also busy and unconcerned about the implication of what was occurring just outside of the grounds of the plantation. His hands were raw from the constant stitching he performed sewing closed the men that had open wounds. He too, was concerned about having enough time to get to everyone who needed his attention. 
	Doctor Pratt, in his make shift surgery, which used to serve as the manor house’s dining room, was focused only on performing surgery as quickly and effectively as possible. He no longer heard the violence of the war around him, just the wail and yells from its pain. He would cut, probed, and amputated until he passed out and one of the slave attendants would have to pick him up and lay him in one of the makeshift beds until he woke again. 
	The noise of war came ever closer and was ignored by those who worked in and around the manor house. It was ignored until Captain Brogan noticed Confederate infantrymen running through the grounds with panicked expressions. Some of the soldiers were armed, others were unarmed. The armed soldiers would stop and fire, then they would continue running. Their expressions struck deep in the captain’s psyche dredging up the memory of the day he lost his men. When he stopped stitching, he looked around to see how agitated the walking wounded were. Captain Byrne was particularly agitated. When he followed Captain Byrne’s line of sight saw the source of his agitation. Forming up at the hedge that delineated the edge of the grounds of the manor house were Union infantrymen. There were more than just a few and far too many for those on hand capable of fighting could adequately resist.
	Captain Brogan’s first thought was what to do with the seriously injured, but he realized that there was not enough time to do anything for them. There was time to get Cassie, the doctor, and the slaves and run. As John Brogan ran toward the barn where he last saw Cassie, Captain Byrne ran around the grounds bellowing orders trying to organize the walking wounded into a fighting force. His effort seemed hopeless as there were no weapons available, but that did not stop Captain Byrne. When John Brogan reached the barn he saw that Cassie was still unaware of the situation outside and was still tending wounded. He had to go and drag her away from the man that she tended. Cassie kicked, scratched, and screamed every step of the way to the entrance of the barn. He finally put her over his shoulder so he could move faster. Outside of the barn she was no less calm and John Brogan had to restrain her as she looked at him wild eyed and spitting.
	He locked his hand around her wrist and drug her by her arm headed for the manor house to get Doctor Pratt. He didn’t remember when she stopped struggling but she did; when he turned his head to see if she was still behind him he saw a look of fear and anxiety on her face that he had never seen before. She looked as though she was a mother who had just lost her baby. Captain Brogan wanted to stop and console her but he knew there was no time.
	Captain Brogan and Cassie found the doctor in the middle of an operation. When they implored him to leave with them he responded by saying. “Take the niggers and go! I have work to do here.” The doctor snarled. 
John Brogan had never heard such strong words from the doctor and realized that he wasn’t going anywhere. He looked at Cassie hoping that she was ready to leave without a struggle. She gave him a gentle nod and the two of them left the doctor and headed west on foot. As they went they were surrounded by panicked and fearful soldiers. They started down the road that went west but saw that it was filled with soldiers, some moving away from the fight and others trying to rally and form a fighting line. John Brogan realized that this was no place for Cassie to be and turned north at the first crossroads hoping to find a safe place for the two of them temporarily. Behind them, the sound of war followed marked by sporadic rifle and cannon fire that waxed and waned in intensity. Cassie’s well worn shoes gave out after several miles and they were able to find a spring house in which the two could take shelter in for a while. Inside the spring house they sat in silence, just listening to each other breathe, trying to make sense of a world that just blew up in their face.

Of the many negative traits that Captain Byrne had, fear was not one of them. He spat on the ground behind Captain Brogan as Captain Brogan headed for the barn. Coward Captain Byrne thought to himself. The captain headed for the high ground to make himself conspicuous to the other Confederate soldiers. Along the way, he managed to wrestle a revolver away from one of the retreating soldiers. On the high ground he waved the revolver above his head and shouted wildly taunting the Union soldiers to shoot at him. It was not long before they obliged him. The shots missed him as he walked back and forth waving his arms. Some of the retreating soldiers noticed him and rallied around him. The rallying soldiers who could shot back at the Union soldiers who weren’t quite strong, or foolish, enough to cross the open field. When there were roughly a dozen soldiers around the captain he formed them up and had them prepare to charge. The sight energized the other soldiers retreating and walking wounded soldiers enticing more and more of them to rally to the captain. It was not long before Captain Byrne and his men established a temporary picket line.
Those who had not seen the captain before looked back at him in awe. His red hair, fiery blue eyes, and bellowing voice relit the flame of hope in many. That was before the Union response. The Union soldiers held their ground knowing that the manor house and surrounding area were targeted for shelling. When it started, it appeared as though the shelling was directed specifically at the manor house, but that was because the shells from the early rounds came from the same battery. As the other batteries started firing, the entire area was inundated with cannon fire. Those who were unable to move were slaughtered. Those who could move followed the captain as he retreated down the west road. After the barrage all that was left in the area around the manor house was splintered wood and shredded flesh.

Captain Byrne now had his new command. It numbered roughly sixty men but grew as he picked up stragglers still willing to fight and die for the cause. The captain was also able to procure a horse. It was one of the many riderless horses that roamed free after such skirmishes. At the head of his new formation, Captain Byrne rode the horse with ever growing pride, but his actions did not come without a price. The wound that Captain Brogan had stitched up was becoming undone by his activity. It had even started to bleed and the bleeding was getting worse. He knew he would need further medical attention soon, but he dared not let his condition be known to his men fearing that they would abandon him. His concern over his condition grew with the increased discomfort he felt from his wound.

Captain Byrne and his men camped some five mile northwest of the manor house in an open pasture that sat as a plateau overlooking the surrounding area. The sunny and dry October weather had given way to the damp and wet weather of November. The morning, afternoon, and evening of sunny days became the light and dark of grey winter days. In the mornings there was mist that either fell from the sky or rose from the ground that was, in the morning, warmer than the air. In this mist sounds could be heard without being able to see its source. For the inexperienced, it was easy to get lost. That was why there was no great surprised when a small Union supply train rode into camp thinking they had reached their destination. The young lieutenant that led the wagon train stopped the wagons, jumped off, and was greeted by the barrel of a pistol that rested at the end of his nose. There was no fight, just a sudden change of ownership.
The contents of the wagons were gone through anxiously with the anticipation of finding food, uniforms, or blankets. Nothing of that sort was found. The wagons contained weapons and ammunition. Two of the wagons were filled with repeating rifles and ammunition. The frustrated and empty bellied soldiers went to report what occurred to their new commander who was still asleep. He did not handle being awakened well, and it took him some time before he came to see what had been captured, but when he was helped into the back of one of the covered wagons, he clasped his hands together as though he was about to pray and looked heavenward.
“God has given me my answer,” he said to Sergeant Jeffries the sergeant who supervised the capture of the wagons.
“Sir?” The sergeant asked somewhat confused. “The men are hungry. We could have used food more than we could have used this. Some of these men haven’t eaten for the better part of a week”
“Sergeant, with guns food can be commandeered. Even from armed Yankees,” the captain said as he looked over the new found bounty. “But I understand your point. Organize foraging parties to scour the area in search of food. I’m sure they’ll find something.”
“Right away sir,” the sergeant replied and started out of the wagon.
“And sergeant, be sure and issue the parties the new weapons and a generous supply of ammunition to help ensure cooperation,” the captain said as he made his way to the back of the wagon.
“Yes sir,” the sergeant replied and helped the captain out of the wagon sensing he was in some discomfort.

Cassie and John Brogan had found comfort in each other arms that night and had fallen asleep next to each other. They were surprised when the door of the spring house was kicked open and a small group of Confederate soldiers entered. The four soldiers eyed John Brogan and Cassie warily in the dimly lit spring house.
“What are you doing here?” One of the soldiers asked.
“Our position was overrun by Yankees and we were forced to retreat. We used the spring house for shelter during the night,” Captain Brogan replied as he stood up and got in between the soldiers and Cassie.
“I don’t know any of our units that have women in them,” the soldier said brusquely. “Are there anymore of you in here?”
“No,” Captain Brogan replied.
“Outside so we can get a good look at you,” the soldier said and gestured at them with his rifle.
The captain and Cassie stepped outside into the dull grey light of day. The soldiers followed close behind them.
“Far enough,” the soldier said. He stood in front of them and looked them up and down before he walked around them carefully looking them over. “How did you two get so much blood on you? Neither of you are wounded.” 
“We worked at the manor house down the road tending Confederate wounded.” Cassie said incensed by the question.
“We didn’t see no manor house,” the soldier replied.
“No you didn’t,” Captain Brogan responded getting angry himself. “The Yankee’s shelled it. I don’t suppose they left anything behind to be seen. We were forced to leave when they started and ended up here.”
The soldier stared at the couple as he thought. “Come on with us. The captain will know what to do with you,” he said and gestured with his rifle for them to start walking in front of him.
Captain Byrne was surprised, pleased, and suspicious when he saw Captain Brogan and Cassie. His aching wound spoke to him first demanding desperately needed attention, but his desire to maintain control overruled the pain from his wound. “So captain, I see that you have managed to save yourself and your lady from the shelling. How many of our valiant wounded were you able to save?” Captain Byrne asked with the intent of preventing any doubt which of the two would command the group of men. The men that stood around Cassie and Captain Brogan smiled and snickered at the question. Cassie started to speak up, but Captain Brogan gently squeezed her wrist. His action did not go unnoticed by those around them.
“We work to heal the wounded. We were unarmed and had no time to move the infirmed, but I see that we are not alone amongst those who escaped the shelling,” Captain Brogan replied looking around at the faces of all the men that stood nearby.
“Of course,” Captain Byrne replied with less. “We may need a pair like you around before long,” Captain Byrne said and looked at Sergeant Jefferies. “Break this up and make sure the woman is kept under guard by men you trust. I want both of them watched closely, but for now I will speak to Captain Brogan in private.”
“Yes sir,” the sergeant said and turned to the group of men that had gathered. “What’s all this standing around for?” The sergeant bellowed. “We have some food to find and not a lot of light left to find it in. Let’s get going!” The sergeant added and the group of men quickly dispersed.

Undercover of the wagon that Captain Byrne’s men confiscated and under the watchful eye of Sergeant Jefferies, Captain Brogan stitched Captain Byrne’s wound back up. It was a difficult job due to the fact that the wound had started to knit and dirt had reentered the wound.
“It’s a good thing my men came across you two,” Captain Byrne said from behind sweat, a grimace, and gritted teeth.
“You really should stay off your feet for a while until this wound is well healed,” Captain Brogan said between stitches as sewed the wound back together as best he could. “On horseback this wound will never get a chance to heal correctly.”
“You let me worry about that Brogan.”
“It may be the death of you.”
“If I die, you die. You hear me Brogan.”
“I hear you, but I am not God. You’ve got to give your body a chance to mend,” Captain Brogan replied as he continued to stitch the wound.
“I have to stay on my feet to lead my men Brogan and I will need you and the woman to stay with me until I am well enough to go without you.”
“This war, it, it’s almost over. We can’t keep throwing ourselves at them like this.”
“Ah, but that’s where you are wrong. We just need a new strategy.”
“What strategy could work for us now?”
“We all need to withdraw to our homes and fight them from there. They will never be able to manage a war against us if they have to shoot up and burn every farm and plantation between here and the Mississippi.”
“You mean go guerilla? We’d just bleed each other to death. Where is the honor in fighting like that?” Captain Brogan asked as he finished stitching the wound cutting the thread by biting it with his teeth.
“You would prefer surrender?” Captain Byrne asked clearly agitated but in too much pain to move suddenly.
“I would prefer peace before we run out of thread to stitch up men like you,” Captain Brogan replied then leaned back to relax.
“Sergeant, take this man back and keep him with the woman. Keep a close eye on them. We’ll be moving west by north with tomorrow’s light.”
“Yes sir,” the sergeant replied and reached out toward Captain Brogan to grab him by the arm.
“West by north, why that way? There’s nothing out that way,” Captain Brogan asked as the sergeant tugged on his arm to pull him out of the wagon.
“You will see Captain, you will see,” Captain Byrne replied as the sergeant pulled Captain Brogan away from the wagon.

The word of the Confederate loss at Nashville reached the now renegade band of Confederates. Most of the men spoke of it in murmurs, others talked out loud about Captain Byrne’s plan to go home and fight the Union from their homes. Food was scarce and many of the men were that much more irritable because of it. The sight of the possibility of food, such as a barn or chicken coop excited the men to near mutiny. It was only Captain Byrne with his willingness to shoot those who did not obey him and help from his core of recruits that enforced his rule that order was maintained.
For Cassie and Captain Brogan, they felt as though they were prisoners of the very cause for which they fought. Their only relief being a respite from tending the constant flow of wounded. The long series of cloudy days, broken up by cold clear days, numbed their senses. They went from where every waking minute was a fight to hold back the tide of death to the minutes stretching into hours as they plodded along with the other soldiers as they headed into Missouri bound for Arkansas where Captain Byrne planned to fight a guerilla war.
 

Chapter 11 – New Roots
	The spring of 1867 had been rainy, but the dry spell that they had been due for had finally arrived. Cassie had been in the habit of getting up at dawn’s twilight to make ready for the day, performing tasks which included waking her husband. Before she woke John Brogan she would walk around their farmhouse and look at its contents as it was awash in the magenta and pink of the new day. She sat in the parlor of their farmhouse and thought about their excursion up to Keller’s Point earlier that week. Being the highest point in the valley it overlooked the little town of Catensville Missouri where they had settled. For her, the view was captivating. She could see the entire valley the little town, the surrounding farms, and Cameron Creek which cut its way through the entire panorama. Cassie loved the silence and stillness. The farmhouse, which was bought with money Cassie had left over from Paris, was fairly large. It was a two story structure with windows on all sides and walls of stone and mortar that had been whitewashed. The windows opened out, and on sunny days aired out the interior in no time. The furniture was simple. The kitchen table was a rectangular slab of wood that had benches flanking its long side. The parlor had a couch, two chairs, and a piano which was her one indulgence. There were chimneys on each end of the house that facilitated fireplaces in many of the rooms of the house. Although it was rare that they were all lit, it allowed the entire house to be kept comfortably warm on cold winter days. 
	As the sunlight went from pink, to orange, and then yellow, Cassie decided it was time to wake her husband so they could begin their day. She went back upstairs to the bedroom where her husband slept and, after kissing his forehead, she gently nudged him awake as she had done so many times before. It had become ritual with them on mornings when she had to wake him. Most mornings John Brogan was up before the sun with his wife, but on mornings after a particularly strenuous day in the fields he would sleep in. This tendency was thought by both of them to be a residual effective of the war and tolerated by both: more she then he. Cassie went about the kitchen preparing a picnic basket while John Brogan got up, dressed, and stepped out to do the morning chores. At the same time Cassie fired up the stove and began cooking breakfast. It had been the better part of an hour before he returned to wash up and get dressed for Church.
	Cassie had breakfast waiting on the table by time John Brogan finished dressing and made his way back down to the kitchen. It was a simple fare that he consumed heartily. He was partial to how she prepared ham with fresh baked biscuits for him and applied generous portions of blackberry preserves on the biscuits. Cassie sat and watched him eat with an expression of serenity that she shared only with him. It was work to keep their little piece of heaven going, but it was moments such as this, when she could enjoy the fruit of her labors, that made the work worth doing.
“John.”
“Yes?” He responded with a mouth full of food.
“Did you ever think we would make it this far?”
	“What’d you mean? We’ve been here for two years now?” He said while he chewed his food.
	“I mean when we first met. Did you think that we’d end up together?”
	“When we first met? When we first met I didn’t even know who I was then. You know that. Think about what you thought of me, and actually, I don’t blame you for what you thought of me,” he stopped to swallow and drink a mouthful of coffee. “We’ve talked about this many times. What war does to people. I’m just glad we are out here away from the South and the carpet baggers and vengeful Yankees,” he added and bit into another piece of ham followed by biscuit and started chewing.
	“Do you think that people like us are rewarded for wanting to keep on, settled down, and keep the wheel of life turning?” She asked and then took a sip of  her coffee.
	John Brogan continued chewing until he had swallowed enough to speak. “I think we have what we have because it is what we wanted. We fought the war and lost. We have to accept that as the settling of the matter. It has taken me a long time, but to live like Byrne and his renegades is not living at all,” he washed the rest of his food down with what was left in his cup of coffee and swallowed. “He’s not fighting for the cause any more. He’s just out there spreading his hate like poison. Burning and pillaging the farms of those who have done him no harm. There’s no honor in that,” he added and stood up. “We better get out of here or we’ll be late for church.” 
Cassie smiled and stood up across from him. John Brogan reached across the kitchen table to take her hand. He walked her out of their farmhouse and lifted her into their wagon that waited with the horse already hitched and ready to go.
	The muddy road did not detract from the good spirits the ride put them. The air was thick with the smell of hundreds of freshly plowed acre, mixed with fresh air, and invisible clouds of the smell of some newly blossomed flower or tree. The trees and bushes of the windbreaks between the fields were tinged with the yellow green of buds bursting to greet the sun or leaves in the first couple of weeks of life. The air was filled with the sound of various singing bird and the odd trickling stream. All of this topped off by the gentle warmth of a long absent spring sun. The entire effect, along with the ride on the wagon was intoxicating.
	Catonsville was a small town and existed only to support the surrounding farm communities. It was very much to their surprise to the entire community when the railroad came through and even built a small freight and passenger station. The rest of the town consisted of two general stores, a small hotel and boarding house, a livery stable, two churches, and some other small government and business offices. At a gallop, a man could ride from one end of town to the other in well under a minute, but to the towns inhabitants it was just big enough to serve all of their needs. It took Cassie and John Brogan more than a minute to go through town at the relaxed pace at which they moved.
	The church Cassie and John Brogan attended stood at the west end of Catensville’s main street. It was similar to the church in which they first met but was undamaged by the ravages of war. On one side of the church was a long hitching post where the congregation could leave their horses. On the other side was an open field that was starting to come alive with grasses and spring prairie flowers. Behind the church was the consecrated ground of the congregational graveyard. The church itself did not have stained glass that depicted a particular image; instead it had panes of colored glass some of which were cut into geometric shapes. The inside of the sanctuary was simple with an altar and pulpit at one end and pews for the congregation filling in the rest of the space. John and Cassie were typically some of the first of its members to arrive since she had become the de facto church organist. John Brogan stopped in front of the church and helped Cassie off of the wagon. He watched her walk into the church; he then walked the horse over to secure it to the hitching posted.
	John eagerly walked back to the church so he would not miss a minute of Cassie playing. It was one of his favorite parts of his Sunday. To watch and listen to his wife play hymns on the organ and every once in a while play something from her time in Paris. It was all beautiful music to him, and he had a favorite seat where he would listen to her play. Like clockwork, Pastor Goodwin would stop by and greet him on his way to the front door to welcome his congregation.
	John Brogan was known to be in the habit of closing his eyes when he listened to Cassie play. He did this before and during the service; it was a thing that the congregation had become used to. Today was no different. He sat in his seat with his hands clasped together in his lap, and  as usual, Pastor Goodwin walked by and in his resonant voice said “Good morning brother Brogan.” John Brogan would respond by giving the pastor a serene nod. It was like an acknowledgement to all involved that all was well. 
The church organ had its own story. It had been given up for ruin before Cassie’s arrival. The previous church organist, and even the man hired to fix the organ, had said it was broke beyond repair and was a lost cause. Cassie, through patience and the desire to play it, was able to coax music from it. It was broke. It had keys that made no sound and stops that would squealing at such a high pitch as to hurt the ears of humans and cause dogs and coyotes alike to howl. Such was the organ’s predisposition, but after a good cleaning and persistent attempts Cassie to play it, it finally yielded. The congregation remembered the day she got it to play being the day before advent; it has not missed a Sunday service since. Others who have tried to play it still remain unsuccessful.
	Perhaps it was the weather, or the time of year, or a congregation that was healing from the scars of war, but the pastor’s sermon that day proved to be particularly uplifting. The sermon, accompanied by Cassie’s playing and particularly well chosen set of hymns left all present emotionally and spiritually fulfilled: if just temporarily. Cassie played the postlude on the piano and the sunlight that poured through the church’s front door as the congregation exited added to the effect to the moment.
	John Brogan waited for Cassie as she gathered up the sheet music from the day’s performance and together they walked toward the door of the church where Pastor Goodwin was waiting to greet them.
“Your wife plays beautifully,” Pastor Goodwin said smiling broadly at both of them as he shook John Brogan’s hand. Pastor Goodwin turned to face Cassie. “Mrs. Brogan, we all do so appreciate your playing Sundays. You have brought new life to the voices of the congregation.”
“I am so glad,” Cassie replied. Her cheeks flush with embarrassment.
“In fact, your playing has inspired some in the congregation to suggest that we start a fund for a church organ. Of course, I told them that we would need the consent of you and Brother Brogan,” the pastor said looking primarily at Cassie.
“I think that would be wonderful,” Cassie replied to the pastor and turned to speak to her husband. “What do you think John?”
“I am more than willing to share your musical talent with the rest of the congregation.”
“The current organ is fine although it can be moody at times, but if you feel that such a purchase would be good for the congregation I would be glad to oblige.”
 	“Splendid, I’ll share the good news! We’ll see you next Sunday,” he patted John Brogan on the back as the couple passed by and turned his attention to the couple behind them.
John Brogan and Cassie walked down the stairs of the church and toward their buckboard tethered among the other assembled buckboards. He helped Cassie in, untethered the horse and climbed aboard himself. He then urged the horse forward and they amble away from the church down the road that went back through the town and to their farm. 
“I am glad the others enjoy your playing as much as I do. The pastor’s request makes me feel like we’ve have planted some roots here,” John Brogan said.
“Pastor Goodwin is a fine man. I wish we had known him when we got married,” Cassie said as she nodded in agreement.
“John, we aren’t going straight home are we?”
“Why?”
“I packed us a little picnic basket. I thought it would be nice if we can stop and eat it in that meadow on the other side of the bridge over Castor’s Creek,” She said as John Brogan turned his head and smiled at her. He then turned his head back and snapped at the reins urging the horse to move faster.

	The rumble of the horse drawn wagon crossing the wooden bridge disturbed the quiet of the meadow that had been freshly carpeted with soft grass and wild flowers. After he stopped the horses, the gentle gurgle of the stream could be heard along with the songs of various birds. He got down off of the wagon and helped Cassie down. From under the seat he retrieved a picnic basket and an old horse blanket which he carried in one hand and held his free hand out for Cassie. The two walked out into the meadow and found a spot that was relatively dry but close enough to capture the atmosphere of the creek with the various bugs fluttering on and above its surface. Seated on the blanket, Cassie reached into the basket and pulled out two sandwiches. She handed one to John and started eating the one she kept for herself. They ate the sandwiches in silence. She didn’t speak until she reached into the basket looking for another sandwich.
“John, are you ever going to get rid of that sword and gun that colonel gave you?” Cassie asked as she groped around the inside of the basket looking at John to see his reaction.
“I don’t know. I don’t plan to,” he replied absentmindedly not looking at her when he spoke.
“Why do you keep it? I mean, we’re here now. The war is over, we’ve put down roots, and we have a farm. We don’t need those other things,” Cassie said searching try to make eye contact with him.
“You still don’t understand, those things mean something to me.”
“What could they mean to you now?” Cassie asked still trying to make eye contact.
“They are the symbols of a man’s honor. Now they are mine. I can’t just throw them away,” John Brogan responded finally making eye contact.
“Then what else can you do with them? Honor died with the war.”
“For some men honor never dies.”
“What about us and now? Aren’t you happy? Doesn’t us being together and having a farm, peace, and a place to set down roots mean enough to let go those old memories?”
“A man lives by a code or he is not a man. The colonel and I were betrayed by another who we thought was a man of honor,” John Brogan said and looked away. The couple went back to eating their sandwiches in silence.  Cassie finished eating her sandwich first.
“Didn’t we get enough of that kind of honor during the war? I want the good kind of honor. The kind of honor your love brings me. That’s an easy kind of honor. It’s the kind of honor that everyone can live with,” she said and paused to think. ”Are you ever going to tell me what he said to you?”
“Who?”
“That colonel.” 
“That? It was nothing.”
“Then why did he leave you those things?”
“That? That is between us,” John Brogan replied and looked in her direction but past her at something in the distance.
“The colonel is gone. I’m your wife and I am here, now, alive,” Cassie said moving her head hoping to regain eye contact.
“There’s nothing to tell,” John Brogan replied flatly. Cassie stared at him in frustration and disbelief then bit into a fried chicken leg and started chewing. 

Chapter 12 – The Ghost Returns
	The shadows from the fence posts of the fields John Brogan plowed grew noticeably longer. The field had not be turned in quite some time and proved to be difficult to plow. As he plowed it became obvious to him that parts of the field had never been properly plowed and the field had more than likely been pasture for grazing. He encountered rocks, stumps of dead trees, and soil so full of clay it did not crumble as much as it cleaved. He had to stop frequently to rest himself and his horse.
	It was during one of these rest periods that his memory of the conversation that he had had with Cassie about the pistol, sword, and the promise he had made to their owner. It had been quite some time since he had really thought about the promise, being more caught up in getting married and fixing up their homestead. Cassie had a way of getting into a man’s head. He both appreciated and loathed her stubbornness. She was easy to live with as long as you agreed with her, but for the person who disagreed with her she could be dogged. Not that she was irrational, but her persistence over an issue or a task took on a life of its own. Such was the situation with the colonel and his weapons. John Brogan rationalized their continued existence as a remembrance of an honorable man and his death due to another man’s treachery. Cassie saw them as a symbol of everything she hated about the war. He remembered several occasions when he brought the subject up with her and how she was not interested in discussing it, and now she wants these items to cast away to either rust or become the possessions of someone else. To do that to the colonel’s weapons after what the two men had been through he felt was unacceptable. John Brogan knew it was time to start back to work when he realized that his memories had him talking out loud saying ‘no’ shaking his head no at the same time.
	The train of thoughts had followed him to his work behind the plow. The shadows of the fence posts started to take on the likeness of men as the day wore on and shadows grew longer. Maybe there was something similar between the smell of the earth that he plowed and the smell of the church the night he talked with the colonel, but, whatever it was, the colonel’s last words echoed in his head. The breathing of both he and his horse was labored. The sound of the plow as it cut through the ground beneath him, and the sound of the birds that were all around him disappeared and were replaced by the wheezy and weak voice of the colonel; the tone of voice, its anger, disgust, and subtle desperation flooded his memory as the colonel told him about how and by whom they had betrayed. It gained so much control over his thoughts that he forgot what he was doing and didn’t stop at the end of the row. He walked into the plow because the horse had the sense to stop. It wasn’t until then he caught on to how exhausted he was that he stopped again to rest.
	The late afternoon sun had touched to top of the trees when John Brogan made it to the fence that he used as a temporary seat on which to rest. The horse that was not far away glistened with perspiration. He realized that he usually didn’t work his animals this hard and it dawned on him that it was one of the feelings that he and Cassie shared: empathy. It opened the door to his memories of the two of them working together helping the wounded, running from one injured man to another, and how sometimes they would decide together to leave a particularly compelling case alone to die, but such thoughts drug him back, too far back, into the past. The image of Private Greene came to mind. He remembered how the private ran around in the field confused, afraid for his life, with gunfire and grapeshot flying all around him. He remembered the feeling of weakness in his legs and the helplessness as he watched Private Greene fall to his knees before he died not being able to help. He thought about Private Greene’s fear and how much it must have been like the fear of all his other men who were cut to pieces experienced that day in the field. At that moment, John Brogan realized that he was crying. He also realized it was too late in the day to do anymore and got ready to go home where Cassie was waiting and probably wondering what was keeping him.

The light of the sunset faded into blues in violets throughout most the interior of the farmhouse. Kerosene lamps had been lit in the parlor to illuminate the piano that Cassie played. She would stop intermittently to listen for her husband and then continue to keep herself from worrying. It wasn’t until the blanket of star covered half the sky did she hear the stirrings of John Brogan as he put the horse in the barn. Cassie went back to playing waiting for him to step through the door.
Cassie stopped playing the piano when John Brogan walked in. He was dirty from working in the fields but it did not stop her from getting up and wrapping her arms around him.
“You must be exhausted. I thought you’d be back earlier than this. I made a stew. Are you hungry?” she asked. John Brogan nodded. “Have a seat and I’ll fix you a bowl.”
John Brogan walked from the parlor and into the kitchen. While Cassie went about fixing a bowl of stew he washed his hands and face. When he finished washing up he sat down at the kitchen table. She put the bowl down in front of him and he began to eat.
“Is everything okay?” Cassie asked as she sat down across from him.
John Brogan stopped eating to speak. “It’s back,” He said.
“What’s back?”
“The memories, the war, the fighting.” 
“Oh, honey. I hope what I said didn’t dredge all this back up. We were doing so well.”
“It’s not you. It’s me. I can’t let go and I know I should.”
“Why don’t you. Tell me where that gun and sword are, and I will take them out and bury them or throw them in the creek never to be seen again.”
“I want to, but I can’t.”
“Why not!”
“Because I made a promise.”
“To a dead man?”
“To a dying man. A dying man who felt the need to share his last words with me.”
“But John, you don’t even know if he knew what he was saying, or what he was saying was the truth.”
“Colonel Martel was man of honor. He wouldn’t knowingly tell a lie. We were betrayed and that betrayal must be paid for.”
“But why you?”
“I’ve said enough. Let’s just leave it alone. I just can’t let go, not yet,” John Brogan said and went back to eating his stew. Cassie watched him in silence. She studied his face as he ate. After a while, she got up, went back to the piano, and began playing a Chopin nocturne. John Brogan finished his stew and walked into the parlor where Cassie was playing the piano. She stopped playing when he walked up behind her and hugged her from behind.
“It’s not easy anymore. Before, I know who the enemy was and where they were. Now, sometimes, I feel that the enemy is me,” John Brogan said then released his embrace and sat on a chair in the parlor. She continued playing until he fell asleep.

John Brogan pulled up in front of the town’s general store on his buckboard under an overcast sky that signaled a change in the weather. He was tethering his horse when the quiet was broken by the approach of a column of Cavalry soldiers. At the end of the formation was a cannon. Their arrival upset John Brogan remained and he remained so after the formation passed. Peter, one of the store attendants, stepped out to from the front of the store to help him.
“Are you all right Mr. Brogan?” Peter asked. John Brogan, leaning against the seat of the buckboard, turned and stared at Peter glassy eyed.
“Greene?” Brogan asked.
“No, it’s Peter. Are you okay Mr. Brogan?” Peter replied and looked at John Brogan curiously.
“Peter, yes. Peter, yes I am fine. I just need to sit a minute,” John Brogan said and stumbled toward the steps of the General Store.
“Are you sure?” Peter asked.
“Yes, Peter I’m fine. Just let me sit here a minute. I guess I am a little more tired from planting than I thought,” John Brogan said and sat down on the steps to rest.
“Did you see the cavalry come through?” Peter asked. John Brogan looked up at Peter. He still seemed a little weak.
“Yes, I did,” John Brogan replied gathering his thoughts as though he had been clubbed.
“We heard they were coming through looking for Confederate sympathizers and renegades. I heard that there were still bunches of them still riding around these parts.”
“I thought that they would all be done with that. The war has been over for two years.”
“Do you know about any of them Mr. Brogan? I mean, you being ex Confederate and all.”
“That part of the war is over for me.”
“Really? After all the fighting and dying people have done? They just go home like the end of a harvest?”
“Most do. The ones that weren’t hurt.”
“You mean like shot or lost a leg or an arm?”
“Yeah, something like that.”
“Gee, you think if it was that easy why did they do all that fighting for?”
“Because they said they would.”
“Huh?” 
“Someday you’ll understand.”
“I don’t think I’ll ever understand that.” Peter said as he rubbed the back of his neck and face contorted into a confused expression.
John Brogan stood up refreshed. “Come on give me a hand, Peter, I’ve got some seed to load,” he said to Peter and the two walked into the general store.
*	*	*	*
	Captain Walter Noonan lifted his arm to signal his command to stop. Before him was an abandon farm. He found it particularly appealing for several reasons. It was on relatively high ground. It was close to an apparently continuous supply of fresh water, and it was situated on a quiet section of road that was not far from town. He waited patiently for the scout he sent out to reconnoiter the perimeter to return. The scout nodded at the captain when he returned. It was the news he expected. He turned to his first sergeant who waited on his horse not far behind the captain.
	“Sergeant Lucerne!” The captain barked.
	“Yes sir.”
	“Have the men set up camp here.”
	“Yes sir.”
	“We’ll probably be here a while. I want my tent pitched, sentries posted, and a sanitation ditch dug. And I want all of this done well before sundown.”
	“Yes sir!”
	The sergeant moved off to execute the captain’s commands. He could be heard in the background yelling commands and instructions. In turn, soldiers could be seen dismounting and moving into the open field trampling the spring grass and flowers. The captain spurred his horse forward and rode to the top of the hill they were on. He dismounted, pulled his field glasses from their case, and surveyed the view that he had of the surrounding area. As far as he could see there were plowed fields, prairie, or farmhouses. There was no sign of the guerilla style camp that he was hoping to see. He put his glasses away and rode back down to the bivouac that he had ordered constructed.

	Captain Noonan sat a table in his tent shaving with a straight razor when his orderly stepped in to announce the arrival of a visitor.
	“Mister Simpson to see you sir,” the orderly said.
	“Send him right in,” he replied as he continued shaving cleaning his razor in the bowl of water that sat next to him.
	Billy Simpson stepped into the captain’s tent and sneered at the sight of the captain shaving. The captain saw his expression in the mirror that he had set before him.
	“Simpson, pull up a seat. I was wondering when you and your people would catch up to us,” the captain said as he shaved the area beneath his chin.
	“My men and I try to keep a lower profile than your cavalry. You never know what you might spot if you follow behind far enough for your dust to settle,” Billy Simpson replied as he pulled up a chair close to the captain. The captain put his razor down, wiped his face with a towel and turned to face his guest.
	“My regiment and I are here to support you and your efforts to capture the renegade Captain Byrne. From our conversation with the governor I understand how imperative his capture is, but I have also done my share of occupation duty. I understand that it is the locals that know what goes on under every rock and behind each tree. I have no desire to alienate them,” the captain said in a light but resolute tone.
	“Why are you telling me this?” Billy Simpson asked through narrowed eyes.
	“I’ve read the reports and newspapers articles about how you and your men operate. This is Missouri and we are not an occupation force,” the captain replied in a more serious tone. Billy Simpson’s eye twitched as he absorbed what he was being told.
	“Yeah, well, don’t believe everything you read. What happened in those news stories has two sides and you only read one,” Billy Simpson said in matter of fact tone.
	“Okay, I just wanted be sure that we were clear about how this operation was going to move forward,” the captain stopped to pour a glass of water and drank it. Billy Simpson looked on staring blankly at him. “We are looking for a bunch of drifters. I prefer that we keep it friendly with the locals until we are sure that their sympathies are elsewhere. Even then, I think we should take it on a case by case basis. We are here for a specific reason. Let’s not let the process get in the way of the goal,” Captain Noonan said staring at Billy Simpson. Simpson did not blink, but the captain did. “Have you and your men had breakfast?” The captain asked. Billy Simpson shook his head no. “Are you going to eat here or in town?”
	“I thought I would share your words with my men and start with our activities. I like to enter the hive just after it’s been disturbed. This is a small town captain. These people will still be talking about your arrival and I would like to hear what they have to say,” Simpson said. He picked up his hat, stood up and turned to leave.
	“And Simpson,” the captain said. “Stay in touch.” 
Billy Simpson put his hat on and walked out of the tent shaking his head and muttering quietly to himself. The captain turned back around and went back to shaving.

	Billy Simpson rode up to a small group of men gathered at the top of the hill close to the spot where Captain Noonan stopped. Although these men were dressed as civilians they were clearly not farmers. None of them had the relaxed unassuming posture of a farmer, and some of them had the age lines of well-worn dark expressions. The day had turned dark and cloudy. A gentle mist fell. It was just enough to cloud glasses and fog the view of the surrounding countryside. The horses that Simpson and his men rode, built for both speed and strength, had a statuesque appearance. Such animals were proud and restless but were also disciplined. They huddled together in a semi-circle with Simpson in the middle.
	“What did he have to say?” Watkins asked.
	“You know, the typical army type. He tried to lay down his law, but he hasn’t been out here chasing that bastard for as long as we have. We all know he’s got to be hiding out somewhere down here and the local have to be helping,” Simpson said to the nods and grunts of agreement from the others. “The new captain is not going to be much help to us, at least now. We’ll see how he feels after we expose a couple of locals. We go with our regular plan. We filter into town and place ourselves in the typical places. The hotel, general store, the livery stable and what have you. We meet by that covered bridge if we have news.”
	“What about the new captain.”
	“What about him? Is he one of us? Has he been out here for all these years? No, he’s just another governor appointee reaching for that gold star. You let me handle him. Now let’s get to it,” Simpson said and the group of men broke up and rode away in different directions. Simpson did not leave right away but instead watched his men ride off. He then slowly rode back in the direction he came. In spots, the road was covered by trees. From behind one of the trees was where Sergeant Pinket was waiting. He came out onto the road when he saw it was Simpson.
	“You still with us?” Simpson asked the mounted soldier.
	“You still pay in gold?” Sergeant Pinket replied and Billy Simpson nodded his head.
	“What about your captain? I think he might be on to us.”
	“You let me handle him. If he becomes too much trouble we might have to do something with him, but of course that would be extra.”
	“Of course,” Billy Simpson replied and nodded before he galloped off down the road.
 

Chapter 13 – Loose Tongues
	The Catensville livery stable sat behind the small hotel and boarding house located in the center of town. Sunlight filtered by clouds peeked through the cracks of the stable where there were about a dozen stalls. Adjacent to the stable was the blacksmith’s shop where the sound of steel being pummeled and the smell of it being tempered in both fire and water filled the air.
Peter stood near Sven, the blacksmith, as he shoed a horse. Sven moved back and forth from the horse, to the forge, to the anvil. There were others in the stable who sat on the benches that the blacksmith used to keep tools on or place items that were still being worked.
“I’m telling you, you should have seen him. It was like seeing all that cavalry made him sick to his stomach,” Peter said as his eyes tracked the blacksmith’s movment.
“I’m sure Mr. Brogan had a good reason for acting like that. He has a big farm and a lot of work to do. It could be that he over worked himself. That’s easy to do now that it is getting warmer. I know, it happens to me sometimes,” Sven said in broken English lilted by his mother tongue.
“But why when the cavalry showed up?” Peter asked.
“Boy, you say you saw a confederate get sick when he saw the cavalry come into town?” Watkins asked giving Peter a serious look that encouraged him to continue.
“I didn’t say he was a Confederate, but he used to be. He fought the whole war as a Johnny Reb. You should hear his wife. She’s a real southern belle. She has the accent and everything,” Peter added speaking to Watkins directly.
“Don’t listen to the boy. He’s just likes listening to himself. John Brogan and his wife are decent church going people. They’ve been here since just after the war, and they’re as much trouble as rain for crops,” Sven said to Watkins pausing from his work to address him.
“I’m not trying to start any trouble,” Peter said to Sven apologetically.
“I know you aren’t, but you need to be careful what you say when there are others around. They don’t know those folks like we do,” Sven said and started back to work.

John Brogan ate his breakfast in silence as sat across from Cassie in the kitchen. It wasn’t quite sunup and Cassie had a lamp lit that filled the room with a soft yellow light. She studied John Brogan’s face trying to see if what she heard happened to her husband the previous day had any lasting effect. There was not much there to read. His lack of expression could mean many things as it was early, and he could just be tired or just in one of his silent spells. She also searched her thoughts for something to say to him. She didn’t want to say just anything to him, but she wanted to say something meaningful and uplifting. Half of her intention was to make his day more pleasant and the other half was to gauge his mood. She also knew that such a test was like trying to find the distance that a match lights kerosene. He stood up when he finished and flashed a smile at her before he turned to walk out the door on his way to seeding the fields. She waited a moment before she stood up, walked to the door, and watched him as he walked to the barn. After a long minute of darkness, she could see that he had lit a lantern and was making his way up to the hay loft where he kept the seed.
When John Brogan lit the lamp by the door of the barn he assumed that Cassie was watching him from the kitchen. He inhaled deeply and let out a sigh before he lifted the lantern to carry it further into the barn. He also knew that the light would indicate to her where he was. He held the lantern as he walked up the barn stairs to the loft and to the end of the barn opposite the farmhouse. If she was watching, he figured this might pique her curiosity. In front of him, by the loft door sat the bags of seed. He figured if she retraced his steps that her journey would end there, but John Brogan had one last place to go. He looked up into the darkness of the barn’s rafters and put the lantern down. He started climbing toward them. First he climbed over bales of hay and then grabbed hold of the support beams climbing higher until he was near the top. It was there in the darkness that he felt around for the sword and the wooden box that contained the colonel’s gun. He had to maintain a precarious hold in order to retrieve the items. Once he had the gun case in his hand he started back down. On the floor of the loft he opened the case, pulled the gun out and stuck it in the waist of his trousers. He then gathered the seed bags and his horse and headed out to the field that he planned on seeding that morning.

The spring sun had just burned off the chill of the morning. John Brogan had been seeding since sunup one of several fields that he had recently plowed. He had the revolver that Colonel Martel gave him shoved in the belt around his waist. As he paced up and down the furrowed rows of the field, he could see Jack Richmond, a neighbor approach on his buckboard. Jack stopped and waited as John Brogan approached the fence that was near the road.
“Hi John, is there a problem?” Jack Richmond asked as he looked at John Brogan from his buckboard.
“No, why?” John Brogan asked looking up at his neighbor somewhat curious.
“Well, you have a pistol in your belt. I thought that you liked us?”
“I do! It’s just that I heard that there were renegades around, and I would keep some protection with me.”
“Those people have been around since the end of the war.”
“What about the soldiers that came into town yesterday?”
“Them? They don’t know what to do with themselves since the war ended. They’ve been chasing those renegades all over the place, but them renegades always manage to be just over the next hill.”
“Oh, well. I guess there’s nothing really to be worried about then. I suppose I can keep the gun at home.”
“That’s how I figure it. Okay, John. Have good morning,” Jack Richmond said and gently snapped at the reins signaling his horse to continue on toward town.
“You too, Jack,” John Brogan said as his neighbor moved along down the road.

Jack Richmond, Perkins the store clerk, Peter, and several other townspeople stood around the counter in the general store talking. Some smoked while others were busy crunching on the latest bunch of pickles Perkin’s put out for sale. Most of the conversation centered on the arrival of the cavalry regiment, and speculation about the length of their stay.
“It was a darn strange thing seeing him out there like that. I don’t think I have ever seen a man from this town with a gun unless they’re hunting.” Jack Richmond said while the others looked on enthralled.
“You see, I told you. He’s been acting strange ever since those soldiers came to town,” Peter said attempting to momentarily grab the attention of the others.
“Come to think of it, he did say something about soldiers and them being after renegades and needing to protect himself,” Jack Richmond said as though he was thinking out loud.
“You don’t think he’s one of those renegade leaders do you?” Perkins asked.
“Oh, come on. He’s been here for almost three years, and he’s not been a peep of trouble. We shouldn’t let our imaginations get ahead of us,” Jack Richmond replied dismissively.
Billy Simpson a customer at the back of the store distracted Perkins by playing with a scale.
“Hey, you that’s not for sale,” Perkins said raising his voice so he could be heard at the back of the store.
“Sorry, I was looking for the price tag,” Billy Simpson stepped away from it getting the entire group of men to look at him. He took a quick inventory of the faces planning on following up on their conversation with each of them individually.
“Like I said, it’s not for sale,” Perkins repeated and Billy Simpson turned and quickly left the store. “There have been so many strangers in town since the soldiers arrived,” Perkins said.
“You know. Every army has its followers and hangers on,” Jack Richmond replied.
“Well, were going to have to keep a closer eye on things as long as they’re around,” Perkins responded shifting his attention back to the locals around the counter.

Billy Simpson rode into the cavalry camp. The soldiers, familiar with the sight of him, did not interfere as he rode through the camp up to the commander’s tent. He dismounted and walked up to the orderly in front of the tent. The orderly snapped to attention from his leisurely posture.
“Billy Simpson to see Captain Noonan.”
“Yes sir, Mr. Simpson,” the orderly responded then walked into the tent returning after a minute.
“The captain said to come right in Mr. Simpson.”
Captain Noonan was seated behind a folding table. Some of the buttons of his uniform were unbutton. He was smoking a cigar. “Have a seat Simpson, Cigar?” The captain asked then reclined in his chair putting his feet on the table. “What do you have for me?” He asked.
“I think we’ve found him.”
“Found who?”
“The rebel organizer.”
“Really?” Captain Noonan asked and put his feet back on the ground and sat up at the table.
“What makes you think it’s him?”
“We came here because it was the center of all the rebel activity, right?” Billy Simpson said maneuvering around to stand in front of Captain Noonan.
“Right.”
“Well this guy, Brogan. The townspeople have been talking about him. He’s been acting strange since we arrived, and it seems that he was a rebel officer during the war. He showed up here out of the blue.”
“So?”
“So his neighbor saw him today seeding his field, he’s carrying a gun. How many farmers do you know that carry a gun when they’re working a field?” Billy Simpson asked.
Captain Noonan struck a match and lit a fresh cigar. “It’s something. We can at least check him out. Send a detachment to watch his house.” Captain Noonan said then captain puffed his cigar to stoke it. “And Smith, make sure he knows we know. Maybe we can trip him up.”
Billy Simpson started to leave before the captain finished his sentence. He smiled broadly as he walked out of the tent. As was their protocol, Sergeant Pinket or one of his men always kept an eye on Simpson when he entered the camp. When Simpson exited the tent with his hat off and led his horse out of camp on foot, it was a signal to Pinket and his men that it was okay to talk to him.
“Sergeant Pinket,” Billy Simpson said as the sergeant approached him as he passed by the sergeant’s camp.
“You have work for us,” The sergeant asked as Billy Simpson stopped his horse to talk.
“There is a certain farm that I want you to observe in the fashion that we are accustomed to.”
“And who is the person to be watched?” The sergeant asked.
“An ex-confederate residing on one of the local farms going by the name of Brogan, John Brogan.”
“Brogan huh.”
“Yes, and the captain told me to tell you that you are to let him know he is being watched.”
“Really?” The sergeant asked giving Billy Simpson a sardonic smile.
“Me men my men and I will get right on it,” the sergeant said and walked back to his camp. Billy Simpson left the bivouac and headed back to town.

 

Chapter 14  – Building Anxiety
John Brogan finished his morning meal without saying a word. Cassie noisily cleaned up behind him distracted by her concern over his state of mind. He sat at the kitchen table and puts his boots on.
“You had another difficult night last night. Do you think you’ll be okay working today?” She asked.
“I’ll be fine.”
“You got enough rest?” 
“Yes,” John Brogan replied and finished putting his boots on. He stood up to leave.
“Do you want me to bring a lunch out to you?” 
“No, I’ll just take some biscuits and Jerky with me. If I work straight through I might make it home early today.”
“I’d like that.”
John Brogan kissed Cassie and left her to spend another day in the fields.

A group of Union soldiers rode up on John Brogan while he was working. They went around the fence and galloped across the field that he had just seeded. John Brogan watched their approach. Sergeant Pinket, still on his horse, stepped forward ahead of the other men as his horse snorted and panted in Brogan’s face.
“You John Brogan?” Sergeant Pinket asked.
“I am,” John Brogan replied with restrained contempt.
“My men and I have been detailed to make sure that you are safe,” Sergeant Pinket said in an officious tone.
Sergeant Pinket’s horse was agitated and made intimidating movements toward John Brogan.
“I have my neighbors to watch over me. They’ve done a pretty good job so far,” John Brogan replied contentiously.
“Is that why you have found it necessary to carry a gun when you are tending field?” Sergeant Pinket asked making his question sound more like an accusation.
“There’s no law against it.”
“No there isn’t. By the way, what kind of pistol were you carrying yesterday?” 
“The shooting kind.”
“You haven’t used it recently have you?”
“Just to stay in practice.” 
“Well Mr. John Brogan, just know that the U.S. Cavalry is watching over you, and you have never been safer than you are now. No matter where you go, you can be sure that one of us will be watching,” Sergeant Pinket said returning to an officious tone.
“I’ll be thinking of you on my next trip to the outhouse.” 
“You do that,” Sergeant Pinket said to John Brogan. “Come on boys, we don’t want to wear out our welcome,” the sergeant said after turning his head to speak to his men. The cavalrymen galloped away back across the freshly seeded field.

After a hard day of work in the field John Brogan’s sleep was restless. Images of John Brogan’s last battle fill his dreams. The last image in his dream was a cloud of dust and the cannon that he saw in town. Brogan woke up screaming. His face was sweaty.
“John, John, my God John, again?” 
“I can’t get away from it,” John Brogan said as Cassie lit the kerosene lamp on the nightstand next to her.
“This is the fifth night in a row,” Cassie said and walked around the bed to hug John Brogan.
“I know. These dreams are like pitch forks,” John Brogan said before Cassie embraced him.
“Is it the soldiers watching us that’s bothering you?”
“I don’t understand why they’re so interested in us. There were others they could be watching too,” John Brogan said. They stopped embracing.
“Maybe if we talked to them?” 
“To who? About what? If we act like we’re concerned it might make it worse.” 
“We can’t ignore them forever. This is tearing you apart. You’re tired, I’m tired.” 
“What do you want me to do? Do you want me to start fighting again?”
“I’m not asking you to fight anyone. We just need to stop them from watching us. Maybe if we knew why they’re watching us we could put an end to it.”
“And how do you suggest we do that? You want me to go talk to them?” 
“No! But we need to do something, soon,” Cassie said then paused to think. “You want me to play or sing something to help you sleep?”
“No. I think I’ll be okay.”
Cassie walked back around to her side of the bed, put the lamp out, and climbed back into bed. John Brogan wiped his brow and lay back down to sleep.

Captain Noonan was seated at his desk with his feet up. Billy Simpson paced back and forth in front of the desk.
“It’s got to be him. All our intelligence points here and he is the only likely person in town,” Billy Simpson said agitated.
“It looks to me like all you have is a lot of guesswork and town gossip. You’ve been watching him for weeks now and you’re no closer to catching him than you were when you got here,” Captain Noonan replied.
“It’s him. We just scared the rat back into its hole. We’re doing something if we just sit here watching him and keep them renegades from knowing what to do next,” Billy Simpson said as Captain Noonan relit his half-smoked cigar.
“You better be right about this Simpson. If those renegades do something while were sunning ourselves here, it’s me that’s going to look like the fool.”
Billy Simpson stopped pacing and sat down in a chair across from Captain Noonan. “You have a better idea.” 
“Yes. We back off. Let your rat out of his hole. If we lay back a bit and the renegades strike again, we have our man. If everything stays quiet then you have some more work to do.”
“Are you talking about leaving town?” 
“No, I’m thinking that you yank Pinket’s chain. Keep him in the corral for a while.”
“And in the mean time?”
“I go visit them, let them know there are no hard feelings and we see what happens,” the captain said as he pushed the stub of his cigar into the table to put out the stub.
“And what do I do?”
“You and your boys can do some fishing, but maybe their tired of that,” Captain Noonan said with a hint of sarcasm.
“Alright, but if we lose him it’ll be on you,” Billy Simpson said and abruptly got up and walked out of the tent.

Captain Noonan approached the Brogan farmhouse on horseback with two soldiers astride him. Cassie was outside doing chores when she spotted them.
“John, John, we got company!” Cassie said and stopped working stood up and walked toward the farmhouse. John Brogan walked out of the farmhouse pulling up his suspenders. Cassie walked over and stood by him. The two walked together toward Captain Noonan and stopped.
“You can stop right there,” John Brogan said sternly. Captain Noonan and the soldiers stopped. “What do you want?” 
“To talk,” Captain Noonan said calmly.
“About what?” 
“About you, about us.” 
“Okay. You can get off your horse and approach on foot,” John Brogan replied. Captain Noonan and the two other men got off their horses and started walking toward the couple.
“Just you, unless you need them to help you walk,” John Brogan said.
Captain Noonan gestured to the other two men to stop. He stepped forward alone. “Okay,” the captain approached the couple slowly holding the reins of his horse in one hand. “I understand you’re . . .,” the captain said.
“That’s close enough,” John Brogan said interrupting the captain.
“I understand that some of my men have been harassing you.”
“Me and my wife.”
“Yes, you and your wife. Good morning Mrs. Brogan. I hope that the two of you will accept this apology. My men acted in haste and outside of my countenance,” the captain said in an conciliatory tone.
“We’d be pleased to . . . ,” Cassie replied.
“Cassie, please.” John Brogan said to his wife. ”Is discipline that lax in your command?” John Brogan asked the captain.
“You have a command?” Captain Noonan asked.
“Had.” John Brogan replied.
“Oh. You still seem to speak with an air of authority.”
“You said you wanted to apologize. I think you’re done.” John Brogan said curtly.
“And also, to inform you that I have given direct orders that you are no longer to be singled out.”
“What exactly do you mean by singled out?” 
“I’m sure that you have become aware of the presence of my men. I have told them to pay no more attention to you than they would anyone else.”
“Thank you, captain.” Cassie said.
“Thank you, Mrs. Brogan. And you Mr. Brogan?”
“Yes, well. If there are any more problems,” John Brogan said suspiciously.
“You’ll come to me. I won’t bother you folks anymore,” Captain Noonan replied then walked back to his horse, mounted it, and rode off with the two soldiers.

 

Chapter 15 – Cassie Gets a Gun
Cassie was working in the kitchen when she saw a man approaching the house from the road. She stepped out of the house to meet him.
“Afternoon, ma’am,” Edward Riley a scarecrow of a man said.
“Good afternoon. Can I help you?” Cassie asked.
“Yes, ma’am, the name is Riley, Edward Riley and I was wondering if you could provide a drink of water for weary traveler,” Edward Riley asked.
“I suppose so,” Cassie said and led him to the well pump on the side of the barn. She pumped the handle as he soaked his head in the flow of water from the pump.
“You folks live here long?” Edward Riley asked after he pulled his head out from under the pump and shook off the excess water.
“Not too, long. But we’re settling in. What about you? We don’t get many lone travelers in these parts,” Cassie said.
“Me, I am just a man on my own. I kind of lost everything during the war. The Yankee’s burned me out,” Edward Riley said and then took the ladle off its hook and had a drink.
“Oh, dear Lord, you’re not alone. You must be tired and hungry. Why don’t you come up to the house and sit awhile. I’ll fix you a little something,” Cassie offered.
“Thank you, no ma’am. Water is fine, but it sure is nice to be offered some good old southern hospitality.”
“The people around here are kind enough. I am sure any one of them would be more than willing to share what they had with you if you asked.”
“To be honest with you ma’am, I am more than just a drifter. You might say that I am loosely associated with the people those Yankee’s are looking for.” 
“You’re a . . .”
“Patriot, ma’am,” Edward Riley said finishing her sentence. He pumped the handle again and filled the ladle with more water and drank.
“You’re one of those men causing all this trouble.”
“We just feel that the issue hasn’t been settled yet. But that’s not why I am here. You and your husband have been a great help to our cause.”
“Really, in what way?”
“The two of you have managed to keep the Yankee’s tied up here for weeks. We’ve been watching them watching you. You’ve been more help to us than a brigade of regulars.”
“That was not our intention.”
“I understand ma’am. We have to be moving on now, and we thought it would be only decent if we thanked you and at least offered something in return for your trouble.”
“Your leaving would be enough.”
“I thought my boy could help you with some of your chores tomorrow. These chores aren’t decent work for a woman like you.”
“It’s honest work. I’ve done worse.”
“We have our work to do too, and I’d rather not bring him along. You’d be doing both of us a favor if you could take him for the day.”
“You men and your work, when are you all going to end this? And what do I tell my husband. We don’t keep secrets from each other.”
“Well ma’am, I was hoping you’d be thinking more about the boy.”
“What happens if you don’t come back from your work?” 
“He knows what to do. He’ll only be a bother to you for the day.”
“I feel as though you are trying to draw me into something that I should avoid,” Cassie said with a suspicious tone to her voice and narrowed eyelids.
“No, ma’am, if it was like that, we could have made them Yankee’s quite a bit more suspicious. It is as I say it is.”
“Alright,” Cassie said and watched as Edward Riley filled the ladle, and took one last drink before he walked away.
“You’ll see ma’am. He’s a real good boy. No trouble at all and thank you for the water,” Edward Riley said behind him.
*	*	*	*
Cassie was outside by the barn when a scrawny and tattered 14-year-old boy approached her. She was filling a bucket full of water at the pump on the side of the Barn.
“Mrs. Brogan? My daddy sent me over to help you,” Parker Riley said.
Cassie stopped and looked Parker over.
“How long have you been running around with your Father?” Cassie asked.
“Since near the end of the war.”
“What’s your name?” Cassie asked as she continued to look him over.
“Parker.”
“Well Parker, we already have enough scarecrows around here. You come on up to the house and let gets some food in you.”
Cassie sat across from Parker and watched him as he voraciously ate the food on the plate of she made for him.
“So, Parker how do you and your daddy get along,” Cassie asked as she watched him eat.
“It was tough at first, but my daddy has friends now,” Parker replied between mouthfuls.
“Don’t you want home that you can go to?”
“My daddy says the Yankees burned down the only home that we ever wanted.”
“So you’re going to live the rest your life in the wilderness?”
“My daddy says the day you let another man beat you down is the day that you become their slave.”
“Did your daddy own slaves before the war?”
“He worked as an overseer.”
“Oh, are you done or do you want more?”
“More please,” Parker said and Cassie got up, filled another plate, and handed it back to him.
“This is real good of you Mrs. Brogan,” Parker said before he started shoveling food from the plate in his mouth again.
“Slave or man, I don’t work scarecrows. What are you doing for schooling?” Cassie asked as she sat back down at the table watching him.
“My daddy says that I am learning all I need to know riding with him and his friends,” Parker said after he took a moment to chew enough food so he could speak. They both stopped to listen to the rapid approach of several horses.
“You stay here,” Cassie said and she got up and went to her kitchen window to see who had arrived.
“My daddy said you might need this sooner than later,” Parker said to Cassie who turned around to see him as he reached under his shirt and pulled out a revolver.
“Put that thing away,” Cassie said both surprised and agitated.
“You’re going to go out their unarmed? They might be Yankees,” Parker said.
“Someday you and your kin are going to realize that the war is over,” Cassie said.
“Where do you want me to put this?” Parker asked holding the gun up ready to hand it to her.
“Put it in the cupboard for now. We’ll get rid of it later,” Cassie said as she looked out the kitchen window.  She quickly walked over to the door to step out and greet the new arrivals.
“Stay here, and be quiet,” Cassie said before she opened the door and stepped outside.
Just outside the kitchen door five Union soldiers on panting and snorting horses confronted Cassie. The soldiers were disheveled and drunk. It was Sergeant Pinket and his men.
“Can I help you?” Cassie asked.
“Are you Brogan’s woman?” Sergeant Pinket asked in a drunken sneer as he swayed unsteadily on his horse.
“No, I am his wife. What business do you have here?” Cassie asked.
“We’re here to give Brogan a message,” Sergeant Pinket said.
“None of you appears to be in any condition to give either me or my husband anything,” Cassie said as she surveyed the soldiers in front of her.
Sergeant Pinket looked around at his men. “Well boys, it looks like we got ourselves a lively one,” the sergeant said. His men laughed at his comment.
“Your Captain Noonan was here the other day and told us that he gave orders for us to be left alone, but I guess Yankees like you tend to be a little weak in the head after you have had a drink or two,” Cassie said in a scolding tone with her hands on her hips.
Sergeant Pinket spat a wad of chewing tobacco that landed near Cassie’s feet.
“You see that. That’s what I think of his orders,” Sergeant Pinket said.
“It’s my understanding that soldiers follow orders otherwise, they’re just rabble. No better than the renegades that they’re chasing. Is that true?” She added in a contemptuous tone.
“You ought to know not to speak like that to me. If you want, I can get off this horse and put that passion of yours to good use,” Sergeant Pinket said and slipped in his saddle almost falling off.
“A man like you is of no interest to me. Although, we do have an amorous sow in the pigpen, but it’s my understanding that she’s a bit particular, too,” Cassie said.
“Sergeant, Tillman’s patrol is right behind us. We need to get out of here if we’re going to make camp before him,” Pinket’s crony Private Morse said in a clearly anxious tone.
“You tell your husband to keep looking over his shoulder. The captain might be done with him, but I’m not. You’re all stubborn rebel scum and I . . .,” Sergeant Pinket said.
“Sarge, I think we better go, now,” Private Morse said emphatically.
Sergeant Pinket looked back and forth at his crony and Cassie a couple of times. He reined his horse around and galloped off followed by his men. Cassie waited until they were off the property before she went back inside the house.

The sun was falling behind the trees as the community of men worked anxiously to finish raising a barn on Pastor Goodwin’s farm. John Brogan manned a winch with a rope that was tied to the frame of a side of a barn. He struggled to hold the winch in place as the men around him applied some modifications to the frame before they all would make the final effort to lift it into place. It was in the midst of John Brogan’s red faced effort that Peter rode up on horseback. He jumped off the horse and ran up to John Brogan.
“Mr. Brogan, Mr. Brogan! There are soldiers at your house arguing with your wife!” Peter said. John Brogan looked at Peter while he struggled with holding the winch in place.
“What?” John Brogan asked.
“There are soldiers at your house!” Peter said.
John Brogan locked the winch in place and looked around for a horse. The men that were working on the frame realized that John Brogan was no longer keeping the rope that held the frame taught as it moved around. Deputy Williams ran over to the winch.
“What’s the problem John?” Deputy Williams asked.
“There are soldiers on his farm,” Peter said.
“I need a horse. Can I use yours?” John Brogan asked.
“Sure, it’s the brown one over there tied to the fence,” Deputy Williams replied.
Deputy Williams pointed toward his horse.
“Thanks!” John Brogan said before he ran off toward the deputy’s horse.
“Brogan, Brogan!” Deputy William shouted after him. Deputy Williams started working the winch while he watched John Brogan mount his horse and gallop away.
“What’s the matter deputy?” Peter said as they deputy grimaced.
“I was going to tell him to leave my rifle. I wouldn’t want any shooting going on,” Deputy Williams said as the two watched John Brogan gallop away out of sight.
“Here, boy, grab one of these handles and help me with this,” Deputy William said pulling the young man toward him by his arm.

On the road between the two farms, John Brogan noticed the holstered rifle attached to the saddle as he rode toward his farm at a gallop. He groped for the rifle to have it in hand when he arrived home. The ride was too rough and he had to slow to a fast trot in order to get the rifle and check to see if it was loaded. With the rifle in one hand and the horse’s reins in the other, he urged the horse back to a full gallop. In the distance, he saw the silhouette of his farm in the fading light.
He also saw torches. He urged the horse off the road. They jumped the fence and rode across the plowed field toward the house.
It was near dark on a moonless night. Cassie stood alone confronted by the soldiers just outside the door of the farmhouse. Sergeant Pinket and his men were on their horses between her and the barn.
“He’s not here. No one is here but me!” She said.
“If he’s not here, where is he?” Sergeant Pinket asked sounding less intoxicated and meaner than he was earlier that afternoon.
“I don’t know. He said he’d be home around sunset,” Cassie said sensing that she was in real trouble but trying to hide her concern.
“And he left you here all alone. I don’t believe you,” Sergeant Pinket replied.
“I don’t care if you don’t believe me,” Cassie said channeling her fear to anger that was reflected in her tone of voice.
“All you rebels are liars and only understand one thing,” Sergeant Pinket said and motioned to his man with the torch toward the barn.
“No!” Cassie said as she moved hesitantly unsure of whether to stop the man with the torch or stay between the soldiers and the farmhouse.
“Maybe he’s hiding in there.” Sergeant Pinket said as he moved his horse toward the house. A shot was fired from an open window.
“You leave her alone you Yankee scum!” Parker yelled from one of the farmhouse windows. The soldiers returned fire. Cassie ran back into the house through the kitchen door.
“Parker, Parker!” Cassie said as she moved through the dark house looking for her young guest.
Outside, between the barn and the farm house Sergeant Pinket’s horse reared. He turned to his man with the torch.
“Burn it. Burn it all!” Sergeant Pinket snarled and made a broad movement with his free hand. The man with the torch set the dry grass around the barn on fire. Parker shot at the man setting the fire. Sergeant Pinket’s men returned fire and now knew which window to shoot at.
Cassie walked into the bedroom that was lit only by the light of the burning barn and saw Parker with the gun that he had earlier. His face illuminated by the fire as he stirred near the window. Gunshots peppered the window while he squatted down to reload the revolver.
“Parker, Parker! No!” Cassie cried as she tried to get closer to Parker while not getting shot herself. Parker finished loading the revolver. He stood up to shoot but he was fatally wounded from the gunfire that came from outside. He fell back on the Brogan’s bed and died. The soldiers outside kept shooting as Cassie scrambled over to Parker’s body. They continued to shoot even as Cassie embraced Parker with her face buried in his chest, not returning their fire. Cassie looked down and over to the window and saw the revolver on the floor. She lifted Parker’s legs onto the bed and then went back to the window and picked up the revolver. Cassie started shooting at the soldiers from the window.
John Brogan, as he rode across his own field in the dark again heard gunfire and spurred his horse. Close enough to shoot, He stopped his horse, took careful aim, and hit one of the soldiers in front of the farmhouse. He saw the soldier he shot fall from his horse, and he then spurred his horse on closer to the farmhouse.
Still outside the Brogan farmhouse, the soldiers were confused by the unexpected gunfire, and reined their horses around in different directions to see where it came from. Another shot was fired from the house and the soldiers started firing at the house again.
John Brogan, finally close enough to see the soldiers clearly, stopped his horse and got off.  The soldiers continued shooting at the farmhouse. Once more, he took aim and shot another soldier off his mount, and once more the soldiers and their horses shift around confused by the new gunfire. Sergeant Pinket looked around and signaled the other soldiers to leave. The sergeant and two other soldiers rode off into the safety of darkness.

 

Chapter 16 – Brogan’s Exile
John Brogan ran up to the burning barn followed by the horse he rode. He attempted to open the barn door to give the animals inside a way out, but his action just fed the fire. He turned around and headed to the house.
Cassie, after waiting for the gunfire to stop, peered out of the window. She saw a man with a horse in front of the barn. She shot at him with her revolver. John Brogan saw the flash of a gunshot coming from the farmhouse. He knelt down, took aim, and shot the person that shot at him from the farmhouse. He then scrambled over to the door that led into the kitchen and listened for any more gunshots. He opened the door and quietly entered the house. He went from room to room clearing the house. When he entered the bedroom he saw two bodies.
“Cassie!” John Brogan exclaimed. Cassie turned her head to look at him. John Brogan ran over to her. He embraced her limp body. The gun that she had in her hand fell to the floor.
“It was me. I am sorry John, it was me,” Cassie said. She died in his arms. John Brogan held her as tightly as he could as though he were trying to keep her soul inside her body. After a moment, he picked her up, carried her to the bed, kicked Parker’s body off the bed, and put Cassie’s body down in Parker’s place. He looked up for a moment and then burst into tears burying his face into her bloody chest.
“Oh, God no, Oh, God no,” John Brogan cried out in the darkness of the room.

It was raining. John Brogan sat on the steps of the back entrance to the church where he and Cassie were members. He was soaking wet. Pastor Goodwin opened the back door and stuck his head out.
 “John, it’s time you come inside. You need to dry off. Be presentable,” the Pastor said. John Brogan got up and went stepped in the backdoor of the church. The pastor led John Brogan by the arm to a seat in his office.
 “John, you need to be strong for her sake. You told me yourself that it wasn’t really your fault,” Pastor Goodwin said to a listless John Brogan who didn’t respond. The pastor stood up to leave.
 “I’m going to do the service for the boy first anyhow. You can stay here and gather your strength,” the pastor said and walked out of the office. John Brogan sat, drained of the desire to live, in the room alone.
It was still raining. A group of people were assembled around an open grave as a coffin was lowered into it. Pastor Goodwin could be heard saying some last words at the gravesite. John Brogan’s listless expression was gone. The people that congregated at the gravesite walked past John Brogan mumbled words of consolation to him. He nodded at each one as they passed.
*	*	*	*
John Brogan was clearing the remains of the burnt down barn. He angrily caned the mule he worked when a remaining support beam wouldn’t budge. Jack Richmond approached on a buckboard and stopped.
“Whoa, John, are you trying to pull that beam down or cane the hide off that mule?” Jack Richmond asked with a firm yet gently tone.
“What’s it to you?” John Brogan replied breathing heavily and a bit angry.
“I just thought if you could wait a while, I could bring my team over and help,” Jack Richmond responded calmly.
“Yeah, I guess so,” John Brogan said in a calmer tone.
“No need to take your frustration out on that mule. He’ll never get that thing down,” Jack Richmond said. “I’ll be back to help in a little while,” he added and gently urged his horse forward with the reins.

As Peter rode up to the Brogan farm on horseback. Two pigs in the dried out pigpen sparred with each other for the last bit of food. He could hear gunshots. He followed the sound of the gunshots around to the back of the farmhouse. John Brogan was sitting shooting at the birds that fed on the grain in his now untended field.
“Pastor Goodwin asked me to check on you,” Peter said between gunshots. He was visibly nervous.
“Why didn’t he come himself?” John Brogan asked then shot at a bird killing it.
“He wanted to know if you need any help getting back to farming. I was supposed to give you a hand,” Peter replied.
John Brogan holstered his pistol and turned to look Peter in the face. “You tell the pastor for me that . . .” John Brogan said pausing when he saw Peter’s response. Peter slowly backed away intimidated by the look on John Brogan’s face. “That I appreciate his concern, but if he wants to say something to me, he should come himself,” he added after softening his expression. Peter walked back to his horse and rode off back toward town.
An hour hadn’t passed after Peter left when Pastor Goodwin rode up to the Brogan farmhouse. He tethered his horse, walked up to and knocked on the door.  “Brogan, John Brogan. Are you here John? Come to the door John,” Pastor Goodwin called into the house. John Brogan stumbled out of the seat where he was sleeping. An open brown jug was next to it. He walked to the door and opened it.
“I didn’t think that you’d be so quick,” John Brogan said slurring his words.
 “Drinking? I didn’t know you had a taste for it?” The pastor asked.
John Brogan turned around and walked back into the parlor. The pastor followed. John Brogan then lazily sat back down in the chair with the jug next to it. Pastor Goodwin surveyed the house then looked at John Brogan.
 “I’ve been patient with you because of the calamity that had befallen you, but the light from that candle burns low. Idleness is an invitation for the devil,” the pastor said.
“And so now I am evil. I was wondering when you were going to. . .” John Brogan said before the pastor interrupted him.
“Stop it John. I’m trying to talk to you.” 
“What are you trying to say, that I should be happy that my Cassie is gone. I should accept that I shot her. That I should go on like nothing has happened.” 
“You and Cassie were building a very good life for yourselves here. I don’t think that she would want you to destroy that,” the pastor said and rested his weight against the piano.
“Don’t do that,” John Brogan said and the pastor briefly stopped leaning against the piano. He went back to leaning on it before he spoke.
“John, it’s time you made a decision whether you want to continue living in that terrible moment in the past, or join the rest of us in the present,” the pastor said. John Brogan started to look away as he spoke.
“Look at me John. Each man has a path that he chooses to walk in life. You need to choose yours,” Pastor Goodwin said turned and walked out of the house.

John Brogan sat on a sack of seed on the train platform. The telegraph operator, Josiah, stuck his head out of the telegraph office window and looked both directions down the platform. When he saw John Brogan he continued facing that direction.
“I’m real sorry to hear about your loss, but the train station is for people coming or going, and there won’t be any passenger trains coming through today. May I ask what are you doing here?” Josiah asked.
“Trying to make up my mind,” John Brogan replied.
“About what?”
“About what to do next.” 
“If you don’t mind me saying, I heard about the shootout.” 
John Brogan slowly started to stand up.
“I mean to say I heard you’re pretty handy with a gun.” 
John Brogan sat back down.
“Yeah, too handy.” 
“I heard they’re looking for men of experience like you in the Utah territory.” 
“Who’s looking?”	
“Ranchers, Sheepherders, mine operators. They need men to help protect their interests. Pay is good too.” 
“Where’s the Utah territory?”
“If you stop by tomorrow, I’ll give you the flyer that I got from a conductor last week,” Josiah said and pulled his head back into the window.
*	*	*	*
John Brogan sat at the service desk in the bank. The Bank Manager, Milton Tate, sat at the desk in front of him.
“We’ll be sorry to see you leave Mister Brogan. Your late wife was a wonderful woman.”
“So how much can you give me for the farm right now?”
“Well Mr. Brogan, seeing that you haven’t been tending to it and the barn has burnt down. I can’t see it being worth more than one hundred and fifty dollars,” The Milton Tate said with his characteristic nervous blink from behind wireframe glasses.
“And that’s cash I can walk out of here with today?” 
“Well not today, but. . .” 
“Have someone come get me as soon as you’re ready.”
“Why certainly Mr. Brogan, I am sure that we can do this no later than tomorrow morning. Is there anything else we can do for you?”
“No,” John Brogan said absently and then curtly stood up and walked out.
*	*	*	*
A stagecoach pulled up in front of the office and stopped to take on passengers. John Brogan, on horseback, rode up and stopped next to the driver.
“Is this stage going through to Fort Laramie?” John Brogan asked.
“Yes it is. Are you a passenger?” Driver replied.
“No, but I’d like to ride along with you.” 
“We don’t take on stragglers.” 
“I could ride along as an extra shotgun.” 
“You have a shotgun?” 
“I don’t have a shotgun, but I do have this,” John Brogan replied and tugged at the stock of his model 1866 repeating rifle that he carried in his saddle holster. 
The driver took a moment to look John Brogan over. He saw a medium sized man with brown hair that carried two holstered pistols, one of which was a La Mot, a holstered rifle, and a sword all of which was conspicuously displayed.
“You fought in the war?” Driver asked.
“Yes,” John Brogan replied.
“Which side?” 
“Does it matter?” 
“No not really. You’ve been in a lot of fights?” 
“Enough to know how to use all this.” 
“Well, I guess there is no harm if you ride along for a while. We leave at noon. If you’re not here we leave without you.” 
“Noon it is.” John Brogan said and reined his horse around to leave.
“Hey, what’s your name?” 
John Brogan turned his head and looked back at Driver. “Brogan, John Brogan,” he replied and turned his head back, spurred his horse, and rode off out of sight.
*	*	*	*
             Bright afternoon sun illuminated the Kansas plain as the stagecoach ambled along. John Brogan rode next to the overland stage. They talked as they slowly moved along.
“I’m kind of glad that you are riding along. What’s your name again?” Driver asked.
“Brogan, John Brogan,” John Brogan said.
“Brogan, right. Been on the trail long?” 
“Long enough. What’s this ride like?” 
“The wagon trail? Oh, it’s not bad mostly.” 
“Then why is it good me coming along as an extra gun.” 
The driver gently snapped the reins to spur the horses forward and keep up with John Brogan.
“Well, we do have had trouble with Indians and outlaws from time to time.” Driver said.
John Brogan turned to look at Driver. “How often is from time to time.”
“I can’t really say. It’s when they feel like it.” Driver replied.
John Brogan turned his head back. “Have you been attacked?” 
“They mostly attack the way stations where we keep the horses and provisions. Sometimes they go for the stage if they think there’s money.” 
“Is there?” 
“Don’t know they just pay me to drive.” 
John Brogan rode astride the wagon in silence for a while. He looked around at the flat prairie. “Do they come at night?”
“Who?” 
“The outlaws and Indians.” 
“Further along when the terrain changes, you’ll see.”
John Brogan spurred his horse and galloped ahead of the wagon. The wagon created a dust trail as it moved slowly forward.

A fire lit the exterior of the way station where there was a stable, guesthouse, and an office. All the buildings were crudely constructed. The passengers that were settling down for the night stayed near the stagecoach that was in the distance. Nearer the station, John Brogan sat on a stool next to Mason, the station agent, and Driver around the campfire.
“So, you’re still on the easy part of the trail. The Sioux typically don’t come this far east anymore,” Mason said.
“What about outlaws?” John Brogan asked.
“They’re out there, too. They’ll come after you too when they’re not hiding or running from the Indians,” Mason replied.
“Don’t pay him no mind. He’s just been listening to stories that all the other station agent’s share to kill the time,” Driver said.
“Old Tom here is just an Indian lover. He’s been out on the trail too long,” Mason said.
John Brogan looked both men over. “So what about it, Tom?” John Brogan asked. 
“My name ain’t Tom. And he’s just talking about what he’s heard. He has never actually seen anything. We ain’t had any real trouble with the Sioux, only with bands of young braves showing off,” Driver said.
“Oh, yeah, what about what happened at Whiskey Creek?” Mason said.
“Nobody really knows what happened there. It could have just as easily been outlaws making it look like Sioux,” Driver replied.
“If the Indians are no trouble, than why are you glad there’s an extra gun?” John Brogan asked.
“Like I said, you never know what you might run into out there.” Driver said then pulled out a whiskey flask he had in his vest pocket and drank from it. “You run into Indians and all they want are a couple of horses and some blankets. You run into white men, they’ll shoot you as soon as look at you,” he added. Driver gave John Brogan a long look without saying anything. John Brogan got up, walked over to his horse, and got his sleeping roll. He looked around for a spot to settle down for the night. Driver offered the flask to John Brogan as he walked by. He took the flask and drained it. He then walked away and bedded down for the night.

The terrain of the Nebraska prairie was different from the flat grassy prairie Kansas. It was drier with rolling hills. The stagecoach ambled along down the trail. John Brogan rode his horse ahead of the stagecoach to high ground. He dismounted and surveyed the area through field glasses. Further along into Nebraska the terrain changed again. It went from rolling hills with dry grass to the more typical dry western landscape of scrub brush, arroyo, and pinion trees. There were occasional rock outcrops. John Brogan stood on top of one of them. His horse was next to him. He watched the stagecoach pass through an arroyo below. As it passed, John Brogan drank from his pocket flask and stared toward the west.
In the afternoon Driver had stopped to rest the horses. As he dozed, he was surprised by the sound a gunshot and Shotgun slumping over into his lap. Driver slowly stood up with his hands in the air. He carefully reached for the shotgun next to his seat. The stagecoach shotgun rider is doubled over in pain next to Driver. Driver threw the shotgun to the ground. Four outlaws on horseback surround the stagecoach. The closest outlaw with a rifle moved toward the stagecoach.
“Everyone out of the stage, real slow!” The Outlaw said as he looked up at Driver. “Down on the ground old-timer,” he added.
Driver slowly moved to lower himself to the ground. With the sound of a rifle shot, the Outlaw’s hat flew off his head. The sound was followed by a shot from a pistol and his hat flew further away. The outlaws’ horses were anxious and the outlaws looked around to see where the shots came from.
“Next, it’ll be someone’s head if you all don’t move on,” John Brogan said from behind the brush that concealed him.
The outlaws looked around to see where the voice came from but were confused by the echo in the canyon.
“Come on out! We’ll split the take with you,” One of the outlaws said.
“All I am interested in, is you all leaving, now!” John Brogan replied.
The outlaws started to leave with some reluctance. One of the outlaws took a parting shot at Driver but missed. John Brogan returned fire and didn’t miss. The wounded outlaw fell from his horse. The other outlaws spurred their horses and galloped away. Driver immediately climbed back up on the stagecoach to check on Shotgun. One of the male passengers got out of the stagecoach to check on the injured outlaw. John Brogan came out of the brush on foot with his horse behind him.
“Leave him alone, he’s mine,” John Brogan said.
“But, he’s injured,” the Male Passenger replied.
“So is Shotgun. Go help him,” John Brogan responded brusquely.
The Male Passenger walked back to the stagecoach to help Driver. John Brogan carefully approached the injured outlaw and stepped on his right wrist.
“AAhhhhhhhhhh!” The injured outlaw screamed. Driver and the Male Passenger looked over at John Brogan. John Brogan had kicked the revolver near the injured outlaw’s hand away.
“He’s alright. He just doesn’t like losing his gun,” John Brogan said as he patted the injured outlaw down and forcefully lifted him to his feet.
The injured outlaw, with his hands tied together, was tethered to the back of the stagecoach as it moved down the trail. John Brogan rode alongside Driver. It was sunset.
“Don’t you think that injured man should ride in the coach?” Driver asked.
“That injured man almost killed you and shot Shotgun. He’ll make it to the next way station. Besides, there’s not enough room in there for both of them to rest comfortably,” John Brogan said and then slowed his horse, pulled out his flask, and drank from it.

The next morning the stagecoach continued to amble down the Nebraskan trail with its way illuminated by bright sun. John Brogan rode next to Driver. The Injured Outlaw was rolled up in a carpet. The carpet was tied to the back of the stagecoach with the rest of the baggage.
The stagecoach rolled into the town of Fort Laramie at a trot with John Brogan astride. It stopped at the stage line office. Driver jumped down and ran into the office. John Brogan untied the Injured Outlaw, who was now groggy, and dragged him toward the sheriff’s office. The eastbound stagecoach trotted into town headed the opposite direction. Saloon girls, in various stages of dress, hung out the windows noisily greeting the men of the town. John Brogan took no notice of them. He opened the door to Sheriff’s office and shoved the injured outlaw inside he followed.
The Sheriff’s office was dark, dusty and disheveled. All the shades were drawn and Deputy Farnsworth, who was half-asleep, sat behind a desk with his feet up. Behind the deputy were jail cells. John Brogan sat the injured outlaw down in the nearest empty seat. The startled deputy sat up.
“You liked to scare me to death Mister. Couldn’t you have knocked?” Deputy Farnsworth asked. John Brogan approached the deputy and sat on the baluster in front of the desk.
“It was open,” John Brogan replied.
“What do you want?” The deputy asked.
“Him and a couple of others tried to rob the westbound stage.”
“So?” 
“Lock him up.” 
“I don’t have the keys.” 
“Then find someone who does!” 
Deputy Farnsworth scrambled to his feet, ran out of the office, and crossed the street to the bar to find someone who had a key to the cells.

John Brogan walked out of the Sheriff’s office, across the street, and through the door of the saloon named “The Gold Bar Saloon”. He looked around the room. Driver was at the bar.
“Hey Brogan, over here, there’s someone I want you to meet,” Driver said. John Brogan walked over to Driver. Nils Sundgren stood next to Driver. They both faced Brogan.
“So, you’re the man that saved my pay box,” Nils Sundgren said smiling.
“You should have seen him Mr. Sundgren. He appeared out of nowhere, and scared them bandits off like a bunch of . . .” Driver said excitedly.
“They weren’t very good bandits,” John Brogan replied.
“And you are?” Nils Sundgren asked.
“I’m not a bandit. I was just keeping my word to Driver,” John Brogan said.
“Tell him about the offer Mr. Sundgren,” Driver said.
“How about a drink first Brogan?” Nils Sundgren asked.
“How about a bottle?” John Brogan responded.
“Sure!”Nils Sundgren said and turned to face the bar. “Bartender!” He exclaimed.

 

Chapter 17 – Bunkhouse Monk
	The ride out to the ranch took several hours over some rough country. The effects of the bottle of whiskey the two men shared earlier still sloshed around in Brogan’s head as he rode along behind Sundgren to the ranch. Where he rode now was all new country to him, but it did not stop him from being wary of his surroundings. Half of the ride was along the trail that the stagecoach traveled, and the other half was up an ever narrowing river valley. As they rode it seemed as though the walls of the valley were slow closing in on them. With the passing of the day, the sunlight hid behind the sides of the valley unless, as the river twisted and turned, they could see the sun directly ahead or behind them. The two men climbed the steep side of a hill and rode through a small pass. On the other side of the narrow pass was a wide flat valley that appeared as though one could see clear over to the other side of the earth. In the near distance, a couple of miles away, were a ranch house, corrals, and some smaller buildings. After being on the farm and sleeping in bed for so long, the sight of a place to sleep that had a roof over it was a welcome sight. Sundgren was not much of a talker, and said little other than to give warnings about hazards along the way. John Brogan did not mind the silence, and for the first time since Cassie’s death he didn’t dwell on what had happened. It was as though the ride out and the view at the top of the pass was his ride out of the darkness of Cassie’s passing. At the far end of the valley the setting sun was just touching the tops of the trees.
	It was dusk when they arrived at the ranch. There was a ranch hand waiting to meet the two men and tend to their horses. Sundgren got off and walked away from his horse toward the ranch house as soon as the ranch hand grabbed its reins. Along the way, he turned and told Brogan to stay where he was and that he’d return shortly. It was full dark when Sundgren returned. He was a silhouette against the light of the kerosene lamps that illuminated the interior of the ranch house. He called out for Brogan as he approached, and when he finally reached him he handed Brogan a full flask a brandy.
	“Gets cold fast up here at night,” Sundgren said. “Come on, I’ll take you around to the bunk house and introduce you to the boys,” he added then turned and walked toward the bunkhouse at a brisk pace. Brogan now realized why Sundgren walked so fast. In such weather his pace made the trips between the buildings much shorter and kept the blood moving to keep the body warm. He followed suit. The bunkhouse was a long narrow building near one of the corrals. Brogan had mistaken it for a chicken coop when he first saw it from a distance. The wood of the structure was dried, knotted, and in some places warped. The door was held closed by a simple wooden latch that was splintered and looked ready to fall apart. It was dark inside when Sundgren opened the door.
	“Who’s in here? Why aren’t there any lamps lit?” He bellowed once inside. One of the ranch hands fell out of a top bunk surprised by the disturbance.
	“We’re trying to sleep Mister Sundgren,” the ranch hand replied. He was just getting to his feet after his fall. The blanket that he slept under was still on the floor.
	“Sleep? It’s too early to sleep. Where are the other hands, Goat?” Sundgren asked.
	“Some of them haven’t come in from the range yet Mister Sundgren,” Goat replied.
	“And the others?”
	“I’ll go see who’s around Mister Sundgren,” Goat said and scrambled passed the two men and out the door.
	“Do all your hands call you Mister Sundgren?” Brogan asked.
	“Just the chickens. Are you a chicken Brogan?”
	“No sir,” Brogan replied and thought about the impact his words had without seeing the face that heard them. Goat could be heard in the background yelling for the other ranch hands.
	“Well, we’ll see won’t we?” Sundgren said and walked further into the bunkhouse. “Come on Brogan. I think I can find a lamp somewhere in here,” Sundgren said as he walked further into the darkness of the bunkhouse. Brogan followed the sound of Sundgren’s footsteps through the bunkhouse. The interior of the bunkhouse was a mix of offensive odors that were a stark contrast to the cold but fresh air outside. “See what I mean Brogan. It stinks in here. They live like chickens unable to clean up their own filth.”
	“You don’t expect me to. . .”
	“No, each man keeps his own, but maybe you can set an example for the others to live up to,” Sundgren said as he continued walking down what felt like an aisle between rows of bunks. Brogan could sense the proximity of the bunks. Finally, Brogan heard a loud metallic noise and the smell of kerosene which proved to be Sundgren knocking over a lamp. Sundgren swore and could be heard groping around on the table for matches after he set the lamp upright. Sundgren, finding the matches, fumbled with the matchbox. It ended with him extracting a match and striking it against the wall. First there were sparks that were followed by the tiny explosion of the match head that illuminated the small area around the two men’s faces. He lit the lantern, and the room was aglow in a soft yellow light. The lines on the faces of the two men were highlighted in exaggerated relief. Sundgren’s face reminded Brogan of the rocky terrain that they rode over on the way to the ranch.
	“While we wait for Goat, I did want to talk to you in private,” Sundgren said. The motion of his speaking disturbed the analogy of the resemblance of his face to the land. “I got a real bad rustling problem. Real bad, I need someone like you to clean it up. You don’t need to kill or hurt any innocents, but if they’re out on my range and they are not me or one of the hands in here they’re a part of the problem. Can I count on you?” Sundgren asked and gave Brogan a hard serious look. Brogan nodded his head. “There’ll be a bounty in it for you, but that’s just between me and you. And if any of these chickens give you trouble, you can handle it as you see fit.” 
The door burst open just as Sundgren finished making his offer. Goat had returned with a group of men. Sundgren turned and increased the intensity of the light from the lantern. Goat walked in ahead of the other men. In the light it became obvious how he got his name. He had a long face with a short beard that grew from his chin. His receding hairline made it appear as though he had horns, and there was that look in his eye that was suggestive of a goat’s countenance.
	“Light some more lamps in here. This is no damn rabbit hole,” Sundgren complained. The men that just entered scrambled to light the lamps that hung from the ceiling in a row over the bunkhouse aisle. The detail of the faces of the men became visible as the lamps were lit. After all the lamps were lit, the men in the bunkhouse stood in two rows each one by a bunk. Sundgren walked down the row, turning left then right, pointing at the man as he introduced him.
	“Hey, you all, this here is Brogan. He’s the new ranch hand. Brogan this is Murray, Pinter, Snowden, Nelson, Frye, Nymander, and Jarrett. I believe that you have already met Goat.” Sundgren said standing by the door. “Jarrett here is kind of the lead hand and he’ll let you know how things work around here, right Jarrett?”
	“Yes Mister Sundgren,” Jarrett replied appearing somewhat surprised by what Sundgren said. 
“I’m telling you so you can tell the others, Brogan is no chicken. He is here to do the work that you chickens either can’t or won’t do. So make sure he’s well outfitted and on the range no later than the day after tomorrow,” Sundgren said to Jarrett and then walked out of the bunkhouse slamming the door behind him without saying another word. Brogan stared blankly at Jarrett waiting for a response from him.
“You can take the bunk under mine,” Jarrett said. “I don’t know what Sundgren means about the work we don’t do. We do damn near everything around here except drink and eat for him. That he likes doing himself,” Jarrett added with the other ranch hands mumbling in agreement behind him. “What kind of work does he have you doing?”
“I won’t really know until we get out on his range,” Brogan replied. “I’m real tired. I think I’ll just climb in my bunk and sleep. We can talk tomorrow,” He added. Jarrett pointed at the bunk below his then turned and walked up the aisle toward the rest of the ranch hands. Brogan climbed in his bunk, kicked off his boots, unbuckled his gun belt, which he used as a pillow, and fell fast asleep.

It was still dark outside when Jarrett shook Brogan awake. Half awake, the darkness lingered around his bunk since the only light in the bunkhouse being a single lantern that hung at the far end of the bunkhouse.
“Get up, get up Brogan. It’s time to get started,” Jarrett said as he backed away from Brogan in his bunk. “We’re going to get breakfast, get you outfitted and get out on Sundgren’s range. All this before sunup,” Jarrett watched Brogan roll out of bed. He was groggy and stiff. With his feet on the floor, Brogan took a moment to gather his wits. 
”Let’s go before all the food is gone,” Jarrett said and started for the door. Brogan looked around and noticed that the bunk house was empty except for the two of them. Realizing this, he jumped to his feet quickly and followed close on Jarrett’s heels as the two made their way to the ranch mess to eat.
In the stable, Brogan’s horse Tinker was ready to go. She had been fed, watered and rubbed down, all the things that she needed after their ride from St. Josephs. Jarrett handed Brogan a sheepskin coat, a pair of gloves, and some tools for mending fence. Seeing that they were properly outfitted, Jarrett spoke to Brogan for the first time since waking him. “Ready?” he asked. Brogan nodded in response. They mounted their horses and headed east by north for Brogan’s first time out on the range. The two rode over the frosty grass moving, for some time, as quickly as their horses would take them. Once out of sight of the ranch house, Brogan felt as though he had put his life in Jarrett’s hands, but it didn’t matter to him. He figured that it really wouldn’t matter what Jarrett did. As far as Brogan was concerned, he was driftwood, alone at the mercy of time and tide.
Brogan was a bit curious when Jarrett started up a canyon that had a creek that flowed out of it, but he had his questions answered when he saw a small deserted cabin. The two men dismounted in front of the cabin; Jarrett started walking around looking at the ground. Jarrett picked up a tin can, it was then Brogan figured out the reason why they stopped.
“Recent,” Jarrett said as he dropped the empty can at his feet. “Sundgren told me that you are here because you’re a man hunter,” Jarrett said with a dry contempt. Brogan nodded his head. “Better you than me,” Jarrett said and continued searching the ground for other items. “These men don’t bother me none, and there hasn’t been any shooting, but I guess you’ll be changing all that.”
“They’re stealing his property,” Brogan replied indifferently. “He wants a message sent to these people, and if you all can’t do it. I can,” Brogan added then turned his back to Jarrett and walked into the cabin. The mid morning sun flooded the cabin with light when he opened the door and looked around inside. Jarrett was still in the same spot when Brogan stepped out after spending a good while inside.
“You ready?” Jarrett asked and walked back to his horse. Brogan didn’t answer him; he just followed. The two men got back on their horses, and Jarrett started riding away from the cabin headed west. Brogan rode around the cabin in a wide circle. He stopped at a spot north of the cabin and called out to Jarrett as Brogan pointed north. Jarrett rode over to where Brogan had stopped.
“They’re headed that way,” Brogan said. “Judging from these tracks I guess we’re the better part of a week behind them, but they don’t know we’re chasing them do they?”
“Are we?” Jarrett asked.
“Yes we are. They’ve got the cattle that we’re supposed to be tending, and I’ve got a message to give to them,” Brogan replied giving Jarrett a stern look. Jarrett’s expression showed his displeasure. Brogan spurred his horse and rode off. Jarrett sat there a minute and then rode off behind Brogan.
The two men did not return to the bunk house that night. Instead, they holed up in one of the tiny cabins that were scattered across the range. The next morning they started as soon as there was enough light to follow the trail hoof prints left behind by the rustlers. Riding hard, the two men had caught up with the rustlers by that evening. Staying at a safe distance and bedding down for the night, Jarrett thought they would corner them the next morning, but he was surprised when he awoke during the night to the sound of gunfire and then silence. He figured that Brogan had been anxious and got what he was asking for. It was even more to his surprise when Brogan appeared with two gun belts hanging from his shoulder. He stoked the fire and shared a can of beans with Jarrett before they both bedded down for the rest of the night. They returned to the ranch the next day. On their return, Brogan headed straight for the ranch house where, much to Jarrett’s surprise, he was let in. Within minutes there could be heard the frequent and boisterous laugh of Sundgren from within confines of the ranch house. In the pit of his stomach, Jarrett could feel the toxic mix of envy and disgust.

Weeks passed. In that time, Brogan had made quite an impression on the ranch hands. By then, he had rode with most of the ranch hands each time bringing back more gun belts, always returning with at least two sometimes more. It grated on Jarrett’s nerves. Not just that his actions curried favor with the boss, but he felt that there was something wrong with a man who could kill another man with the same indifference of hunting vermin. Also, there were the stories from the other ranch hands about Brogan. And Brogan’s nightmares, his tossing and turning as though he danced with the devil himself. To Jarrett, it all added up to something bad. 

It was unusual for Jarrett to be in the ranch mess alone, but a bad throw from one of the broncos left him limping and sore. The echo of Pinter’s story remained in his head. It started with Brogan and Pinter scouring the range up by Blue Elk Creek where Brogan came across a large group of rustlers. He first discovered their tracks and followed them up into the canyon to its head waters. There he found the six of them unaware of his presence splashing in the cold water of the spring fed pond that fed the creek. It was a hot day. Brogan and Pinter watched them in their horseplay. Pinter then watched as Brogan moved up close with his repeater rifle. He watched Brogan climb a tree and pick them off one by one killing six with seven shots. There was no discussion, no warning, just bullets out of nowhere aimed with deadly intent. His marksmanship left Pinter in awe. So did how he was able to retrieve their gun belts like skins for a bounty. When Pinter asked him about burying the men, Brogan replied by saying vultures have to eat too. The image of men being left out on the range like carcasses disturbed Jarrett. Even when Jarrett killed Indians, he figured their kin would come and claim the bodies.
Jarrett made it back to the bunkhouse and lay in his bunk just to have to hear another story about Brogan and his exploits. He had just finished the flask of whiskey that Sundgren had given him to help with the pain when Snowden and Nelson walked in talking to each other in loud voices. It was another story about catching rustler’s red handed. Brogan took one of them, tied him down and branded him. The two men laughed about how the man screamed and writhed in pain. They joked about the smell of the branding and how Brogan finally put him out of his misery. Between the pain, liquor, and macabre story Jarrett had had enough.
“SHUT UP, Shut UP with that!” He shouted as he lay in his bunk. “It’s not funny, none of its funny. How do you know he’s not planning to do the same thing to you some day?”
“Gosh Jarrett, what’s got into you?” Snowden asked no longer smiling.
“How can you go out on the range and fall asleep next to a man like that?” Jarrett asked.
“Cause he’s one of us,” Nelson said.
“Is he?”
“Aw come on Jarrett. He sleeps in the bunk under yours, you see him almost every day. You know he’s one of us,” Snowden said while Nelson nodded in agreement beside him. “Think about how good a mood Mister Sundgren’s been in since Brogan’s been around. He even comes down here to talk to us some times. He’s never done that before.”
Jarrett was in too much pain and couldn’t roll over in his bunk to look either one of them in the face like he wanted. He could only stare up at the ceiling searching for the words to make his case. “Did you ever think about doing the things he does to other men? Ever?”
“Well no but,” The two men replied in unison hesitantly.
“But Mister Sundgren would never put up with him doing something like that to one of us,” Nelson said. “I don’t know what you’re sore about. He’s been there to help us all out when there’s been trouble. Even going and talking to Sundgren.”
“Still, if Brogan went loco and went after one of us what could Sundgren do about a man like that? What could any of us do?” Jarrett asked. Nelson and Snowden fell silent. Jarrett could only hear the scuffle of their boots and the slam of the bunk house door as the two men left. Jarrett welcomed the silence they left behind and was soon sound asleep.

In the bunkhouse, the group ranch hands were washing up preparing for their monthly trip into town.  Jarrett, recovered from his fall, finished washing and walked over to Brogan.
“There’s something wrong with you Brogan,” Jarrett said. Brogan ignored him. “I’ve never seen a man take so much pleasure in killing before. It’s like you feed on it,” Jarrett added and stepped uncomfortably close to Brogan. “Leaving men like that ain’t Christian. Some of them out there are probably still alive half starved and crazed by the sun.”
“Questioning Sundgren’s judgment can’t be good for a man in your position,” Brogan said, turned around, wiped his face with a towel, and pushed past Jarrett to get to his bunk and get his hat on his way out.

 

Chapter 18 – On the Town
	With work came play, and the ranch hands at Sundgren’s Ranch lived no differently. Monthly, each hand was given a weekend off from their duties on the ranch. It was also the weekend they were paid. It was expected that the hands would go into town and spend their money on the diversions that existed there. This situation satisfied an unwritten agreement between the town father’s and the ranchers regarding keeping money that the hands spent local.
The Gold Bar Saloon, where Brogan and Sundgren initially met, was a two story rectangular structure that sat near the center of town directly across from the sheriff’s office. On the first floor was a bar that stretched nearly the entire length of the building’s long side. The entrance on the building’s narrow side, that faced the street, had a vestibule. The vestibule provided a buffer for those inside from those who entered and exited the building during bad weather. Once in the saloon, the bar was to the left with the rest of the room being tables for all sorts of gambling, primarily card games but there was also roulette. At the far end of the room opposite the vestibule was a small stage. On the right side, about half the distance of the room was a stairway that provided access to the second floor and a variety of rooms for private activities. The bar itself was walnut that had ornate carvings decorating its corners. Behind the bar was kept a variety of liquors that were accented by a wall that had highly polished brass plates. The brass plates were intricately engraved in places, but mainly functioned as a reflective surface to increase the depth of the room and allowed the bartenders to watch their back. A series of chandeliers hung from the ceiling and provided a great deal of light.
That fall night the weather was unusually warm. The ceiling fans spun above the crowd that filled bar, and the windows that faced the street were open. One corner of the room was set up for just drinking. The three tables in this area were occupied. Saloon girls walked about the room. Some hung on to gamblers while others plied drinks to anyone in they could. The three bartenders that worked the room were very busy. The ranch hands from Sundgren’s ranch walked into the bar excited and anxious. With their pockets full of coins and they looked around for ways to spend it. They did not have to look far. Most of the ranch hands headed for either a saloon girl or gambling table that caught their fancy. Brogan walked over to the bar alone. He put a gold piece on the bar to get the bartender’s attention. It took a moment for the bartender to reach him.
“What can I get you?” The bartender asked.
“Whiskey,” Brogan said. “Leave the bottle,” he added. The bartender put a full bottle of whiskey and a shot glass down in front of Brogan and he started drinking. He downed one shot after another in a hurry to reach oblivion. Sara one of the saloon girls watched Brogan as he drank. She put on her most inviting expression before she walked up to him and squeezed in next to him showing him her ample cleavage.
“You could at least let a girl pour it for you,” Sara said and reached for the bottle, but Brogan grabbed her wrist and held it tightly. He looked her over. “Here,” Brogan said and dropped a large silver coin on the bar. “You tell all your frilly dressed friends that there is no sale here. Don’t bother me; don’t come near me, none of you. You hear?”
“I hear,” Sara replied and pulled her hand free. “You didn’t have to be so rough,” She added before she picked up the coin and walked away rubbing her wrist. Brogan went back to drinking. From his corner of the bar he watched the rest of the ranch hands drink, gamble, and whore until he forgot who and where he was.

It was winter, but an unusual thaw left the roads icy but clear enough for the men to ride into town on their free weekend. The saloon was full. The Bar was busy. Saloon girls worked the room plying themselves and drinks from the bar. The ranch hands from Sundgren’s ranch walked in the bar as they usually did. Once inside, they took off their winter coats and, like a herd of migrant animals, headed for either a saloon girl or gambling table. Brogan broke off from the group and again walked over to the bar. This time a bottle of whiskey and shot glass was waiting for him. He picked it up and walked over to a table where he sat and drank it. He drank to put out the searing thoughts that bothered him. Being free from hunting and killing other men there was nothing to fill his mind but memories of the life that he left behind. The thoughts he had were triggered by the smallest things, things like the smell of a woman, or the sight of her wrist when she poured a drink, or the rustle of her dress. Brogan thought that the only thing worse than going to town was to sit in an empty bunk house with the howling wind blowing against its walls making them creak. The emptiness and noise of the bunkhouse could stir many ghosts with no place for him to hide from them. Alcohol and isolation seemed his only alternative. At the saloon the ranch hands watched over him, and when he got so drunk that he passed out, they would take him up to one of the private rooms with a bed and leave him to sleep it off. When it was time to leave they would rouse him if it was needed.

It was spring. The boots of the ranch hands were muddy even though they scraped the bulk of the mud off. They wore rain slickers over their medium weight spring coats. Again, the saloon was full, the bar was busy, and the Saloon girls worked the room. The ranch hands from Sundgren’s ranch walked into the bar. They headed for either a saloon girl or gambling table. Brogan walked over to the table where he usually sat. This time a bottle of whiskey and a shot glass sat at an empty table. He walked over to the table sat down and started drinking. Drusilla, one of the new saloon girls, gave the piano player some money. He got up from the piano to let her play as she played she began to sing. She played and sang very well. Brogan, entranced, walked over to introduce himself as soon as she finished. A crowd of men formed around her, but she moved toward Brogan having eyed him from the moment he split off from the group of ranch hands that he walked in with.
“You sing beautifully. That voice. I haven’t heard one like it in a long time. What’s your name?” Brogan asked as tears welled up in his eyes. He studied her face and body fascinated by the similarity she had with Cassie. Drusilla moved closer to Brogan. 
From a distance she may have resembled Cassie, but close up there was no comparison. Drusilla was physically worn from a hard life of drink and prostitution. The clothes she wore were ragged and she preferred it that way. She had dark circles under her eyes that were half natural and half from the make-up she liked to wear. The other saloon girls loathed her. She was a savage among the savage. She was a short tempered mean drunk and stole from everyone she met. Such was her behavior on good days; on her bad days she had the temperament of a rabid bobcat clawing at everyone who came near and staring at others with a heart and mind filled with irrational fears.
“The other girls warned me to stay away from you,” Drusilla said as she looked Brogan over pleased with what she saw.
“You’re not like the other girls,” Brogan said his thoughts a collage of memories of Cassie,
Drusilla put her hands on her hips. “No, but you might want to be careful all the same,” She replied coyly.
“Can I touch you? Put my arms around you?” Brogan asked treating her as though she were fragile and might break.
“Sure, but it will cost you, and no rough stuff.”
“Anything, I would especially like to hear you sing again, but not here.”
“Okay,” She looked him over from the chest down to his waist. “I bet all that money in your pockets weighs you down,” Drusilla said sounding as though she was about to drool.
“I don’t keep it all on me.”
“I bet you don’t. Why don’t we go upstairs so we can talk in private? My name is Drusilla, Drusilla Poignard,” She said and put her hand in his, turned, and started leading him toward the stairs. Jarrett, seeing Brogan and Drusilla headed upstairs, got up from his card table to intercept them.
“No, Brogan, not that one. You don’t want that one!” Jarrett said and followed them as they started climbing the stairs.
“He’s made his choice. Go back to your game and leave us alone,” Drusilla said in a shrill snarl.
“She’ll be the death of you Brogan! The death!” Jarrett said clearly agitated. Drusilla and John Brogan ignore him. They entered a room and closed the door. Jarrett went back to his card game.
In her room she turned up the oil lamp to a brightness that allowed the detail of their faces to be seen, but not so bright as to be able to read. Drusilla took off her dress and let it fall to the floor. Underneath she wore only a corset and fishnet stockings. In the subdued light, with her scars hidden, she appeared quite seductive. She began singing as she walked over to the bed where John Brogan had sat down. She sang just loud enough to be heard in the confines of the room and especially by her new found customer. Standing in front of Brogan she continued her gentle song and massaged Brogan as she undressed him. Naked to his waist, she slowly pushed him back on the bed. He rolled over on his stomach and she continued her massage scanning the floor for the piece of clothing where he kept his money. As she continued her massage he began to drift off to a long sought after deep sleep. 
Outside of the room there were those who were desirous to hear what was going on between Brogan and his new found songbird. The noise in the public area of the bar went strangely quiet. It was so quiet that Drusilla’s singing could be heard by some in the saloon’s public area. Some of those that listened couldn’t help but laugh, the saloon girls in particular. They had no love for Brogan and felt that the two deserved each other.
*	*	*	*
There were still large patches of snow that covered the range as John Brogan and Jarrett rode Sundgren’s range looking for rustlers, breaks in the fence, and dead cattle. Brogan was so successful at discouraging rustlers that there were very few rustlers skilled enough to cross Sundgren’s range and live. His exploits removed one more hazard from the ranch hands work. They all, some grudgingly, respected and appreciated him.
“How can you be interested in her and hate all the rest?” Jarrett asked as he closed his eyes and lifted his head to bask his face in the sun.
“I’m not. I just like to hear her sing,” Brogan replied.
“I like a woman with a beautiful voice too, but I don’t take her upstairs to be alone with her.”
“My dealings with her are my business,” Brogan snapped.
“She’s our business. When we are out here alone, we have to depend on each other,” Jarrett replied in an unexpectedly sharp tone.
“So?”
“So, before you were always here with us. When we weren’t thinking, you were. But now, we don’t know where you are.”
“I’m still here.”
“Are you? Or, are you in town with her? I bet you’re thinking about her now. I liked the old Brogan better, quiet but trustworthy,” Jarrett said clearly irritated by Brogan’s answer and spurred his horse off at a gallop down to a nearby creek. There, his horse drank.
Jarrett was correct in his assumption about where Brogan’s thoughts were. Even though it was only two days since they left town, Brogan felt as though he would burst if he did not see and hear her again before sundown. He didn’t even signal to Jarrett his intentions. He just turned his horse and rode into town. He stopped in front of the Gold Bar Saloon and tethered his horse.
Brogan entered the saloon. It was mid afternoon and the saloon was almost empty. Saloon girls talked to the bartender, sat at empty tables talking to each other, and the lucky ones hung off the shoulders of the few card players and men at the roulette wheel. John Brogan walked over to the bartender and asked him a question. It was the question: where was she. The bartender responded by pointing to one of the rooms upstairs. Brogan started walking in the direction of the room that was pointed out to him. He climbed the stairs approaching the room moving slower with every step. He listened at the door before he knocked. He heard the laughter of Drusilla and another man. Brogan knocked at the door.
“Drusilla? Drusilla, it’s me John,” Brogan said through the door. He could hear her cackle.
“What do you want? I’m busy, can’t you tell?” Drusilla replied.
“Busy?” John Brogan asked in an absurdly innocent tone. He heard Drusilla cackle again.
“Go away! Come back when I’m free,” Drusilla replied in a seductive voice.
John Brogan turned to look back at the patrons in the bar. Some of them stared back at him.
“Dru?” John Brogan said.
“Go away. I’m busy,” Drusilla replied. She cackled again and the laughter of a man followed.
“Not too busy for me!” Brogan snapped. He stepped back to the balustrade, drew his revolver, and kicked the door open. Inside the room, both Drusilla and the man that she was with were half-naked. There was a bottle of whiskey on the table. The man in the room rolled off the bed on to the floor. Drusilla, wearing only a corset, walked toward John Brogan as though she was cornering a disobedient dog.
“What the hell is the matter with you?” Drusilla said standing in front of him. She attempted to slap him, but Brogan caught her wrist in his free hand and backhanded her with his other hand that also held the gun. She fell backward landing on the bed. She stood up. Blood started to ooze from the side of her mouth.
“Bastard!” Drusilla snarled viciously.
John Brogan started to walk further into the room to get at the man hiding behind the bed.
Drusilla reached under the mattress and pulled out a knife. She grasped it by the handle ready to throw.
“Get the hell out! I don’t need you disturbing my customers!” She screamed.
Brogan was about to get the customer in view when the customer stood up. He was clothed only in underwear from the waist down.
“Mister, I don’t know who you are, but I am only here for some fun. I didn’t know it was like this between you two!” the customer pleaded.
Brogan took another step toward the customer. Drusilla threw the knife. Brogan jerked his upper body back and the knife just missed him landing in the wall behind him. Brogan took another step toward the bed. Drusilla leapt off the bed and onto Brogan. He was knocked off balance from the unexpected attack. While the two fought, the customer grabbed what clothes he could and scampered toward the door and out the room. Brogan started to spin around, but Drusilla held fast to his upper body and started biting at his neck and chest. He started to pistol-whip her. She fell off after a couple of well-placed blows. A dazed Drusilla crawled, on her knees, to her carpetbag and pulled out a buggy whip. Brogan started to tend to his bleeding bites. Distracted, Brogan didn’t see Drusilla stand up. She quickly spun around and lashed Brogan in the side with the whip. The lash of the whip knocked Brogan sideways into the far wall of the room. He dropped the revolver and slowly crumpled to the floor. Drusilla cackled.
“I have to teach you like all the others!” Drusilla said before she lashed Brogan again as he started to stand up. This lash landed on his arm that he held up to protect himself. Brogan turned his body and lunged at Drusilla as she drew back to deliver another lash from the whip.  She then spun around and backed away. He missed grabbing her. Drusilla delivered a lash from behind that landed on his neck and side of his face. Brogan’s hands covered his face, and he just missed grabbing the whip. Blind with rage Brogan turned around and started walking toward Drusilla.
“Haven’t had enough, huh?” Drusilla said before she delivered another lash to his mid-section. Brogan anticipated her action and reacted by grabbing the whip and yanked as hard as he could. The force of Brogan’s yank pulled her toward him, through the room’s door, over the balustrade. She landed on the roulette table and was impaled on the roulette wheel. Brogan crumpled to the floor exhausted and in pain. Deputy Farnsworth and a bartender walked into the room stood over Brogan.
“Figures I’d see you after awhile. Your type always ends up in irons,” Deputy Farnsworth said.
“You’ll have to pay for the mess you made,” The bartender added.
“And the sheriff don’t like people killing his whores unless he tells them to,” The deputy said. The two men reached down, picked Brogan up by his arms, and dragged him out of the room and off to jail.

 

Chapter 19 – The Darkness of Confinement
The courtroom was adjacent to the jail. It was accessed by an interior door that was usually locked unless defendants were being arraigned. The court room itself was sparse. It had a judges’ bench, tables for the prosecution and defense, and a balustrade that separated the participants from the observers. That day the courtroom was empty except for the judge, Brogan, and Deputy Farnsworth. Brogan stood in front of the judge’s bench with his head hung low. His face and body were bandaged in the places where Drusilla’s whip landed. He stared down at his hands that were cuffed. The deputy held on to the chain that joined the two cuffs. The deputy had a sardonic smirk on his face as he watched the judge walk in and sit on his bench.
“John Brogan, this court finds you not guilty of murder, but you made a hell of a mess over there, for that, $60 or six months jail,” The Judge said then pounded his gavel as though he was smashing a bug. He got up from his bench and walked out of the courtroom. Brogan was taken from the courtroom and back to the sheriff’s jail.
In the sheriff’s office, Deputy Farnsworth led Brogan around by his handcuffs. ”I’ve got a special cell for you,” the deputy said as he walked Brogan past the regular cells, through a locked door, and into a dark hallway. The deputy stopped to light a lantern before they continued. “It’s a hole just for a critter like you,” the deputy said to Brogan then grabbed him by the handcuffs with one hand and held the lantern in the other hand. They walked down a short hall where there were two dark and smelly cells. Each cell contained a bed of wood planks and bucket for a toilet. The cells were slightly wider than Brogan was tall.  The deputy opened one of the cell doors and pushed Brogan inside. He then locked the cell door behind him. “Turn around,” the Deputy said and unlocked Brogan’s handcuffs and took them. “Hey Brogan, I hope ain’t afraid of the dark,” the deputy said before he turned, walked back down the hall, and slammed the door shut behind him.
Brogan was alone in complete darkness for a few minutes until the view port of the door at the end of the hall was opened slightly that allowed a tiny stream of light to pour through. Brogan moved so he could stare at it.
Days passed, and all Brogan could do was stare at the light. His facial hair started to grow in. It was the stillness and quiet that started to work on Brogan. For most people hell is an unbearably hot place of fire and brimstone. For John Brogan, hell was being alone in that dark cell with his thoughts. He was tormented by the anger and regret that he had never come to terms with. Memories were the devil’s pitchfork that cut deep into the emotional flesh of his soul. All that was him, Cassie, the soldiers of his command, the colonel, and the major visited his psyche in painful sorties. They all converged on him in that cell. Each image took a turn stabbing deep within with him having no hope of being visited by the relief of death. He could only hang his head low and twitch when poked by a memory that haunted him. Agony leads to madness, and Brogan had progressed well down that path.
Weeks passed, and Brogan continued to stare at the light. Locks of his greasy hair began to obscure the filthy bandage on his face. In his cell time moved very slowly. His mind filled the giant crevasses between heartbeats with thoughts. Thoughts that were in the beginning innocent, but like bubbles in a pot of water placed on heat, they came faster and faster shaded and twisted by darkness and fear. They were the kind of memories that scratched and pricked at a man’s soul. Such was the path that Brogan’s thoughts had taken.

Kate, a petite brunette, worked with her mother at the town boarding house. She and her mother were finishing up serving lunch to those at the house, and Kate had prepared and covered one last plate from the meal to take down to the sheriff’s office. She walked down the main street from the boardinghouse and knocked on the door of the sheriff’s office. Her knock startled Deputy Farnsworth out of a light sleep. His feet were on the desk and he momentarily lost his balance. “Who is it?” The deputy asked while he took his feet off the desk and moved some papers that were in a pile next to him in front of him.
“It’s Kate. I have your lunch,” She said from outside the door.
“Come in,” the deputy replied.
Kate walked into the office and toward the deputy. He picked up a quill and acted like he was writing on one of the papers.
“Where do you want me to put your lunch?” Kate asked.
“You can put it next to me on my desk,” the deputy replied looking as though he expected her to say something. Kate put the plate down on the desk next to the deputy. She paused for a moment before she turned leave. The deputy looked at her.
“You’re not fooling me Caleb Farnsworth. The whole town knows that you can’t read or write. So I don’t know what you’re doing with all those papers in front of you,” Kate said.
“I’m practicing,” the deputy replied.
“Practicing what? You couldn’t possibly know what’s on all those papers around you. You can’t read.”
“Who says I can’t read?”
“Everyone knows that,” she said looking at him quizzically. “If you can read, then read me what is on that paper in your hand,” she added.
“I can’t.”
“You see!” 
“It’s official business. That’s why I can’t. . .”
The deputy was interrupted by the entrance of Doctor Webster who stepped through the door and walked up to the desk where the deputy sat.
“Good, I finally found you in,” Doctor Webster said sounding a little irritated.
“Doctor Webster? What do you want?” Deputy Farnsworth said in a voice that feigned innocence.
“Is that prisoner still here?” The doctor asked in a more irritated tone.
“You mean the one who killed that saloon girl?” Kate asked with thinly veiled intrigue.
“The injured man, I told you to bring him to see me three weeks ago so I could re-dress those bandages. Did you forget?” The doctor asked.
“No, I just don’t think it’s safe for anyone to see him just yet,” The deputy replied.
“Look son, this is serious. If that man dies in your custody, it will be on your shoulders,” The doctor said.
“Yes sir,” Deputy Farnsworth replied.
“Then you’ll let me see him, today?” Doctor Webster asked.
“Yes sir,” The deputy said.
“Kate, you’ll have to leave now. I doubt that he’ll be any danger, but I don’t think he’ll be anything for a young lady like you to see,” Doctor Webster said.
“Yes, doctor,” Kate said and turned to leave.
 “And Kate, have you or your mom bring down a good and healthy plate of food to my office,” Doctor Webster said to her as she walked toward the door. Kate nodded at the doctor and left. “And you bring the prisoner down to my office immediately,” Doctor Webster said to the deputy in a tone that was more like an order than a request.
Doctor Webster’s office faced the street and had large windows that provided a great deal of light. The doctor washed his hands cleaning up after examining and bandaging Brogan. Brogan was behind him facing the windows. He had his shirt off and he was adjusting the fresh bandages the doctor had applied.
“I don’t know what got into that young deputy. He should have brought you down to see me weeks ago,” The doctor said then stepped over to a tray that sat near Brogan and started arranging the medical instruments that were on it. “I don’t know if you’re going to keep that eye. It still looks pretty bad. Are you listening to me?” The doctor asked. The doctor then walked around to look Brogan in the face. Along the way, he noticed that Brogan was looking at his reflection in the window.
“Wounds always look worse than they actually are. I’m sure they’ll look much better after they heal,” The doctor said and looked Brogan in the face.
“I’m going to kill that deputy,” Brogan said dryly.
“Now, now, don’t you think you’re in enough trouble?” The doctor replied.
“I’ve been hurt by enough people. It’s time for me to hurt back,” John Brogan said as though he was thinking out loud. 
The doctor shook his head as he walked over to the office door and opened it. “He’s ready,” The doctor said to the waiting deputy and walked back from the door to the tray next to Brogan. “You can put your shirt back on. And I’ll see to it that the deputy treats you decently,” The doctor added. The deputy entered the room as Brogan finished buttoning his shirt. The deputy put the handcuffs back on Brogan.
“Caleb, you’re not to keep him in that cell that you’d put him. He’s to get fresh air and some decent food every day. If you can do that much, I’ll think about what I’m going to tell Sheriff Dolan when he gets back,” the doctor said.
The deputy pulled Brogan off the table by the handcuffs.
“The sheriff and I have a deal, and you need to keep up his end until he gets back. You hear?” The doctor added.
The deputy took a long slow look at the Doctor. “I hear,” the deputy replied then pulled Brogan out of the room by the handcuffs. Doctor Webster stared at them as they left.

 

Chapter 20 – Second Exile
The sheriff’s mining camp was a considerable distance from town and was profitable only when the labor that worked it was free. It was at the end of a rarely traveled trail that followed a creek into a small canyon. Trees of various types shaded the road along the way and rock outcroppings scraped bare by time and weather dotted the landscape. The mine itself was a hole dug into a steep side of the canyon. Once productive, ore carts on rails had been installed to support the extract process. It also had a sluice that was used to wash the ore from the useless rock that was also mined. 
Deputy Farnsworth brought the buckboard he drove to the mine with John Brogan sitting in the back with his arms and legs shackled to a stop. The deputy got off the buckboard, walked around to its rear, and pulled John Brogan off. The deputy then dragged Brogan behind him up the hill to the top of the mining sluice. A man stood at the top of sluice with a shovel. It was the injured outlaw. Deputy Farnsworth called him Deputy Pitcairn. Deputy Farnsworth and Brogan stopped when they were near the top of the sluice. Deputy Pitcairn tossed the shovel down at the two men. It landed near Brogan’s feet.
“Morning Deputy Pitcairn. I have that prisoner that we discussed earlier. Doc Webster said he needed plenty of fresh air. I am sure you can provide that for him here,” Deputy Farnsworth said.
Deputy Pitcairn walked down from the top of the sluice. He walked around the shackled John Brogan looking him up and down. “Well Mr. Brogan, you are going to enjoy your time with me as much as I enjoyed my time with you,” He said then stepped back and leaned against the sluice. “Unshackle his hands only. We don’t need our guest wandering off in too much of a hurry.”
Deputy Farnsworth unshackled Brogan’s hand. “Brogan, if you run, he’ll shoot you in the back and dump you in the mine. So, I suggest you do what he says until I come back for you around sundown,” he said. Deputy Farnsworth walked back to the buckboard carrying John Brogan’s hand shackles. He got back on it and left. Brogan and Deputy Pitcairn watched him leave. Deputy Pitcairn turned to John Brogan after Deputy Farnsworth disappeared from view.
“Life on this mountain is simple. Dig and live. You see this ore cart next to you,” Deputy Pitcairn said as he pointed to it. “You are going to shovel the ore out of it into the sluice here,” he said as he patted the sluice with his hand. “You shovel until the ore cart is empty. Then you are going to climb down out of the ore cart and muck out the mud that has gathered at the bottom of the sluice. You are going to keep doing that until Deputy Farnsworth comes back to get you at sundown,” the deputy gestured to Brogan indicating that he was to climb the ladder behind the ore cart. “Let’s get started shall we?”
John Brogan carefully climbed the ladder to the top of the ore cart and started digging.
Deputy Pitcairn walked over and started the flow of water down the sluice. The deputy then stepped over to a platform where there was a rocking chair, jug of whiskey, and a rifle. He sat and watched John Brogan work.

The noon sun was particularly hot that day. John Brogan was at the base of the sluice clearing the mud away from its base. He then led a pair of mules that brought another loaded ore cart next to the top of the sluice and started back to work. It was a routine that he repeated through the day.
The western horizon had begun to pull the sun toward it, but it was unable to check its intensity. John Brogan cleared a clog on the sluice. He shoveled mud and ore over the side. Once he cleared the clog, Brogan returned to shoveling ore from the ore cart onto the sluice. He looked up to see Deputy Pitcairn smiling back at him.
Deputy Farnsworth appeared on his buckboard as the sun started to sink beneath the top of the trees to the west. Brogan felt a strange sense of relief at his appearance; his aching muscles responded by giving him one last burst of energy. It was enough to get him from the mine entrance to the buckboard that waited below. Deputy Farnsworth loaded a shackled and exhausted John Brogan into the back of his buckboard, once loaded Brogan’s muscle gave way to their exhaustion.
It was full dark by time Brogan and Deputy Farnsworth got back to the sheriff’s office. Brogan thought that he would never consider the jailhouse a welcome sight, but his day at the mine changed his point of view. Deputy Farnsworth closed and locked the cell door behind Brogan. “Hey Brogan, you have company,” Deputy Farnsworth said.
John Brogan slowly turned around and saw that there was a man, Miguel, in the cell next to him. The man in the cell looked back at John Brogan and smiled.
“A Dios Mio. I’ve been going crazy in this place by myself. Have you been in here long?” Miguel asked.
Brogan lay down on his wood plank bed exhausted. The ride from the mine provided Brogan just enough rest to allow him to walk from the buckboard to his cell without his muscles succumbing to exhaustion. Once inside his cell he fell asleep almost immediately.
“Hey, what’s your name? What’s your name? Don’t fall asleep on me. Are you asleep?” Miguel asked.
John Brogan began to snore.
“Damn, this place is no fun.” Miguel said and leaned back against the wall of his cell.

It was still dark out when Deputy Farnsworth tossed a bucket of cold water on Brogan to wake him up.
“Get up you! You have another day working in the fresh air,” Deputy Farnsworth said.
Brogan got up with a start. He was soaked with water. 
“Is that what you’re going to do to me if I don’t get up?” Miguel asked.
Brogan gave the deputy a hostile stare.
“Shut up you. Brogan, you need to listen to me when I talk to you,” Deputy Farnsworth said.
“But, he was asleep,” Miguel said.
The deputy turned toward Miguel’s cell. “I said shut up!” the deputy said.
Brogan slowly got up and stepped over to the bars of his cell. The deputy shackled Brogan’s hands and feet while he was in the cell. He then stood up and walked over to Miguel’s cell.
“Come on you. It’s your turn,” Deputy Farnsworth said.
“Hey, what’s going on? I don’t have to do what he did yesterday do I?” Miguel asked.
“You can either do that or I can put you in a very dark cell for a long time.” 
Miguel complied with the deputy’s request and he was shackled the same way as Brogan. The deputy then opened the cells, pulled the two men out and shackled them together.
“Looks like you’ll have company today Brogan,” the deputy said.

Brogan and Miguel stood on top of an ore cart shoveling ore into the sluice. The cool morning air helped them keep up a steady pace. Deputy Pitcairn sat on his platform. His rifle rested across his lap and a jug of whiskey was next to him.
“My cousin Tomas is in Mexico now. We grew up together in San Juan De Carlo, but he got caught stealing some horses and had to go live with my uncle in. . . .” Miguel said.
“How’s your new friend working out for ya’ Brogan?” Deputy Pitcairn asked. Brogan responded by shoving his shovel into the ore with more force than necessary.
“How come you won’t tell me your name?” Miguel said. Brogan took another violent shovel full of ore and increased the pace of his shoveling.
“Why can’t you answer the man Brogan?” The deputy asked.
“Because he’s been talking non-stop since we got up this morning,” Brogan replied.
Deputy Pitcairn pulled the rifle up and pointed it in Brogan’s direction. “Tell the man your name Brogan,” Deputy Pitcairn said in a threatening tone.
Brogan stopped shoveling. He wiped the sweat from his brow and stared at the deputy with an indignant expression. Miguel continued digging.
“Brogan, John Brogan.”
“Louder,” Deputy Pitcairn said goading Brogan.
“John Brogan!” Brogan said louder.
Deputy Pitcairn placed the rifle back across his lap. “You see Brogan. Being friendly isn’t so hard,” Deputy Pitcairn said then picked the jug up and drank from it.
“I’m sorry my friend. I did not know my talking would create such problems,” Miguel said.
“What was that?” Deputy Pitcairn asked.
“I was just telling my friend that I stink and am in need of a bath.” Miguel said.
“Oh,” the deputy replied.
Brogan and Miguel went back to digging. The sound of each shovel full became more rhythmic and coordinated.

Deputy Pitcairn stood above Brogan and Miguel on his platform. The deputy appeared as a silhouette against the noon sun. A piece of bread from a loaf landed in the muck around Brogan’s feet. The deputy began breaking pieces off of the loaf and dropping them. Miguel scampered around trying to catch the pieces before they hit the ground. Brogan stared up at Deputy Pitcairn contemptuously as he continued to break pieces of bread off from a loaf and dropped them to the two men.
“What’s a matter Brogan, not hungry?” Deputy Pitcairn asked.
Brogan continued to stare up at the deputy.
“I suppose you two are a little parched,” the deputy said. He then put a canteen on the hook of a hoist, swung the hoist out over the men below, and lowered the canteen until it hovered just above their heads. Miguel jumped for the canteen as the deputy lowered and lifted it out of their reach.
“Aren’t you going to play?” the deputy asked Brogan.
“I only play games I have a chance of winning,” Brogan replied.
“You’re going to need something to wash down that bread with unless you’re planning to use that muck for gravy,” the deputy said as he continued to lower then pull away the canteen.
Brogan unexpectedly leapt for the canteen. He knocked it to one side and freed it from the hook. The canteen fell to the ground. Brogan started to walk over to it, but he wasn’t fast enough to prevent the deputy from shooting a hole in it with his rifle.
“You two better drink fast or it’ll be gone!” The deputy said and started to laugh.
John Brogan picked the canteen up and handed it to Miguel. Miguel took the canteen and drank. He handed it back to Brogan so as not to spill any.
“A man who shares his water is a good man, indeed,” Miguel said.
John Brogan took a long, slow drink. Miguel offered Brogan one of the larger clean pieces of bread. Brogan took a big bite out of the piece of bread he was given.

The jail was dark. Deputy Farnsworth had left and put out the lamp. Only the light of a full moon illuminated the room. The two men could see each other only as silhouettes in their separate cells.
“Brogan, Brogan. You awake?” Miguel asked.
“No,” Brogan replied sleepily.
“You think the deputy will be back tonight?” 
“Probably.” 
“You think they’ll set you free?” 
“Don’t know.” 
“What did they put you in here for?” 
“Fighting.” 
“The deputies don’t like you much.” 
“Nope.” 
“They’re trying to kill you, you know.” 
“I know.” 
“Do you care?” 

Deputy Farnsworth drove the buckboard, with his two prisoners in the back, up the trail to the mining camp.
“Your mighty quiet this morning Miguel,” Deputy Farnsworth said.
“Nothing to say,” Miguel replied.
“Deputy Pitcairn told me that you and Brogan got right friendly with each other after you shut up,” Deputy Farnsworth continued.
“I got tired. The work is hard up there,” Miguel replied.
“Well you just got a good night’s sleep. So talk,” Deputy Farnsworth said.
“About what?” Miguel asked.
“About Brogan’s favorite subject, one of your cousins,” Deputy Farnsworth said.
“I don’t have any more stories,” Miguel said.
Deputy Farnsworth turned around to look at Miguel. “Bullshit! You start talking or I’ll forget to leave your water canteens at camp,” the deputy said and turned back around. Miguel looked at Brogan. Brogan shrugged his shoulders.
“I guess I could tell you about my cousin Joaquin and the land agent,” Miguel said.
“That’s better,” The deputy said over his shoulder.
Brogan leaned his head back to sleep while Miguel talked.
“Well, my cousin Joaquin was a copper miner in the Arizona territory. He got the mine when his father died, but the title was from a Spanish land grant. There was this land agent named Owen who was converting all the Spanish titles to United States titles. If you had a title, all you had to do is go into the land office and have him sign it over from the Spanish to the U.S. title. Well my cousin thought why should he have to sign for land that was already his . . .” Miguel continued as the buckboard ambled up the trail toward the mining camp.

Brogan and Miguel were on top of an ore cart shoveling ore into the sluice. The air was still cool and the heat of the day had not yet slowed them down. Deputy Pitcairn sat on the platform with a rifle in his lap and a whiskey jug next to him. His chin rested on his chest.
“Did you ever see that land agent?” John Brogan asked.
“What land agent?” Miguel replied.
“The one in the story you told Farnsworth on the way up here.” 
“Yeah, sure. I used to watch him in his office when I would go to town. He was a nervous old. .  .” 
Deputy Pitcairn looked up and pointed the rifle in their direction. Brogan and Miguel responded by go back to shoveling. “Hey you two, what’s all that whispering about?” Deputy Pitcairn asked suspiciously.
“What whispering?” Miguel replied.
“Don’t get smart with me. You two were talking.”
“I was talking to myself,” Miguel said.
John Brogan stopped shoveling. “Yeah, why don’t you shut him up for me? I am tired of listening to him,” Brogan said.
Deputy Pitcairn lowered the rifle and put it back down on his lap. “You just keep talking, and shout out if Brogan tries to stop you. I know how to handle him,” the deputy said then sat back in the rocking chair, picked up the jug next to him, and took a long drink. John Brogan started shoveling again. Deputy Pitcairn’s chin settled back on his chest.
“What else about that land agent?” John Brogan asked.
“He had a limp,” Miguel replied.
“Did he act real proper all the time? Like he thought he was better than everyone else?” 
“Yeah.”
“Was he a southerner?”
“I don’t know. I couldn’t really tell. Why are you so interested?”
“Because, if it’s who I think it is, I have my own matter I need to settle with him,” Brogan said and started shoveling with renewed vigor. “Just follow my lead when the time comes,” Brogan said at just above a whisper.
Another day’s lunch brought another round of taunting by the deputy. Brogan and Miguel stood beneath the platform where the deputy sat waiting for him to feed them. Deputy Pitcairn threw two whole loaves of bread down to the men. He then tied the canteen to the hook at the end of a hoist before he lowered it to the two men. Miguel jumped to grab hold of the canteen. The deputy held the rope of the hoist with both hands as he raised and lowered the canteen. Brogan, directly underneath the platform, got a running start, leaped, and grabbed hold of the lowered end of the hoist. The deputy, surprised by the unexpected weight at the end of the hoist, was jerked forward. He fell off the platform and landed on his back some twenty-five feet below. The deputy appeared to be dead. Brogan and Miguel stood over the lifeless body looking down at it. The two men both looked up at each other at the same time.
“We got one more to go. Meanwhile. . .” Brogan said and looked up at the platform.
“There’s a jug of whiskey up there and an afternoon to drink it,” Brogan said smiling as he wiped his brow with the back of his hand.

Light from the setting sun blinded Deputy Farnsworth as he drove the buckboard along the road that led to the mining camp. He approached a rock cut-through. Brogan and Miguel were crouched down on each side of the cut through waiting to ambush the deputy. Both men still wore ankle bracelets. As the buckboard passed through the cut, Miguel started twirling a lasso. He threw it over the deputy and yanked him off the buckboard. The deputy landed hard. He was still disoriented when Brogan and Miguel walked up and stood over him.
“I hope you brought the keys to these shackles with you,” Brogan said to the deputy.
“Yes. They fit too tight and my ankles are very sore,” Miguel added.
Brogan searched the deputy for weapons and keys. He lifted the deputy and loaded him on the back of the buckboard where the deputy was also securely tied. Brogan and Miguel then drove the buckboard toward the mining camp.
“I’m going to teach you all about mercy boy,” Brogan said to the deputy.
“Shouldn’t we be going the other way?” Miguel asked.
“What do you mean? I’ve got a debt to pay.” 
“What if someone is expecting him?” 
“No one is expecting him. He’s the one who sits in the jail all night watching people rot in their cells.” 
“Alright, but not too long. I’ve got a long ride home.” 
 “No, not too long, just long enough to get the bad taste out of my mouth,” Brogan said.

Brogan and Miguel had freed themselves from their ankle bracelets. Deputy Farnsworth’s feet were tied and he was hanging upside down on the hoist. Brogan walked around the deputy in a semi-circle cracking the buggy whip he found in the buckboard. The deputy started whimpering and then started to bawl. Brogan smiled before he started whipping the deputy. The result of the whipping was hard to see in the fading light. Miguel’s hand grabbed Brogan’s wrist when the deputy stopped crying out in pain. Brogan struggled with Miguel briefly. He then lowered his arm and walked away to un-harness the horses from the buckboard. He then walked the unharnessed horses over to where Miguel stood.
“Come on, we have a land agent to find,” Brogan said. The two men mounted their horses bareback and rode off into the dark.

 

Chapter 21 – A Visit, Vengeance, and Release
	John Brogan was surprised when he saw Jarrett riding near the cabin that he and Miguel hid. His first thought was to ambush his coworker, but he thought better of it fearing it may be some sort of trap, and watched to make sure that his coworker was not followed. Jarrett had Brogan’s horse with him along with a pack mule loaded with supplies. It was an enticing sight for men who hadn’t eaten for almost half a week. Caution still ruled Brogan’s actions and he waited until he was sure that it was okay to expose his position. Brogan waited until the very last minute before he burst through the cabin door and whistled to get Jarrett’s attention. It took several whistles before Jarrett spotted Brogan. Jarrett changed direction when he spotted Brogan and started riding toward him. Brogan watched his coworker with an expression of curiosity and amazement that he kept on his face until Jarrett was right up on them.
	“How’d you know we’d be here?” Brogan asked not making any effort to hide his sense of joy and relief.
	“I figured you’d hide out in a place that you knew well. The others in town thought that since you had horses that you’d have headed back east, but I kind of felt that that was the last direction you’d go,” Jarrett said. “Who’s your friend?” He asked looking past Brogan at Miguel who had stepped out of the cabin.
	Brogan turned his head briefly and then looked back at Jarrett. “Him, he’s someone who was in that hole I was in with me. It was either kill him or bring him along,” Brogan said walking past Jarrett to his horse Tinker to greet her.
	“Why him?” Jarrett asked Brogan as he passed.
	“What?”
	“Why keep him alive,” Jarrett asked Brogan mockingly.
	“There was no bounty on him, and besides, out here two get along better than one. You know that,” Brogan replied. Jarrett turned to look away from Brogan as though he did not like the answer. “Why’d you do it?” Brogan asked. 
Jarrett lowered his head and took a moment to think. “Cause the faster and further you go the less likely it is you’ll be back,” Jarrett replied lifting his chin from his chest to look directly at Brogan.
“I don’t like you Brogan. You’re a mad dog on a long leash. With this, I am cutting that leash and letting you roam free until your madness kills you,” Jarrett said as he stared at him. 
Brogan shifted uncomfortably. “Well, thanks anyhow,” Brogan said as he mounted his horse and motioned for Miguel to gather the supplies that Jarrett brought.
Jarrett, seeing that he was free of his burden, turned his horse around and took one last look at Brogan. “May God have mercy on your soul,” He said and spurred his horse forward before either man had a chance to respond. Brogan and Miguel watched him as he rode away and disappeared from view.

For days Brogan and Miguel rode across a vast flat plain with a snowcapped range of mountains in the background. They forded stream after stream. On the far bank of the stream, they would gallop away into the sagebrush spotted plain beyond, until the sight of them was lost in the depths of the panorama.


By time the two men had reached the New Mexico territory, the color of the rocks had changed from sulfur yellow to ferrous red. Brogan and Miguel stopped at a shallow river to rest and water their horses as they rode through the treacherous mountain trails. Brogan got off his horse to stretch his legs. He walked over to Miguel.
“How much further?” Brogan asked. 
“Why, saddle sores starting to bother you?” Miguel replied.
“No, I just want to get to where I am going.”
“Another week if we don’t get stopped by another deputy.”
“I’m not going to happen again.” John Brogan said and walked back to his horse. He mounted it and the two men rode off.

The campfire burned low as Brogan slept on his bedroll next to the fire. Miguel was leaning against a large rock. He drifted in and out of sleep. The silhouette of bear could be seen against the light of a half moon. Miguel had fallen asleep. He was crouched down against the rock that he leaned against. The pace of the bear quickened to a trot. The bear cried out before it attacked the sleeping Miguel. The bear decapitated Miguel in a single swipe. The disturbance awakened Brogan. Brogan instinctively rolled away from his bedroll into the darkness and away from the bear. He got to his feet with his Le Mat at the ready. He fired all nine of the revolver’s rounds into the bear. The bear was slowed considerably but was still able to reach Brogan and took a swipe at him that grazed his face, arm, and chest. Brogan responded by unloading the shell in the gun’s shotgun barrel, and the bear fell to the ground dead. Brogan stumbled back into a tree. His body slid down its trunk. In shock and exhausted, Brogan passed out.
*	*	*	*
A wind kicked up a wall of dust that lowered the visibility to near zero in the sleepy Sonoran desert town. The cactus that gave way to buildings of wood and adobe soaked up the spring sun as it beat down. Alone on horseback John Brogan rode into the town. It appeared as though the wind, to avoid contact with him, blew around him. The rider was not fazed by the windstorm. The wind died down considerably as he reached the center of town. He rode up to the saloon, got off the horse, and brusquely dusted himself off before he went into the saloon. John Brogan was hardly recognizable when he walked into the saloon. He was dirty, scarred, and exhausted by his journey. Brogan walked up and dropped a gold coin on the bar to get the bartender’s attention. The bartender turned around from the cash register and approached the weathered John Brogan cautiously.
“Whiskey, a bottle if you’ve got one,” Brogan said. The bartender pulled a bottle and a shot glass out from under the bar. He took the coin from Brogan and made change. He left the change next to the bottle that he gave John Brogan. Sometime later, Deputy Doonan entered the saloon. He walked up to Brogan and looked him over. The bottle of whiskey Brogan drank was one third empty.
“You’re new in town. I don’t think we’ve met?” Deputy Doonan said.
“Yes new,” Brogan replied in a slightly drunk and surly tone.
“You look like a drifter. Are you a drifter? This is a quiet town,” the deputy said.
Brogan poured and drank a shot then looked Deputy Doonan over. “I am here to get cleaned up and settle a debt. I believe there is a man here that I owe a great deal,” Brogan said.
“Who’d that be?” The deputy asked.
“Ira Owen,” Brogan replied.
“The land agent? You don’t look like the type who would know the likes of him,” the deputy replied with tone that implied doubt.
“The major and I go way back,” Brogan said.
“You two fought in the war together?” The deputy asked.
“Something like that. Now if you would leave me to finish my drink,” Brogan said.
“Sure,” The deputy replied with a tinge of doubt. He turned and started to leave.
“Deputy, where can I get a decent bath and a room?” Brogan asked.
The deputy turned back around to face Brogan. “Stacey’s Bed and Livery, but you’d better hurry. She closes early on Saturdays,” The deputy said, turned back around, and walked out.

Brogan stepped out of the saloon on his way to get a room and get cleaned up when Ira Owen stepped out of his office. He could not have been more excited than if the heavens parted exposing the entrance to heaven. His heart pounded and fingers tingled. He had to use all of his strength to stop himself from walking up to Owen and shooting him dead. His urge quelled by his long felt desire that Owen was a man that deserved to suffer the same as those who suffered because of his act of betrayal. Brogan watched Owen as he walked two offices over and entered the sheriff’s office. Brogan frowned realizing that Owen had people that could help him so close, but he was still dumbfounded and waited for Owen to walk out of the sheriff’s office which he did a few minutes later. By then, Brogan had gathered his wits about him and started across the street as Owen closed the sheriff’s office door. Brogan picked up his pace as he walked across the street anxious to meet up with Owen once again. Brogan paced himself so that he stood by the hitching post in front of Owen’s office when he passed. Brogan’s body felt as though it were a torch, and as Owen walked by he sensed something unusual about the man who stood nearby watching him. Owen turned around before he put the key into the lock of his office door.
“Can I help you?” Owen asked Brogan. Brogan could not answer but his expression be intensified. “Are you okay?” Owen asked unsure whether or not he should approach the man that watched him from the street with such intensity.
Finally Brogan was able to spit out. “Remember me?” He asked and waited for Owen to respond ready to rip him apart with his bare hands. Owen squinted as he looked Brogan over trying to figure out if he knew that man that stood in front of him. Owen paused and closed his eyes as he replayed the sound of the voice that just spoke to him. Owen realized that the voice was familiar, but he was unable to place the face.
“Do I know you?” Owen asked.
“You don’t remember?” Brogan replied. Owen closed his eyes and thought hard. On hearing the voice again he realized it was an echo from his past. The memory struck him with the force of a lightning bolt. 
“Brogan?!”
“Yes, me Brogan.”
“But you were reported dead? I mean I thought you were dead. I . . .” Ira Owen’s thought was interrupted by the arrival of his housekeeper Sulema. Sulema was a young, petite, Mexican woman with pitch black hair and large engaging brown eyes.
“Mister Owen,” She said after she opened the office door from the inside. “Come in,” She added. Ira Owen followed Sulema’s suggestion leaving Brogan outside.
“That is not a good man Mister Owen,” Sulema said as she closed the door behind her.
“He was one of the men under my command during the war,” Ira Owen said plaintiffly.
“He may have been but you should not trust him now. I saw how he looked at you. It was not good.”
“Perhaps you are right,” Ira Owen said.
“I am right,” Sulema replied and led Ira Owen through his office to the door that led to his home behind the office.
Brogan, as if becoming conscious after sleepwalking, turned and walked down the street to the boarding house to get a room, a bath, a haircut, and a shave.

Ira Owen pulled a book from the bookcase in front of his desk. He walked back to his desk using his cane and sat down uncomfortably in his seat.  A clean, nevertheless scarred and thin, Brogan walked into the office. The bell on the door jingled when he opened and closed it behind him. Brogan walked over to Ira Owen’s desk and sat in the seat in front of it. Ira Owen stared at the man seated in front of him.
“You do not remember me?” Brogan asked.
Ira Owen looked even more intently at the man in front of him. “Brogan?” Ira Owen said. 
Brogan sat up and leaned in closer to Ira Owen. “That’s right, it’s me. Brogan,” Brogan said.
“I was told that you died,” Ira Owen said in a cold serious tone.
Brogan leaned back in his chair. “Perhaps, that was what you wished would have happened,” Brogan replied.
“No, not at all, you were my best soldier.” 
“Then why did you send me and the colonel to our deaths?”
“It was war. When you go to into battle, there are no guarantees,” Ira Owen said credulously almost offended.
“Not when there’s treachery.”
“My God, Brogan. You’re starting to sound like that colonel. If there’s anyone to blame it’s him.”
“And why is that?” 
“He was always getting himself entangled in some bloody affair. He thrived on it.” 
“Strange, he told me that it was you who betrayed us?” 
“Why? How?” Ira Owen asked challengingly.
“He didn’t say. He died before he could get a chance to fully tell his story, but he did ask me to do one thing,” John Brogan said as he pulled out the colonel’s Le Mat and pointed it at Ira Owen.
“No, Brogan don’t, don’t it wasn’t me, it wasn’t me! You don’t understand! ” Ira Owen pleaded.
Brogan pulled the trigger and put a revolver round in Ira Owen. Brogan’s victim was wounded but not dead. Brogan stared at him briefly as he thought about what to do next. He sat and debated with himself whether he should make than in front of him suffer a slow death or settle the debt quickly and move on. Outside he could hear the stir of people reacting to the sound of gunfire. Brogan pulled the gun’s hammer back for the shotgun shell. He fully intended to scatter the flesh of the man in front of him throughout the room. That was when the door to the living quarters burst open and the petite Sulema stood there holding a Colt 45. It barely fit in her hand. Brogan looked at her and started to laugh. It started as a giggle that turned into a full belly laugh. That was when Sulema’s tiny fingers squeezed the trigger of the gun she held. Her shot hit her target and Brogan fell to the floor. On the floor he could feel the chest wound and the flow of blood from it. Sulema dropped the gun and ran over to Ira Owen. Brogan could hear the jingle of the door open and close and the faces of strangers staring down at him. As Brogan lay bleeding to death, his soul resided in that space between life and death, heaven and hell, consciousness and unconsciousness he could hear the voice of Cassie calling for him like she did back in Missouri. His last earthly action was to smile knowing that he was only minutes away from being with her forever.
THE END

